_	But such a right is not usually treated as entitling one to invade the property rights of others; for example, by taking a neighbour’s dahlias on the ground that this is the most economical way of going about it.
_	Eugene Moss appealed from the decision of the Court of First Instance of Leyte denying his application for the registration of a ten-hectare island on the ground that, being an American citizen or an alien, he is disqualified to acquire lands under section 5, Article XIII of the 1935 Constitution following the decision in Krivenko v Register of Deeds.
_	In a short opinion concurring in part and concurring in the judgment, Justice White stated that "[t]he rule allowing jurisdiction to be obtained over a nonresident by personal service in the forum state, without more, has been and is so widely accepted throughout this country that I could not possibly strike it down, either on its face or as applied in this case, on the ground that it denies due process of law guaranteed by the Fourteenth Amendment."
_	Bafarawa asked the commission to invite Wamakko to testify so that certain issues could be clarified, but his request was refused on the ground that to do so was beyond the commission's mandate.
_	The court accordingly found that Crown counsel was not justified in refusing disclosure on the ground that the witness was not worthy of credit:
_	However, the Georgia Supreme Court struck the statute down in 2007, on the ground that it purported to act retroactively and was therefore unconstitutional.
_	The defendant disputed its liability on the ground that Drennen, Starr & Everett, on May 24, 1883, before the loss, admitted one Arndt as a partner in their firm, and that thereby, without its knowledge or consent, and by the voluntary act of the plaintiffs, the title, interest, and possession of the insured in the property was changed, and the policies became void.
_	As the UK is in a minority of countries to still charge tuition fees, increasing demands have been made to abolish fees on the ground that they burden people without wealthy families in debt, deter disadvantaged students from education, and escalate income inequality.
_	The result of Abu Bakar's interference was that, the Chiefs who were still on Tun Mutahir's side declined to attack Wan Ahmad on the ground that the Temenggung, who had really no status in Pahang, virtually directed operations, and claimed to own the country.
_	This would establish a precedent which would justify any subsequent Governor, who might be opposed to the prohibitory liquor law, in commuting all jail or penitentiary sentences inflicted in such cases upon the ground that he did not like the law, and that he knew better than the people what should be done in such cases.
_	The United States District Court for the Eastern District of Michigan dismissed the criminal indictment on the ground that it was not an "emission standard," but a "work practice standard," which under the terms of the statute, did not carry criminal liability.
_	In this he pleads for the abolition of the antiquated Jewish marriage and divorce regulations mainly on the ground that the Jews do not constitute a political nation.
_	The same authorities annulled their pension entitlement for the period 1948-1956, on the ground that they had been punished under Decree 102 of 1948.
_	The racecourse is shown on the map of 1848 as a roughly oval-shaped course extending around the west, north and east of the moor, crossing Moor Lane and carrying on around the ground that is now the home of Salford City F.C., roughly following the line of what is now Nevile Road.
_	It contains a bell set into the ground that chimes on the hour.
_	When the lover refuses to have sex with her on the ground that he is now her brother, she threatens to accuse him of rape and gains his acquiescence.
_	Section 53 was attacked on the floor of the House on the ground that private persons might assert copyright claims upon republishing Government documents from the plates."
_	This decision was based on the ground that Bostanai had probably lived in legitimate marriage with this woman, and, although there were no proofs, had presumably first emancipated and then married her.
_	This report was rejected by the Central government on the ground that it had not applied any objective tests for identifying the Backward Class.
_	The Meles government defends its action on the ground that the banned media outlets advocated "a certain population should be quarantined" and incited "violence among different ethnic groups in the country," including using hate-filled text messages on mobile phones asking people to attack ethnic groups.
_	Immense amounts of jewelry from the imperial storage were used to dress the dancers up, and a large amount of silk was used to cover the ground that they danced on.
_	The Inter-American Commission on Human Rights rejected an attempted assertion of the persistent objector defence in "Domingues v United States" (2002) on the ground that the prohibition against the juvenile death penalty to which the United States objected was not merely customary international law but "jus cogens", a norm from which no derogation was permitted.
_	The Supreme Court of Russia ended up ruling against her on the ground that "there was no proof of ownership" and "papers should remain in the state archive".
_	He has nothing whatever to do with them, unless he may be satisfied that an injustice has been done in an individual case; then he may commute the sentence or pardon the offender; but this can only be done upon the ground that, upon the facts presented, the defendant was a fit subject for executive clemency, and that an exception should be made in his favor as against the general rule of law.
_	But Bishop Benjamin Petre, the Vicar Apostolic of the London District, who already had Challoner as his vicar general, opposed this on the ground that he desired to have him as his own coadjutor with right of succession.
_	The court struck down the Section 7 of the East Punjab Safety Act, 1949, which directed the editor and publisher of a newspaper "to submit for scrutiny, in duplicate, before the publication, till the further orders , all communal matters all the matters and news and views about Pakistan, including photographs, and cartoons", on the ground that it was a restriction on the liberty of the press.
_	United States v. Thomas, 116 F.3d 606 (2nd Cir. 1997), was a case in which the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit ruled that a juror could not be removed from a jury on the ground that the juror was acting in purposeful disregard of the court's instructions on the law, when the record evidence raises a possibility that the juror was simply unpersuaded by the Government's case against the defendants.
_	He defended the position of the United States throughout on the ground that Koszta had ceased to be a citizen of Austria even by the law of Austria.
_	Dauss then pitched for the Tigers that afternoon, explaining his zest for privacy on the ground that he thought he would be nervous if the crowd knew he had just been married.
_	Those arguing that multinationals should hold rights and duties do so on the ground that this is necessary given their size and influence.
_	In "Enderby v Frenchay Health Authority" the ECJ held that although a speech therapist being paid less than a male counterpart could not be justified only on the ground that this resulted from different collective agreements, if a disparity came from market forces, this was an objective justification.
_	The Iraqi Ba'athists supported Qasim on the ground that they believed he would enter Iraq into the UAR, enlarging the Arab nationalist republic.
_	Andronikos appealed to the Church to annul the marriage but the Patriarch refused to oblige, on the ground that the young man’s wife was reported to be already pregnant.
_	After three games, all won by the Monarchs, Landis ordered a fourth canceled, on the ground that the games were outdrawing major league contests.
_	In an appeal from a conviction of murder, it was contended that at most the appellants were guilty of attempted murder on the ground that, in respect of the assault, the intention (mens rea) for murder had been present, but not the unlawful consequence of death; and, with regard to the burning, there had been the unlawful consequence required for murder but not the intention (mens rea), since the appellants believed the victim to be already dead.
_	Her idea was to make provision in the constitution at that time for some phases of local home mission work, but this was strenuously opposed on the ground that it would embrace too much.
_	Where a motion for leave to introduce a Bill is opposed on the ground that the Bill initiates legislation outside the legislative competence of the House, the Speaker may permit a full discussion thereon.
_	An individual may present his own petition on the ground that he is insolvent, i.e. unable to pay his debts.
_	Rosen, who testified on August 26 and September 9, 1948, refused to give testimony, answering most questions with, "I refuse to answer the question on the ground that any answer I may give may tend to incriminate me."
_	When a government inspector came to check the state of his administration, Wang Guan volunteered to degrade his grade on the ground that his region was under the threat of the Xianbei, and endured the penalty of sending his own child to the capital as a hostage.
_	At the next term of that court, in May, the application of Sully to remove the case into the United States court was made on the ground that he was a citizen of the State of New York, and all the other parties were citizens of Iowa.
_	Laura Porter's attempted clearance in the blink of an eye was blocked down, and Fitzpatrick almost unnoticed, pulled on the sliotar at 100 miles an hour and Lydia Fitzpatrick in an instant struck an unstoppable shot along the ground that flew aimlessly beyond the hapless goalkeeper Tara Murphy.
_	ProTV requested the removal of the posters, on the ground that they included the logo of the show and pictures of Tudor Chirilă without consent.
_	Duff declined to accede to his wish on the ground that the ministry had been condemned by the colony, and in consequence Dibbs and his colleagues resigned.
_	The decision was reversed 7-2 by the Supreme Court in "United States v. Kebodeaux", 133 S. Ct. 2496 (2013), on the ground that Kebodeaux himself was not unconditionally released from federal custody, because a law in effect at the time of his offense required him to register as a sex offender after his release from prison.
_	Improvements to the ground that year, made in an attempt to increase revenue, included the installation of hot showers in the change rooms.
_	During his papacy, Pope John Paul II appealed for a consensus to end the death penalty on the ground that it was "both cruel and unnecessary."
_	Judge Newman dissented on the ground that the PTO should have allowed Bilski's patent.
_	He laboured diligently for his diocese, but in 1110 he was exiled on the ground that he had never received the cross and ring from the emperor.
_	Griffith affirmed the dismissal on the ground that the owners' allegations presented a nonjusticiable political question, writing that "courts are not a forum for reconsidering the wisdom of discretionary decisions made by the political branches in the realm of foreign policy or national security."
_	The degree to which the sanctions were responsible for ending apartheid was a matter of debate as those opposed to the sanctions argue that the South African economy was already struggling before the sanctions were enforced and that it was the political process on the ground that led to the changes.
_	Justice Owen Roberts, joined by Justice McReynolds, dissented on the ground that venue had not properly been shown as to the Western District of Wisconsin and that government counsel had made arguments prejudicial to the defendants such as calling them "malefactors of great wealth."
_	At the end of the second period, the Wolverines appeared to have scored the tying goal, but the referee disallowed the goal on the ground that an official in the penalty box had blown his whistle before the goal.
_	In the mid-1850s, few houses yet existed nearby and large tracts of open lots surrounded the ground that had been secured for the church.
_	Even a century later, John A. Costello turned down the offer by Éamon de Valera to make him a Supreme Court judge on the ground that he "did not wish face charges of being another Sadleir or Keogh".
_	The decision had been adopted on the ground that several officers were already playing for different teams, which was premise to a good nucleus for forming a future competitive team.
_	A search order under this act "does not affect any right of a person to refuse to do anything on the ground that to do so might tend to expose him or his spouse to proceedings for an offence or for the recovery of a penalty".
_	Stems and branches do not branch very much unless pruned, resulting in many long, straight stems that originate from about 0.5–1.5" above the ground that give rise to the shrub's overall vase shape.
_	The Commission’s decision was challenged on the ground that aeronautics is within federal jurisdiction.
_	The employer successfully appealed to the Employment Appeal Tribunal on the ground that the employment tribunal had had no jurisdiction to make an award of compensation for non-economic loss on a complaint of unfair dismissal.
_	According to Jan Narveson, the view of some that there is no distinction between negative and positive rights on the ground that negative rights require police and courts for their enforcement is "mistaken".
_	Whitelocke, as one of the judges who had examined them, was cited to justify the release, which he did on the ground that there was no evidence that the prisoners were in priest's orders.
_	The defendant may move to dismiss a criminal charge on the ground that he or she has been singled out for prosecution because of race, gender, religion, national origin, illegitimacy, or similar.
_	Section 5(1)(e) states that an application for review can be made on the ground that "the making of the decision was an improper exercise of the power conferred by the enactment in pursuance of which it was purported to be made", and section 5(2)(j) explains that an improper exercise of power includes "any other exercise of a power in a way that constitutes abuse of the power".
_	Very few bills that he opposed ultimately passed, and every one that was passed against his opposition on the ground that it conflicted with the constitution, was eventually pronounced unconstitutional by the state Supreme Court.
_	The footprint is the area on the ground that Patriot can defend against inbound ballistic missiles.
_	Here his teaching was attacked on the ground that it was too exclusively Cartesian, and Rebous the rector obtained in 1675 from the state authorities a decree forbidding him to continue his lectures.
_	The State was an unsuccessful case brought before the District Court of Tokyo by a group of five survivors of the atomic attacks on Hiroshima and Nagasaki, who claimed the action was illegal under the laws of war and demanded reparations from the Japanese government on the ground that it waived the right for reparations from the U.S. government under the Treaty of San Francisco.
_	He also explained a new technique he developed using his oscillators he called "Telegeodynamics", using it to transmit vibrations into the ground that he claimed would work over any distance to be used for communication or locating underground mineral deposits.
_	Parker tried to call Horne himself to testify, but the defense successfully prevented his testimony from being heard on the ground that he was an atheist.
_	In upholding a state tax on aircraft parts, the court distinguished Mississippi Tax I on the ground that unlike the liquor markup in that case, in "Aviall Services, Inc. v. Tarrant Appraisal Dist.":
_	Similarly, he rejected the doctrine of the eternal duration of the world, on the ground that the world is corporeal, and, although the best possible "mechanism", contains in itself the elements of dissolution Again, he taught that "man's body is composed of matter and form", and that while the matter perishes the "form" of the body retains the power of resuscitating the "matter" on the last day.
_	Early in the game, George Jewett returned a punt through the whole Cornell team for a touchdown, but the touchdown was disallowed on the ground that a Michigan player (William C. Malley) was offside when the ball was snapped.
_	This arrangement has prompted criticism on the ground that the judiciary is not fully independent of the government.
_	In mid-2001 both Scorpio Jr. and Salvaje wanted to bring in their long time friend and partner Emilio Charles Jr. to the group, which Shocker opposed on the ground that Charles Jr. was simply "too ugly".
_	But permissions were not granted for performing there due to unavailability of the place on the ground that the staff council allow concerts only during the fest and not for any other event.
_	Pélissier objected to the rule, on the ground that the jerseys that he wore were his own, and had not been provided by the sponsor.
_	In December 1822, Pōmare married the future King Tapoa II of Taha'a and Bora Bora; this marriage was childless and ended with the Queen repudiating the marriage on the ground that he was sterile.
_	The very hot acidic water and steam have also created voids in the ground that are only covered by a thin crust.
_	The Community Committee may reject a community declaration on the ground that, among other things, the declarant did not apply for a COE.
_	Her first attempts to break into the music business failed; a producer rejected her on the ground that the world did not need a second Mireille Mathieu.
_	It does not authorize this Court to strike down federal or state criminal laws on the ground that they are not in the best interests of crime victims or the broader society."
_	Werner, a World War II Wehrmacht veteran refused on the ground that in his opinion no German officer of the time would have held such humane feelings as the officer portrayed in the film.
_	These are the forces on the ground that are in direct combat with the IF.
_	After the revolution of July 1830 he refused a pension of 6000 francs offered to him by King Louis Philippe, on the ground that he wished to retain his independence even in his relations with a government which he had helped to establish.
_	In that case, Tenise Barker, a 29-year-old nursing student in the Bronx, moved to dismiss the RIAA's complaint for lack of specificity, and on the ground that merely "making available" does not constitute a copyright infringement.
_	In France he was on friendly terms with Huguenots, justifying himself on the ground that their non-episcopal ordination had not been of their own seeking, and at the Savoy conference in 1661 he tried hard to effect a reconciliation with the Presbyterians.
_	The Act defined a mass action as 'any civil action ... in which monetary relief claims of 100 or more persons are proposed to be tried jointly on the ground that the plaintiffs’ claims involve common questions of law or fact'.
_	When the question of papal infallibility arose, he opposed the promulgation of the dogma on the ground that such promulgation was inopportune.
_	In addition to the above justices, the following justices were removed from the Supreme Court of Pakistan on the ground that their appointment to the court was made without consultation with the "de jure" Chief Justice of Pakistan.
_	The necropolis, ascribable to the Arzachena culture and dated to the second half of the fourth millennium BC, it is composed by five stone cists, four of which are surrounded by circles of stones stuck into the ground that, originally, delimited the mound of earth and rubble that was erected over the burial.
_	He opposed his predecessor, Sir Mark Young's proposal of expanding social services on the ground that the local Chinese population cared little about social welfare.
_	On 27 January, it was reported on Twitter by many Egyptian and foreign reporters on the ground that the government had blocked text messaging and BlackBerry messaging services.
_	In the previous January he had obtained licence from the king to reside in Edinburgh, on the ground that he had not a competent manse or dwelling-house in Galloway.
_	In the meanwhile, Julian, who seems to have become suddenly jealous of the influence that Athanasius was exercising at Alexandria, addressed an order to Ecdicius, the Prefect of Egypt, peremptorily commanding the expulsion of the restored primate, on the ground that he had never been included in the imperial act of clemency.
_	The Court found this a misreading of the unjust enrichment standard, but upheld the motion to dismiss on the ground that Rosetta Stone failed to allege facts showing that it conferred a benefit on Google, for which Google should reasonably be expected to repay.
_	1 All ER 268, a divisional court of the King's Bench division declined to follow a Court of Appeal decision on the ground that the decision had been reached "per incuriam" for failure to cite a relevant House of Lords decision.
_	Afghanistan makes its claim on the Pashtun areas on the ground that it served as the Pashtun seat of power since 1709 with the rise of the Hotaki dynasty followed by the establishment of the Durrani Afghan Empire.
_	In 2001, the case was taken to the London High Court, which rejected the Indian government's request for extradition on the ground that there was no "prima facie" case against Saifi.
_	Although Wilson was sympathetic to Ford’s aims, he declined the offer on the ground that the venture was most unlikely to succeed.
_	Dootsie Williams sued and was awarded the rights to the song in 1957 by the Los Angeles Superior Court "on the ground that Belvin and Hodge had written most of it."
_	At noon, the 9th Infantry Battalion, a Militia unit from the 7th Infantry Brigade, dispatched two companies to occupy some of the ground that the 2/12th had regained around No. 3 Airstrip and the mission.
_	When, 3 months and 2 days after arrival, she lodged an unfair dismissal claim, the employer argued it was time barred on the ground that in ordinary contract law one is bound by a notice when a reasonable person would have read a message.
_	The Journal sought to excuse its conduct on the ground that it has a "right as a private business concern to select its customers and to refuse to accept advertisement from whomever it pleases."
_	Lambe was considered an eccentric by his contemporaries, mainly on the ground that he was a strict, but not fanatical, vegetarian and that his favourite prescription was filtered water.
_	The court after full argument awarded the writ in June 1779, on the ground that there being no express statute of the university forbidding usury or the lending of money to minors, the Vice-Chancellor's court had no jurisdiction in the case.
_	The court affirmed John's convictions, but vacated her sentence on the ground that her sentence has been imposed without accompanying district court justification and district court's consideration of the correct sentencing range.
_	Sydney brown trapdoors dig an open burrow in the ground that is lined with silk.
_	The plaintiffs contended that the conveyed title was void, because the judgment divested Avegno of all interest and estate in the premises, the circuit court lacked jurisdiction to allow the sale, and because the district court, which did have jurisdiction, dismissed Morgan's intervention on the ground that his mortgage "could not be acknowledged".
_	William Fletcher, a professor of legal studies at Yale University, explains the different treatment on the ground that in the nineteenth century, a municipal corporation was viewed as more closely analogous to a private corporation than to a state government.
_	The bloc was denied registration on the ground that neither of the two parties had submitted proper registration.
_	The senate was also attacked on the ground that it did not have the right to condemn any citizens without a trial before the people.
_	The Albanian language was removed from public sight, Albanian families were prohibited from naming their children with Albanian names on the ground that it caused divisions with the other communities in the republic, and finally, to lower the significantly high birth rate of the Albanian population, Albanian families were prohibited from having more than two children.
_	"The "Colgate" decision distinguished "Dr. Miles" on the ground that the "Colgate" indictment did not charge that company with selling its products to dealers under agreements which obligated the latter not to resell except at prices fixed by the seller.
_	In "United States v. Furlong" (1820), sometimes referred to as "United States v. Pirates", authored by Justice Johnson (a dissenter in "Palmer"), the Court distinguished "Palmer" again, primarily on the ground that the pirate vessel had no nationality (it was an American ship prior to being hijacked).
_	Since the reconnaissance patrols had been pushed forward, early in the day and successfully established communication with the Anglo-allies, it then became desirable to explore the ground that lay more to the right front of the Prussians, in the direction of the right flank of the main French army, in order to ascertain the nature of any precautionary measures adopted by Napoleon to impede the junction of the two Coalition armies.
_	On 16 June 1954, the members of the executive committees of the Autonomous District Council of the Garo Hills(GHADC), the Khasi(Khasi Hills Autonomous District Council), Jaintia Hills(Jaintia Hills Autonomous District Council), the Lushai Hills(Mizo Hills), and the North Cachar Hills District Council held a meeting at Shillong, and pleaded for the establishment of a separate "Hill state" on the ground that there was no adequate safeguard for the preservation of the identity of the hill people in "Sixth Schedule" of Constitution of India.
_	Most writers on international law have regarded this method of preventing such acts of hostility as unjustifiable, on the ground that the persons taken as hostages are not the persons responsible for the act; that, as by the usage of war hostages are to be treated strictly as prisoners of war, such an exposure to danger is transgressing the rights of a belligerent; and as useless, for the mere temporary removal of important citizens till the end of a war cannot be a deterrent unless their mere removal deprives the combatants of persons necessary to the continuance of the acts aimed at.
_	Thus, in 1348, Parliament objected to an export duty of £2 per sack on wool on the ground that it was in fact a tax on landowners who, as a consequence, received lower prices for their wool.
_	In late November 2012 Morsi 'temporarily' granted himself unlimited powers on the ground that he would "protect" the nation from the power structure left over from the Mubarak-era and the power to legislate without judicial oversight or review of his acts.
_	Some scholars argue in favour of the greater authenticity of the Yemenite pronunciation on the ground that it is the only Hebrew pronunciation to distinguish all the consonants.
_	On the appearance of the Marprelate tracts (1589) he preached against them at St. Mary's, on the ground that their tendency was 'to make sin ridiculous, whereas it ought to be made odious.
_	The election was not confirmed by Elizabeth, on the ground that his presence was specially required in Munster.
_	The question before the Supreme Court was "whether ss. 44(1)(d) and 58 of the Canada Pension Plan infringe s. 15(1) of the "Charter" on the ground that they discriminate on the basis of age against widows and widowers under the age of 35, and if so, whether this infringement is demonstrably justified in a free and democratic society under s. 1".
_	These remarks were criticised in a later issue of "The Lancet" on the ground that they failed to take account of Indian conditions, specifically the fact that government regulations effectively precluded the use of morphine outside large hospitals.
_	An earlier applicant, Softedge Solutions, had been rejected on the ground that they could not satisfactorily answer questions about their previous experience in IT and their technical tie up.
_	The Court of Appeals nullified the acquittal of the accused on the ground that the prosecution was not accorded due process by the judge during the trial of the case.
_	At the interchange with Alpine Avenue, M-37 merges onto the freeway and the two run concurrently past the studios for WZZM-TV with its iconic weatherball, a sphere above the ground that uses colored lights to display a weather forecast.
_	This origin is disputed by Sophocles (Greek Lexicon of the Roman and Byzantine Periods, s. v.) on the ground that the hymn could not have been composed in one day, while on the other hand its twenty-four oikoi contain no allusion to such an event and therefore could scarcely have been originally composed to commemorate it.
_	Even if the planning authorities committed negligence by omission, and we do not say so, this does not give permission for chaotic building and setting facts on the ground that may become obstacles for any future planning.
_	Black bluntly phrased the issue in terms starkly different than the majority's: "It has denied him a license on the ground that his present religious beliefs disqualify him for membership in the legal profession."
_	A trial began in 1973 and, in 1976, the chancellor found that the black defendants were jointly and severally liable to the plaintiffs based on three separate theories: (1) for a tort of malicious interference with the plaintiff's business; (2) for violation of a Mississippi statute banning secondary boycotts on the theory that the defendants' primary dispute was with the governing authorities of Port Gibson and Claiborne County, and not with the white merchants at whom the boycott was directed; and (3) the court found a violation of Mississippi's antitrust statute, on the ground that the boycott had diverted black patronage from the white merchants to black merchants and to other merchants located out of Claiborne County, and thus had unreasonably limited competition between black and white merchants that had traditionally existed.
_	There is a chapter on the state of English church music, in which the author deprecated the custom of writing fugal music for voices, on the ground that such treatment prevents the words from being properly heard.
_	Vanguard was also under investigation by the House Un-American Activities Committee on the ground that in the twenties and thirties it had published some books by Communist and left-wing writers.
_	He was strongly opposed to the League of Nations in 1919 and 1920 on the ground that it involved the yielding of national sovereignty.
_	On the right bank, Kemball's troops would try to retake the ground that they had given up the previous afternoon in order to bring enfilading fire against the left bank positions.
_	Gus Solomon, CIO attorney who filed the demurrer on the ground that the law was unconstitutional, asked transfer of the case to the judges hearing the test.
_	Note that in the original Hertz theory, the term containing formula_118 was neglected on the ground that tension could not be sustained in the contact zone.
_	His son interceded, on the ground that she neglected only him, but when they had no mother, all three sons would be neglected.
_	The district court granted summary judgment against the defendants on the antitrust charges, but dismissed the invalidity claims on the ground that the Government lacked standing to challenge patent validity.
_	Once again, the trial court had deemed the plaintiff's grant void and excluded it from evidence; the Court observed that such a ruling "could only be sustained upon the ground that it was wholly void, or wholly inadmissible in that cause.
_	In January 1991, Teoh was notified pursuant to the "Migration Act 1958" that his application for resident status had been refused on the ground that he could not meet the good character requirement as he had a criminal record.
_	In criminal proceedings, a defendant who has been committed for trial may petition to the superior court for a writ of prohibition, in this case on the ground that his conduct, even if proven, does not constitute the offense charged.
_	In the US Supreme Court case of "Allgeyer v. Louisiana" (1897), where a Louisiana statute was struck down on the ground that it violated an individual's right to contract, it was held that "liberty" in the Fourteenth Amendment of the Constitution meant not only the right of the citizen to be free from any physical restraint of his person, but also the right to freely enjoy all his faculties – that is, to be free to use them in all lawful ways; to live and work where he will; to earn his livelihood by any lawful calling; to pursue any livelihood or avocation; and for that purpose to enter into all contracts that may be proper, necessary, and essential to his carrying out those purposes.
_	The division largely followed the political spectrum, with conservative newspapers such as "Nya Dagligt Allehanda", "Svenska Dagbladet" and "Hallands Nyheter" praising the proposition on the ground that it would lead to “disciplining and a spiritual uplift” of the youth, while the left generally was very critical of the motion.
_	Finally, New York argued that Direct Revenue should be held liable for the actions of its resellers, on the ground that Direct Revenue ratified the conduct of its resellers.
_	I am certain that a person while occupying the position of a Minister cannot file a writ petition or other legal proceeding against the Government ,of which he is a part challenging orders or action issued or initiated against him by the Government or its functionaries, alleging infraction of law by him,and that he cannot claim any right to mount such a challenge on the ground that he is a private citizen, as long he continues to occupy the position of Minister".
_	The Nehru Report favoured constituencies based on geography on the ground that being dependent on each other for election would bind the communities closer together.
_	He asserted the authority of the presbyters as rulers of the church on the ground that the Apostles had appointed such.
_	Hence, if "relevant evidence is inadmissible in the presence of other evidence related to it, its exclusion must rest not on the ground that the other evidence has rendered it "irrelevant," but on its character as unfairly prejudicial, cumulative or the like, its relevance notwithstanding."
_	He appeared for the House of Lords in the king's bench on the return to Lord Shaftesbury's habeas corpus on 29 June 1677, and sustained its sufficiency on the ground that, though a general warrant for commitment to prison would be invalid if issued by any court but the House of Lords, the king's bench had no jurisdiction to declare it so when issued by that house.
_	While the Board will almost always reject these objections on the ground that they have already been ruled upon, this enables the employer to raise these objections in the appellate court proceedings concerning the Board's decision in the unfair labor practice case.
_	One explanation is that Noah, foreseeing that a flood would destroy the world on account of its corruption, refused to marry on the ground that his offspring would perish.
_	In the same year, however, Edward I demanded of the clergy a fifth of their moveables, which they resisted, on the ground that they could not disobey the Pope; but the king was not inclined to desist, and in order to force the acquiescence of the clergy, he put them out of the pale of the laws.
_	Players can leave messages on the ground that can either help players by providing hints and warnings or harm players by leaving false hints.
_	Patterson preferred Peale's design, but recommended Longacre's for approval on the ground that it was in lower relief.
_	Carla Garrity, a fourteen-year-old girl from Burbank, California, objected to Cole's invitation to the inauguration on the ground that Cole had done nothing to deserve it.
_	During the 1956 Gubernatorial election he lost in plurality votes to Republican Christopher Del Sesto, but the Rhode Island Supreme Court invalidated 5,000 civilian absentee and shut-in ballots cast prior to election day on the ground that a constitutional amendment required such votes to be cast on, rather than prior to, election day.
_	Scientists can also criticize a specific morality on scientific grounds, but in a scientific capacity they do not do so on the ground that the morality itself is intrinsically objectionable, but rather that it cannot be reconciled with the facts, i.e., it involves assumptions or valuations contrary to known logical and factual evidence.
_	His mother, having fallen pregnant to a Russian officer, a Colonel named Carl Marshall, also of English descent, gave birth to the child in her husband's palazzo, and in 1834 the Roman Rota upheld Lorenzo's claim to the dukedom on the ground that a child born in the marital home was presumed in law to have been the legitimate offspring of the head of the house.
_	The Commission denied the official authority to give evidence, alleging it could do this under the Staff Regulations, articles 17 to 19, on the ground that the same facts were pending in another case, "Weddel v Commission".
_	And disputed it was, on the ground that it clashed with Frederick Henry's entailment, by the beneficiary of that entailment, Luise Henriette's son Frederick I of Prussia.
_	The ruling was overturned in December 2009 on the ground that the Court found the plaintiff, Mayfield, not to have standing.
_	Others, such as David Lewis, have objected to paraconsistent logic on the ground that it is simply impossible for a statement and its negation to be jointly true.
_	The three-judge District Court panel found that segregation in public education has a detrimental effect on negro children, but denied relief on the ground that the negro and white schools in Topeka were substantially equal with respect to buildings, transportation, curricula, and educational qualifications of teachers.
_	Act for involvement in criminal activities on the ground that the detention was in the interests of public safety, peace and good order.
_	(Contrary views were expressed by people such as Donald Gray and Roger Arguile, partly on the ground that, following the writings of St Irenaeus, the goodness of the natural order and its relation to the Eucharist was an important element; the offertory brought the world into church).
_	The estate refused to pay on the ground that Mr Shadwell had given no consideration for the promise to pay the £150 pa.
_	Other than second hand mention, there is little proof on the ground that Cobham and his wife actually existed.
_	The liberal economist F. A. Hayek wrote in 1976 that: "It is probably a misfortune that, especially in the USA, popular writers like Samuel Smiles...have defended free enterprise on the ground that it regularly rewards the deserving, and it bodes ill for the future of the market order that this seems to have become the only defence of it which is understood by the general public.
_	The Jesuits, who looked with an evil eye upon Bass's undertaking, had endeavored, in a letter to the magistrate of Breslau, as early as July 15, 1694, to have the sale of Hebrew books interdicted, on the ground that such works contained "blasphemous and irreligious words"; and they had succeeded.
_	The French Oratory was suspected of Jansenism, and he was himself criticized on the ground that his preaching led to unsatisfactory results.
_	Aaron, feeling that he should have been God's messenger, asks how they can prove to the pharaoh that he spoke to God, which Moses answers with a stick that he throws on the ground that transforms into a snake.
_	4) If you have an assistant, have them walk away from the base of the tree at a right angle to your position until they reach the spot on the ground that aligns with the top of the stick.
_	Judge Giles Rich dissented on the ground that the "Benson" case had held a computer program patent ineligible and the machine format was immaterial: " 'Every competent patent draftsman' can draft claims to computer programs either as a process or a machine system."
_	The lawsuit was thrown out by U.S. District Judge Loretta Preska in a hearing in early December 2006 on the ground that the charges were too vague to stand up in court.
_	He objected to the SI on the ground that the movement seemed to be established mainly by artists who have their own interest at heart more than a common goal.
_	However, they rejected the provisions of the November 2011 Gulf Cooperation Council deal on the ground that "it divide[d]
_	It was reiterated by rebels on the ground that they would not advance on Zliten due to the possibility of a defeat, such as those sustained by the eastern rebels during their attempted advances earlier in the war.
_	"(2) Any person who was a party to any proceeding before the court, or is aggrieved by the order, determination or other proceeding of the court, may question the proceeding on the ground that it is wrong in law or is in excess of jurisdiction by appealing to a county court.
_	Boyle presented him with two hundred copies of his Bible in Irish for immediate circulation, and subscribed towards the printing of three thousand more copies, which Kirkwood succeeded in distributing over the north of Scotland, in spite of opposition to his scheme in England, on the ground that it would help preserve Gaelic.
_	He won the Darrel Baldock Medal for the best player on the ground that day.
_	There was a light dusting of snow on the ground that day and the air was crisp during the service attended by more than two hundred people celebrating the man's life and retelling stories of times shared with Smoke through tears and laughter.
_	The Court sided with the government, primarily on the ground that 10 U.S.C. 673c was enacted more recently than 50 App. U.S.C. §454(c)(1), based on the presumptions that Congress was aware of the earlier law when it enacted the later law, and that the later law effectively amended or repealed the earlier law notwithstanding the sections were in different locations in the codification.
_	In fact, however, he refused the application on the ground that the claim was stale, a "pitch of heroical justice" which North cannot adequately extol, and which so impressed Macclesfield that he expended a shilling in the purchase of the lord keeper's portrait.
_	He is a supporter of the free market, criticizes socialism on the ground that it is an ineffective and unjust economical system and advocates lowering taxes as a way of incentivizing the entrepreneurs to set up new businesses.
_	The case was finally dismissed, "on the ground that there was no live controversy."
_	Director of the NCI testified on June 2, 1981, "his agencies award last year of a $910,000 research grant to a scientist (Straus) …on the ground that the charges …had not yet been proven.
_	This lawsuit was thrown out in 2000 on the ground that McClory had waited too long to bring his claims.
_	He was also unusual among Irish Attorneys General in acting as the Government's spokesman when it refused to introduce legislation on adoption, on the ground that such legislation would be contrary to Roman Catholic teaching.
_	Again, in 369 BC, when the Spartan ambassadors had come to Athens to settle the terms of the desired alliance between the states, and the Athenian council had proposed that the land-forces of the confederacy should be under the command of Sparta, and the navy under that of Athens, Cephisodotus persuaded the assembly to reject the proposal, on the ground that, while Athenian citizens would have to serve under Spartan generals, few but Helots (who principally manned the ships) would be subject to Athenian control.
_	Ventura sought attorney’s fees as a sanction for the filing of a frivolous petition for recall, but that request was denied, on the ground that there was no statutory authority for such an award.
_	When General Courtney Hodges commanding the First US Army joined up with General George S. Patton's Third US Army on 16 January 1945, the Allies launched a counter-offensive towards the German border which recaptured all the ground that gained during the offensive.
_	Judge Mayer dissented, first, on the ground that the majority opinion failed to overrule "State Street" explicitly.
_	The Hawke government was pledged to (and ultimately did) stop the project, over the objections of the Tasmanian Liberal government, on the ground that it endangered a World Heritage listed area.
_	Worcestershire County Cricket Club has been a part of the St John's community since 1896 when they first played at New Road, the ground that they still use today.
_	The identification was contested by Giulia Canella's attorneys on the ground that the mother had not allowed to see the man, claiming she would have foiled the whole Bruneri family plot orchestrated in conjunction with the quaestor and police, not on the grounds of illness.
_	He embarked on his current path in 1963 when he was sentenced to three years imprisonment at the Federal Correctional Institution in Danbury, Connecticut for refusing military induction on the ground that the Federal government perpetuated racial discrimination.
_	On November 30, 2006 the verdict was invalidated by the Corte di Cassazione, on the ground that the Milan court did not have jurisdiction to try the case.
_	On appeal, the Fourth Circuit affirmed, but on the ground that the searches were justified as a matter of law by special non-law-enforcement needs.
_	Milan tried in vain to get an appointment to the Board of Trade on the ground that he knew the tricks of traders and money-changers, and he accumulated a list of claims against his royal master for services rendered in the Netherlands — from espionage to loans of money — which he had small chance of collecting in cash.
_	When the third child was only three days old, DSS transferred him to a foster home on the ground that immediate removal was necessary to avoid imminent danger to his life or health.
_	But one unscrupulous man obtained a judgement from the High court Division on the ground that his ancestors grave is effected by the extension, which directed the Dhaka City Corporation to restore the fencing wall to its previous position, narrowing down the road to its earlier state.
_	In the early 2000s, the team moved to the Phoenix Sports Club, the ground that the team would reside in for a number of years.
_	Indigenous courts refused to apply criminal law provisions, on the ground that no criminal responsibility could be determined in the absence of a specific legislative text dealing with artistic and literary property.
_	The Court of Appeal overturned this application of Junior Books v. Veitchi, on the ground that Junior Books depended on its own unique and particular facts and could not be used to allow the present claim for it was pure economic loss.
_	At the final match between South Korea and Japan on 28 July, South Korean fans booed the start of the Japanese anthem and later upped the political sloganeering with a banner that covered most of the width of one end of the ground that read, in Korean, "The nation that forgets history has no future."(), apparently aiming at the Japanese leaders' reluctance to admit to wrongdoings during its militaristic and colonial past, after they displayed huge pictures of Ahn Jung-geun, who assassinated the first Prime Minister of Japan and then-Japanese Resident-General of Korea Itō Hirobumi back in 1909, and Yi Sun-sin, a Korean naval commander who is famed for his victories against the Japanese navy during the Imjin war in the Joseon Dynasty back in the 16th century.
_	Scooby bites Shaggy, causing Shaggy to knock over the table and drop the moonstone on the ground that he was going to give to Velma as a surprise.
_	After her retirement from AMEB in 1983, Holland continued to compose, but chose to focus more on the writing of music text books, on the ground that she believed "making new converts to music" to be more important than adding to the volume of existing music.
_	I would not tolerate the questioning of his royal prerogative by one of his own law officers, and ordered "the man Catlin's" dismissal from as position of Recorder on the ground that he was a ringleader of the trouble.
_	College was that no student who passed through it should have any fear of reproach on the ground that it was a college less developed than the great Sydney Teachers' College'.
_	On 1 June 1685 their liberty was formally assured on the ground that the witnesses against them had perjured themselves, and on 4 June the bill of attainder against Stafford was reversed.
_	John Bingham was an influential supporter of this deletion, on the ground that courts might construe the term "civil rights" more broadly than people like Wilson intended.
_	In the early 1980s consumer behavior researchers had begun to question the hegemony of the information processing perspective on the ground that it may neglect important consumption phenomena like daydreams and emotional responses.
_	It established the constitutional rule that where an appellate court reverses a criminal conviction on the ground that the prosecution failed to present sufficient evidence to prove the defendant's guilt beyond a reasonable doubt, the Double Jeopardy Clause shields the defendant from a second prosecution for the same offense.
_	West Bengal government ordered forfeiting of all copies of "Dwikhandita" on the ground that it outraged the religious feelings of the Muslim community.
_	Following the assault, the 1st Brigade, including the 2nd Battalion, went forward on 21 September and secured the ground that had been gained.
_	Many persons included among the some 29 million people presently without health care coverage in the United States are former ERISA "subscribers", insurance terminology for Plan beneficiaries, who have been denied benefits-usually on the ground that the prescribed care is not medically necessary or is "experimental"-or dropped from coverage, often because they have lost their jobs due to the very illness for which care was denied.
_	Friedrich Eugen Maier ran in the beginning of the 1930s until 1944 a repair shop on the Sömmeringstraße 31/32 in Berlin-Charlottenburg on the ground that belonged to the Magistrat von Berlin.
_	An injunction was granted on the ground that the use suggested the plaintiffs recommended or approved of the defendant's goods, or had some connection with the goods.
_	In 1948, following Gandhi's death, the Nobel Committee declined to award a prize on the ground that "there was no suitable living candidate" that year.
_	In 2012, members of the police department crashed the LGBT Pride Parade in Santo Domingo and arrested individuals at the parade on the ground that marchers were improperly using the Dominican Republic's flag.
_	Leary challenged the act on the ground that the act required self-incrimination, which violated the Fifth Amendment.
_	When the case is tried, the jury brings in a verdict of manslaughter, with a strong recommendation to mercy on the ground that "Campbell was undoubtedly looking for trouble".
_	The Forty-seventh Amendment of the Constitution of India, officially known as The Constitution (Forty-seventh Amendment) Act, 1984, amended the Ninth Schedule to the Constitution, and added 14 legislations relating to land reforms, enacted by the States of Assam, Bihar, Haryana, Tamil Nadu, Uttar Pradesh and West Bengal and the union territory of Goa, Daman and Diu with a view to provide that the enactments shall not be deemed to be void on the ground that they are inconsistent with any of the provisions of Part III of the Constitution relating to Fundamental Rights.
_	Having admitted the psychological fact of mental association, he attacks the theories of Mill and Bain primarily on the ground that they purport to give an account of mental life as a whole, a metaphysical doctrine of existence.
_	The Commissioner and Flowers moved for summary judgment on the ground that the two unclaimed letters sent by the Commissioner were a constitutionally adequate attempt at notice, and Jones filed a cross-motion for summary judgment.
_	Justice Douglas concurred in the result on the ground that the equal protection clause rather than the due process clause was the proper basis of decision.
_	Adams wrote that Ieyasu denied the Jesuits' request for execution on the ground that:
_	Yet another source of conflict was the desire of some nations to expel people from territory within its borders on the ground that those people did not share a common bond with the majority of people living in that nation.
_	In 1432 the Carmelites obtained from Pope Eugenius IV the bull "Romani pontificis", which mitigated the Rule of St Albert and the 1247 modification, on the ground that the original demanded too much of the friars.
_	Even the pegs of the nomads’ yak wool tents are thought of as sanctifying the ground that lies beneath...".
_	Park conjectured that he came from Suffolk on the ground that "he addressed verses to 'Mr. P. W.' who visited Ipswich and wrote an epitaph on Mrs. Pooley of Badley.’
_	Some are resprouters, and have a thick rootstock buried in the ground that shoots up new stems after a fire, and others are reseeders, meaning the adult plants are killed by the fire, but disperse their seeds, which are stimulated by the smoke to take root and grow.
_	Lord Temple endeavoured to secure his exclusion on the ground that he had taken orders in the Church of England, and one of James Gillray's caricatures delineates the two politicians, Temple and Camelford, playing at battledore and shuttlecock, with Horne Tooke as the shuttlecock.
_	The lawsuit was initially dismissed by the District Court on the ground that Schuchardt did not have standing to pursue the case.
_	Her application for assistance, filed in August 1966, was denied in November solely on the ground that she had not lived in the State for a year before her application was filed, a requirement under Connecticut law.
_	At the convention of 4 June 1639 (O. S.) Eaton took exception to the fifth article of the constitution, which limited the right of voting and of holding public office to church members only on the ground that ‘the free planters ought not to surrender this power out of their hands.’
_	It has been described as Rousseau's most unreadable work; in the book's foreword, he concedes that the book might be repetitious and disorderly, but begs the reader's indulgence on the ground that he needs to defend his reputation from slander while he is still alive.
_	Justice Bhagwati’s extended Article 14 as dealing not only with equality as such but also arbitrariness on the ground that arbitrariness was anathema to equality.
_	Work began on the South-East Corner of the ground in early June 2011, restoring a section of the ground that had been lost eight years earlier when the South Stand was demolished, and adding 500 seats to the capacity.
_	An opposition can be based on the grounds that the subject-matter of the patent is not patentable (Article 100(a) EPC, for instance because the claimed invention is not new or not inventive), on the ground that the invention is insufficiently disclosed to allow a person skilled in the art to carry it out (Article 100(b) EPC), or on the ground that the content of the patent extends beyond the content of the application as filed –"or, if the patent was granted on a divisional application or on a new application filed under , beyond the content of the earlier application as filed"– (Article 100(c) EPC).
_	George Jeffreys, who had a personal concern in the matter, tried the case, and directed the jury to return a verdict of guilty on the ground that the act of sending the letters was itself seditious, and that there was no occasion to adduce evidence to prove a seditious intent.
_	Separate suits were brought by the American Independent Party and the Socialist Labor Party, challenging the validity of Ohio election laws insofar as they precluded the parties' being placed on the ballots to choose electors pledged to particular candidates for the Presidency and Vice Presidency of the United States; the attack on the validity of these laws was rested on the ground that they violated the equal protection clause of the Fourteenth Amendment—on the ground that they denied plaintiffs and the voters who might wish to vote for them the equal protection of the laws, guaranteed against state abridgment by the Equal Protection Clause of U.S. Const.
_	The last nickname was rumoured to have started during a match in the late 1890s, when a defender kicked the ball so high out of the ground that the crowd started screaming "High High High" and that nickname stayed with the club ever since.
_	AA subsequently sought to avoid liability on the ground that the insured had failed to disclose that she was suffering from cervical cancer.
_	However, in practice the events on the ground that lead to their virtual extinction worked out.
_	Hian endeavoured, of course fruitlessly, to gather it up, and in his efforts dug so deeply into the ground that he made an opening clear through the sky-world.
_	Because of her curly blonde hair, she was later recognised by a Romanian pilot after the Soviet occupation of Romania, as Burdina had flown so close to the ground that her features were memorised.
_	The Court concluded by holding that "a defendant who seeks reversal of his conviction after a guilty plea, on the ground that the district court committed plain error under Rule 11, must show a reasonable probability that, but for the error, he would not have entered the plea."
_	Justice Stevens dissented on the ground that subjective intent is not a valid criterion for constitutional adjudication.
_	But the Centre turned it down on the ground that there was no plan to declare new National Highways.
_	In the following December Sir John Yeamans claimed the governorship on the ground that he had been made a landgrave by the proprietors.
_	They find a channel under the ground that leads to the unknown room inside the column that probably the thieves' base.
_	The FCC ruled "that a broadcast station should not be allowed to refuse a request for political advertising time solely on the ground that the station does not sell or program such lengths of time".
_	In "" (2006) there is a scene with a similar perspective, where Jack Sparrow, Elizabeth and Norrington find a buried chest and the camera looks up to them from inside the hole in the ground that the chest is in.
_	Although Chancery was more favorable to the debtor, it still maintained a relatively strict line in these cases: injunctions were not routinely granted “simply on the ground that the penal sum was outrageously disproportionate to the underlying debt.”
_	Rather than grant an injunction barring the enforcement of the bond on the ground that the sum was grossly disproportionate to the underlying debt, Chancery “felt it necessary to mention special circumstances in the debtor’s favor,” namely that “he was in the service of the king and queen on the day appointed for payment, and had since paid the twenty marks into Chancery to be held for the obligee.
_	It is not indeed right to overlook the fact that some have rejected the Epistle to the Hebrews, saying that it is disputed by the Church of Rome, on the ground that it was not written by Paul." mentions the Diatessaron: "But their original founder, Tatian, formed a certain combination and collection of the Gospels, I know not how, to which he gave the title Diatessaron, and which is still in the hands of some.
_	But the FSA refused the whole of his request for information held on manual files on the ground that the information sought was not "personal" within the definition of "personal data" in section 1(1) of the 1998 Act, and that, even if it was, it did not constitute "data" within the separate definition of that word in section 1(1)(c).
_	The District Court granted the prison officials' motion to dismiss on the ground that respondent had not fully exhausted his administrative remedies under the PLRA.
_	In England and Wales, divorce is allowed on the ground that the marriage has irretrievably broken down.
_	However, after being given notice to leave the site in 1904 as it was to be used for housing, the club leased four acres of land to the north of Ilford, where the ground that became known as Lynn Road was built.
_	The appeals were allowed on the ground that the Minister had not discharged the burden of proving the validity of the detention orders.
_	In Germany during the Nazi era, a 1933 decree stated that "No National Socialist may suffer detriment... on the ground that he does not make any religious profession at all".
_	The case was dismissed on September 11, 2009 by a panel of the Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia, on the ground that the charges could not be brought against the contractors under the Alien Tort Statute.
_	12 more of Modi's supporters were denied entry into the meeting, on the ground that they were late by 10 minutes.
_	In "Regan v. Wald" (1984), for example, the Supreme Court cited "Curtiss-Wright" in upholding the constitutionality of the president's regulations restricting travel to Cuba, expressly on the ground that they had been authorized by Congress.
_	He refused to degrade Ridley, probably on the ground that Ridley's consecration in 1547 had been according to the invalid form which was established by law very soon after that date.
_	(Fathers could still sue as well, on the ground that they had a moral interest in their daughters' chastity).
_	The tee markers are the pieces stuck in the ground that mark the line from which to tee-off or strike the golf ball.
_	O’Neill refused on the ground that it is up to parliament to form the government and not forces outside the chamber.
_	In "What Numbers Could Not Be", Benacerraf argues against a Platonist view of mathematics, and for structuralism, on the ground that what is important about numbers is the abstract structures they represent rather than the objects that number words ostensibly refer to.
_	On its review of "Rope", "Rolling Stone" said the single "rides lower to the ground that the usual Foos anthem, especially during the gnarled-guitar fire-fight at the end, without undercutting the modern-rock heroism that's become one of the few reliable guitar-based brands on contemporary radio." "Billboard" described the song as having "a meaty guitar lick that sounds ripe for "Rock Band", a rip-roaring extended instrumental solo and a few choice "Yow!"s from frontman Dave Grohl", praising the "raw, hard-hitting focus" and concluding that "'Rope' makes the listener feel like it's 1995 all over again."
_	He challenged the legislation on the ground that the payments, said to be a tax bonus, were actually a gift and were not supported by the taxation power in the Constitution.
_	In January 1972, Bukovsky was convicted of spreading anti-Soviet propaganda under Article 70 of the RSFSR Criminal Code, mainly on the ground that he had, with anti-Soviet intention, circulated false reports that mentally healthy political dissenters were incarcerated in mental hospitals and were subjected to abuse there.
_	But if, under all the circumstances of a particular case, an officer has probable cause to believe that the delay involved in procuring an arrest warrant will gravely endanger the officer or other persons or will result in the suspect's escape, I perceive no reason to disregard those exigencies on the ground that the offense for which the suspect is sought is a "minor" one.
_	As he further tries to use sociology to understand the world, he reviews the work of Argentinean sociologist Eliseo Verón who describes shifts in sociology indicating sociology was retreating from the ground that Marx had claimed in "The German Ideology".
_	The dissolution meant that Fitzharris was tried before the king's bench in Easter term, and entered a plea against the jurisdiction of the court on the ground that proceedings were pending against him before the Lords.
_	The Jacobin Club refused to admit Babeuf and Lebois, on the ground that they were "throat-cutters" (""égorgeurs"").
_	Justice Roberts (joined by the Chief Justice) dissented on the ground that state law recognized a property interest in having a head of water undisturbed.
_	This was ordered upon the ground that names of places chronicle scenes, sights, actions, wisdom, folly, and fate, and are the people's heritage.
_	The case was dismissed, whereupon Premanand put in an appeal on the ground that spiritual power is not a defence recognised in law, which was also unsuccessful.
_	The deaths of more than 50 Liverpool football supporters at Hillsborough in 1989 was undeniably a greater tragedy than the single death, however horrible, of Mr Bigley; but that is no excuse for Liverpool's failure to acknowledge, even to this day, the part played in the disaster by drunken fans at the back of the crowd who mindlessly tried to fight their way into the ground that Saturday afternoon.
_	There Rhodon, another tutor like Theodorus, persuaded him to go back, on the ground that [Octavian] Caesar invited him to take the kingdom.
_	In re Petition for Naturalization of Horst Nemetz was a 1981 naturalization case decided by the United States Court of Appeals for the Fourth Circuit, involving whether a petitioner for naturalization, who admitted to committing sodomy—at that time illegal in Virginia, his state of residence—could be denied naturalization on the ground that he was not of good moral character, when the same activity was not prohibited in other U.S. states.
_	The building starts with a rectangular shape on the ground that eventually becomes a square point in the crown.
_	Though the trial court rejected the prosecution theory that the guns had been seized during a search incident to a lawful arrest, the court denied the motion to suppress and admitted the weapons into evidence on the ground that the officer had cause to believe that Terry and Chilton were acting suspiciously, that their interrogation was warranted, and that the officer for his own protection had the right to pat down their outer clothing having reasonable cause to believe that they might be armed.
_	They also, along with the state of Queensland, challenged the validity of the Act providing for territory representation on the ground that the Constitution did not allow the Parliament to provide for full representation of the territories in the Senate.
_	They sought declaratory and injunctive relief against the exercises on the ground that they violated NEPA and other environmental laws.
_	The fund works by granting money via these three organizations, and other NGOs, to programs and projects on the ground that support the attempts of indigenous rainforest peoples to assert and defend their rights, to define and promote sustainable development in their communities, and to challenge the activities and practices of governments or other entities which damage their environment and lands.
_	Stewart dissented in "Griswold v. Connecticut" (1965) on the ground that, while the Connecticut statute barring the use of contraceptives seemed to him an "uncommonly silly law", he could not find a general "Right of Privacy" in the Fourteenth Amendment Due Process Clause.
_	The use of Visqueen underneath a basement is to prevent water infiltration from water present in the ground that would pass through the concrete or dirt floor and bring in unwanted dampness.
_	Alexandre Auguste Ledru-Rollin and Agénor de Gasparin, notably, opposed the new Mackau laws on the ground that further legislation, adding to a pile of laws that were not effectively implemented, were useless.
_	Oderberg compares legalised abortion to contract killing, arguing that the state has no more right to legalise and regulate abortion on the ground that this would take it out of the 'back street,' than it does to legalise and regulate contract killing on the same ground.
_	The Model Business Corporation Act of the United States states that: "The validity of corporate action may not be challenged on the ground that the corporation lacks or lacked power to act."
_	Though an orthodox Calvinist, Alting laid little stress on the sterner side of his creed and, when at Dort he opposed the Remonstrants, he did so mainly on the ground that they were "innovators."
_	However, on April 20, 2010, the Supreme Court of the United States, in an 8-1 ruling written by Chief Justice John Roberts, overturned Gallegly's law on the ground that the law violated the First Amendment right to freedom of speech, and created a "criminal prohibition of alarming breadth."
_	Lopez moved to dismiss the indictment on the ground that §922(q) of the Act was "unconstitutional as it is beyond the power of Congress to legislate control over our public schools."
_	This judgment was reversed on appeal on the ground that the RICO claim was barred by the federal statute of limitations.
_	On 3 April 2003, the Netherlands Minister of Foreign Affairs adopted the Sanctieregeling terrorisme 2003 (terrorism sanctions order), freezing all the funds and financial assets of Stichting Al-Aqsa, a foundation under Netherlands law describing itself as an Islamic social aid institution financially supporting various organisations in Israel, the West Bank and the Gaza Strip involved in humanitarian emergencies, on the ground that transfers of funds by Al-Aqsa were destined for organisations supporting terrorism in the Middle East, including Hamas.
_	Judge Foster was made Q.C. in 1886, and in the following January he again took office as Attorney-General under Sir Henry Parkes, but resigned in February 1888, on the ground that his prior claim to the vacant Puisne Judgship had been slighted.
_	As the servant of a member of parliament, he claimed immunity from arrest, and the House of Commons ordered his discharge, at the same time directing the serjeant-at-arms to rearrest him, on the ground that he was fraudulently seeking to avoid the payment of a just debt A bill was introduced, but was soon dropped, providing that Hall should pay up, and be disabled for ever from sitting in parliament.
_	When Tevez was instrumental in West Ham's avoiding relegation at the end of the 2006-7 season the position was legally challenged by the relegated club, Sheffield United, on the ground that Tevez should have been ineligible to play.
_	The then Commissioner of Bilaspur objected to it on the ground that as per the Flag Code of India, a private citizen was not permitted to fly the Indian flag except on certain days.
_	Walter Strickland and Oliver St John went to The Hague to talk about the removal of the royalist exiles who had sought asylum in the Netherlands (among whom was the pretender Charles Stuart) from the Republic, but more importantly about a political union between the two states, on the ground that they were similar in respect of politics, religion, and commerce.
_	Two cavalry divisions were attached to the Fourth and Fifth armies for the advance, with aircraft for reconnaissance of the ground that the cavalry was to traverse and to help the cavalry maintain touch with the rear.
_	In that episode he was defending a column of soviet troops on the ground that came under US planes' attack.
_	Many fans denounced Gateworld's cancellation announcement, both the timing of it (apparently it had been made while the cast and crew were celebrating the episode's airing)—and the decision itself, on the ground that, while ratings were not as high as they had been in previous seasons, the series was still drawing an audience of a respectable size.
_	In December 2011, Sydney played a (2–0 winning) match at Kogarah Oval against Brisbane Roar, as the SFS was unavailable due to concerts being held at the ground that weekend.
_	Leith offered to appoint Jones, but Jones declined, although the high rate of pay was tempting, on the ground that his youth and want of rank would deprive his advice of its proper weight, and he asked instead to join the army.
_	During the 1983 season, Martin was involved in one of the most controversial regular season games, known as the Pine Tar Incident, when Martin challenged a home run by George Brett on the ground that the amount of pine tar on the bat broke the rules.
_	The case was carried to the Privy Council, and in May 1892 the Judicial Committee gave a decision adverse to the legality of the appointment, on the ground that Parliament had not previously been asked to provide Judge Edwards's salary.
_	Ouster clauses prevent courts from carrying out this function, but may be justified on the ground that they preserve the powers of the executive and promote the finality of its acts and decisions.
_	II, without changing Catholic teaching, appealed for a consensus to end the death penalty on the ground that it was "both cruel and unnecessary."
_	Sparrow admitted to all the facts in the charge but justified it on the ground that he was exercising his Aboriginal right to fish under section 35(1) of the Constitution Act, 1982.
_	(MacKinnon, 11) Allman had control over the paper until December 1941 when it was seized by the Japanese on the ground that it was an American company.
_	Abu ʿUbaidah placed him highest of the three on the ground that among his poems there were ten flawless qasidas, and ten more nearly so, and that this could not be said of the other two.
_	Removal of jury trial was opposed on the ground that mere expediency (in cases of fraud) should never justify its removal, and that judge-alone acquittals of major City figures might cause "grave public disquiet".
_	Thus, it is often found as "krummholz", trees growing close to the ground that have been dwarfed by exposure.
_	He brought an action before the referring Court, requested that this notification be declared null and void on the ground that it was in breach of his fundamental rights and, more particularly, his right not to be discriminated against on the ground of age, since the measure was based solely on the fact that he had reached the age of 65.
_	In this position he did such good work that he was offered a knighthood, which he declined on the ground that he could not afford it.
_	The red-trimmed, silver jet dug a crater deep and wide in the ground that soon began to fill with rainwater.
_	It is objectionable on both philosophical and linguistic grounds: the former on account of its arbitrariness, and the latter on the ground that it is simply not how we use natural language.
_	For the second time in Spain, in April 1616 Hasekura met again with the King, who declined to sign a trade agreement, on the ground that the Japanese Embassy did not appear to be an official embassy from the ruler of Japan Tokugawa Ieyasu, who, on the contrary, had promulgated an edict in January 1614 ordering the expulsion of all missionaries from Japan, and started the persecution of the Christian faith in Japan.
_	Chetrien had criminal capacity, but he was acquitted on the ground that there was reasonable doubt as to whether he possessed the requisite intention to commit the crimes wherewith he was charged.
_	It included a description of the Chedrang fault, with uplift up to 35 feet and reported accelerations of the ground that had exceeded the Earth's gravitational acceleration.
_	But in the absence of witnesses the assailant can, upon his own confession, be ordered to pay for loss of work and cost of cure—which elements are in the nature of a debt—and for the disgrace suffered, on the ground that by his own confession he publishes the humiliation of his victim (Maimonides, "Yad," Ḥobel u-Mazziḳ, v. 6, 7).
_	Almost a year after the jury returned that verdict, however, District Judge Michael J. Davis set the verdict aside, and ordered a new trial, on the ground that his instruction to the jurors—that they did not need to find that any files were actually distributed in order to find a violation of plaintiffs' distribution right—was a "manifest error of law".
_	The Magistrates acquitted him on the ground that, although there was undoubtedly an assault, it had not caused actual bodily harm, since there was no bruising or bleeding, and no evidence of any psychological or psychiatric harm.
_	Free World Trust sued Électro Santé for patent infringement on the ground that although the means may be different the end result of the inventions were the same.
_	During World War II he collaborated with both Italy and Germany by making propagandistic radio broadcasts and by helping the Nazis recruit Bosnian Muslims for the Waffen-SS (on the ground that they shared four principles: family, order, the leader and faith).
_	It is sought in argument on behalf of the appellants to distinguish their case—at least the case of the two infant children of Samuel D. Morgan—from any case within the statute of nonclaim on the ground that at the death of their father, his title to the real estate, which constituted the plantation, descended to them as his heirs at law, and thereafter, as to the operations conducted by John Morgan in 1864 and 1865, having no guardian, the latter was in equity their representative and guardian de son tort and trustee, so that upon his death and until they arrived at age, there was no one competent to make a demand against his administrator, within the terms of the statute.
_	His sentence was later commuted to a fine, upon the ground that the offence only amounted to manslaughter.
_	Lord Hoffmann and Lord Nicholls dissented on the ground that as the "Mirror" was allowed to publish the fact that she was a drug addict and that she was receiving treatment for her addiction that printing the pictures of her leaving her NA meeting was within the margin of appreciation of the editors as they were allowed to state that she was an addict and receiving treatment for her addiction.
_	Waddy later recalled that his aircraft was so near to the ground that he could see the upturned faces of the German gun crews.
_	Rejected by the Censorship Board on the ground that "there is no sectarianism in Egypt," Salama started working on what would become his second creation, the AIDS-themed Asmaa, which earned him international attention.
_	He appealed, in part on the ground that the District Court had violated his freedom of religion, and the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit reversed his conviction.
_	Tice filed a petition for habeas corpus with a United States District Court, and on September 14, 2009, U.S. District Judge Richard L. Williams vacated Tice's murder and rape convictions, on the ground that Tice had been denied his constitutional right to effective counsel.
_	In "Lochner v. New York", conservative justices of the United States Supreme Court could find inspiration in Spencer's writings for striking down a New York law limiting the number of hours a baker could work during the week, on the ground that this law restricted liberty of contract.
_	It was excluded on the ground that it was outside the scope of the liability which the parties would reasonably have considered that the valuer was undertaking.
_	In the Bulgarian presidential election, July–August 1990, he attempted to become a presidential candidate, but Bulgarian Socialist Party BSP did not accept the nomination on the ground that he was ultimately anti-communist.
_	The Germans then put in another attack, which was once again turned back, before the 11th launched a limited counterattack and regained the ground that had been lost.
_	He was dismissed as Serjeant in 1692, apparently on the ground that there was no work for him to do.
_	They oppose free trade on the ground that it benefits other countries (especially China) at the expense of American workers.
_	In some cases, it is of interest to look at an area on the ground that includes many objects.
_	Both of them worship Sulley and the ground that he walks upon.
_	His uncle, Edward Brerewood, gave him contrary advice, taking the ground that the fourth commandment was laid only upon masters.
_	During this phase of the war the 58th Battalion was not committed to any major attacks, but it did play a defensive role at the end of the Second Battle of Bullecourt in May, holding the ground that the Australians had gained earlier.
_	Although it agreed it must add KSQA to its lineup, the cable provider had chosen to deny the station's channel placement request after the parties could not reach agreement on the ground that KSQA broadcast its PSIP channel on channel 22, and therefore was not entitled to be placed on cable channel 12; Cox also informed KSQA, LLC that it preferred not to move WIBW-TV off its existing channel slot to replace it with KSQA, with corporate attorneys overseeing the dispute stating that the station's owners ignored must-carry channel placement regulations and rulings that came about after the digital television transition.
_	He also noted that the Supreme Court of the United States had reserved the general issue of subfacial challenge to veracity in Rendorf v. United States, 376 U. S. 528, 376 U. S. 531-532 (1964), when it disposed of that case on the ground that, even if a veracity challenge were permitted, the alleged factual inaccuracies in that case's affidavit "were of only peripheral relevancy to the showing of probable cause, and, not being within the personal knowledge of the affiant, did not go to the integrity of the affidavit."
_	The prosecution took the ground that the prints were harmful to public morals and brought the prayer-book and even religion itself into contempt.
_	The initial attempt to hire a lawyer was difficult, as they were often denied on the ground that it was impossible to "win [a case] against the government".
_	After the lower court issued summons, Chaturvedi approached Shimla High Court for quashing of proceedings on the ground that the information of pending cases was sent by him as part of his duty as Chief Vigilance Officer (CVO) of AIIMS and hence, as per provisions of Section 197 of CrPC Court could not have issued summons without sanction of prosecution from Central Government.
_	In "United States v. Borelli", an accomplice had testified for the prosecution at the trial of the defendant, it was held that the refusal to permit the production of a letter written by the accomplice to the government, in which he offered his assistance to the government in return for special consideration for himself, was error where such refusal was based on the ground that the letter did not "relate" to the subject matter to which the accomplice had testified.
_	The French government proclaimed the necessity of this move on the ground that Articles 42 to 44 of the Treaty of Versailles had been broken by the Germans.
_	However, the Government sought to recover the money the following week on the ground that Kids Company had breached the terms of the grant; specifically, that some of the grant had been used to pay staff salaries.
_	The City of Chicago moved to dismiss the complaint on the ground that it could not be held liable under the Civil Rights Acts for acts committed in performance of its governmental functions.
_	Bell appealed his conviction, principally on the ground that he had been improperly tried as an adult.
_	The Act was found invalid, however, on the ground that since the Supreme Court of New South Wales had been invested with federal jurisdiction, it must not be required to perform a function "incompatible" with the exercise of the judicial power of the Commonwealth.
_	"There are differences of opinion between the parties to the Armistice Agreement on the meaning of various provisions of article V, including those which relate to the Chairman's powers, but neither party requested an interpretation by the MAC in the manner established by Article VII of the agreement, and the Chairman has had to rely on his own interpretation, knowing that in many cases it would probably be found unacceptable by one party or by both and that the requests of the Chairman of the ISMAC were likely to be met with refusal on the ground that the Chairman of the ISMAC was exceeding his powers or acting in some other manner contrary to the provisions of the Armistice Agreement."
_	However, the impartiality of the judiciary cannot necessarily be impugned on the ground that the courts have to enforce laws or rules of evidence and procedure that are felt to be unjust, because even the most independent judiciary must comply with laws enacted by the legislature.
_	In the programme, he performed his compositions in several beautiful spots in South Africa, playing a piano set on the ground that resonated deeply with the natural surroundings.
_	Applying Connecticut law, the Second Circuit Federal Court of Appeals held in "Joy v North" that the court could substitute its judgment for the decisions of a supposedly independent committee, and the board, on the ground that there was scope for conflicting interests.
_	When, however, he found that the generals insisted on executing rebels taken in arms, he resigned (September 6) on the ground that he was opposed to capital punishment.
_	and on 28 January 2015 the government of Sri Lanka, had removed all obstacles for Bandaranayake to hold her position as the 43rd Chief Justice by the President Maithripala Sirisena, on the ground that her 2013 impeachment was unlawful and as such the appointment of Mohan Peiris, her successor, was void Ab initio.
_	From the helicopters, they spotted a white car covered by shrubbery and a hole in the ground that appeared to be a hiding place.
_	A shareholder of the Edison Electric Illuminating Company brought a derivative action to restrain the company from making payments and deductions required by the Social Security Act 1935 on the ground that it was unconstitutional.
_	For this Nobilior was strongly opposed by Cato the Censor, on the ground that he had compromised his dignity as a Roman general.
_	Antonio Cassese, the first president of the International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia, criticized the ICJ judgement on the ground that "The International Court has set an unrealistically high standard of proof for finding Serbia complicit in genocide."
_	This presumption has been criticised on the ground that it is essentially sexist, or at least "belonging to the propertied classes of a different social era."
_	This is an ancient technique that originates in Yemen, whereby meat is barbecued in a deep hole in the ground that is covered while the meat cooks.
_	After a few introductory lines, Udayana enumerates five principal arguments which are said to invalidate the existence of Isvara: "With regard to this there are five erroneous opinions (which assert that there exists no Isvara) on the ground that:
_	However, the executive committee of the New England A.A.U. subsequently disallowed the record on the ground that "the shot was not a solid leaden ball" and that "the takeoff was not regulation."
_	The bloc was denied registration on the ground that neither of the two parties had submitted proper registration.
_	The Bombay High Court had given a judgment against the election of Dr. R Y Prabhoo (Shiv Sena) declaring his election void on the ground that he had been found guilty of corrupt practices under Subsections (3) and (3A) of Section 123 of the Representation of People Act (India) 1951.
_	He opposed the Triennial Bill of 1692, but in 1696, spoke against the bill of association and test, which was voted for the king's protection, on the ground that though William was to be obeyed as sovereign he could not be acknowledged rightful and lawful king.
_	The companies applied for review on the ground that all employees signed separate contracts with the companies, which were different ‘employers’, under the Act.
_	In treating of the chances, mischances, fortunes, and misfortunes of "The Other Girls", Whitney strikes directly across the much-mooted "woman question" of that day, and here she takes her stand firmly on the ground that family life and the creation of home and its influences is the first duty and the greatest glory of woman.
_	On clay courts the ball leaves an impression in the ground that can be checked; on grass courts a puff of chalk from the line indicates contact from the ball.
_	Mr Tullio Ratti claimed that he should not have to comply with a stricter Italian law that required him to label his solvents, on the ground that it conflicted with two Directives.
_	In June 2016, the United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit overturned the settlement on the ground that class counsel could not adequately represent merchants who has a significant interest in the monetary relief provided by the settlement and merchants who could only benefit from the prospective injunctive relief.
_	The validity of all the above four amendments was challenged in the Supreme Court through various petitions clubbed together in "M. Nagaraj & Others vs. Union of India & Others", mainly on the ground that these altered the Basic Structure of the Constitution.
_	Tisza stoutly stood by his rules, on the ground that this was a case in which the form must be sacrificed to the substance of parliamentary government.
_	Ford appealed this jury selection plan twice to the Sixth U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals on the ground that it violated his constitutional right to a jury of his peers; the appeals were denied twice.
_	Whether defaults are extremely low has been questioned on the ground that a field partner may pay Kiva for loans defaulted to the field partner in order to maintain the field partner's good credit with Kiva.
_	Thereupon he commenced to make excuses, on the ground that if he left his daughter, Indira Kunwar, behind him, she would either poison herself or her name and fame would be assailed.
_	Section 5(1)(a) of the "Administrative Decisions (Judicial Review) Act" provided that administrative decisions may be appealed on the ground that there had been a breach of the requirements of natural justice.
_	But unlike Tycho's geoheliocentric system in which the Earth does not rotate and the Martian and Solar orbits intersect, in that of Ursus and his follower Roslin the Earth had a daily rotation and also the Martian and Solar orbits do not intersect, thus avoiding the Tychonic conclusion in respect of the Martian orbit that there are no solid celestial spheres on the ground that they cannot possibly interpenetrate.
_	On 5 June 2001, Dela Cruz sued and asked for damages, claiming that after recording one album BMG never gave her any proposal for a second one and that despite the lapse of the option period, the firm refused to release her on the ground that she still had to record one album.
_	A 2008 computer analysis of the Book of Mormon text supports this theory, although the study does not include Joseph Smith in the author sample on the ground that few pure examples of Smith's writings are extant.
_	Lord Howth, summoned before the Irish Council, refused to produce any evidence of the alleged treason, on the ground that since Moore was himself a Privy Councillor that body was clearly guilty of bias, while his bizarre claim that he had seen Moore trying to raise the Devil did nothing to enhance his credibility.
_	Banerjee rejected the request on the ground that the law will take its own course.
_	Muhammad Zaman Mirza, the fugitive Mughal prince made his claim on the ground that Bahadur's mother adopted him as her son.
_	Shrubsole declined further promotion in the dockyard, on the ground that it might interfere with his preaching engagements.
_	The head of the Pattani Dutch trading post, Victor Sprinckel, refused on the ground that he was too busy dealing with Portuguese opposition in Southeast Asia.
_	Similarly, BIB criticizes "Business is Game" thinking on the ground that hypothetical or generic moves are irrelevant or trivial, stable solutions are not a substitute for specific, real life practical and innovative strategies for management, and computer/mathematical simulations do not approach the complexity of competitive dynamics in real markets.
_	The earliest reference given was to , who in 1598 in "Les Trésors et richesses pour mettre l'Estat en Splendeur" ("The Treasures and riches to put the State in Splendor") "denounced the objectors to the use of French silks on the ground that all purchasers of French luxury goods created a livelihood for the poor, whereas the miser caused them to die in distress," an early form of the paradox of thrift.
_	There was some suspicion on the ground that the Agena's attitude control system was acting up and might not have the correct program stored in it.
_	The hole in the ground that was filled to form a water body was formerly part of quarries used during public works in the city of Richmond during the World War II home front.
_	Two further lots were later added to the original portion of Greenhill, including the ground that became known as Burghmuirhead, and sold to separate owners, one of whom was William Rig.
_	The authenticity of Philo's description of a cardan suspension has been doubted by some authors on the ground that the part of Philo's "Pneumatica" which describes the use of the gimbal survived only in an Arabic translation of the early 9th century.
_	Before Rainey answered, the court sustained a defense objection on the ground that the question asked for Rainey's opinion.
_	To bring about the downfall of the Earl of Danby (afterwards Duke of Leeds) and the disbanding of the army, which he believe to be intended for the suppression of the national liberties, Holles at this time (1677–1679) engaged, as did many others, in dangerous intrigue with Honoré Courtin and Paul Barillon, the French envoys, and Louis XIV; he refused, however, the latter's presents on the ground that he was a member of the council, having been appointed to Sir William Temple's new modelled cabinet in 1679.
_	Lynch was opposed to the Treaty, on the ground that it disestablished the Irish Republic proclaimed in 1916 in favour of Dominion status for Ireland within the British Empire.
_	In 2010, this suit was dismissed in federal district court on the ground that the claims were too similar to that of Johnson's earlier wrongful-death suit.
_	The TUEL led a strike of woolen industry workers in Passaic, New Jersey in 1926 — until, that is, the Comintern instructed the Party later that year to abandon any independent unions it had formed on the ground that these represented ultra-left adventurism.
_	Khalid's removal created a strong wrath among the people on the ground that Khalid, a national hero was mistreated by the Caliph and it was unjust to remove him from the army for a claim that was virtually never proved against him.
_	In 1996, Schlup was granted a writ of habeas corpus on the ground that his original trial attorney failed to adequately represent him.
_	How rejected this submission on the ground that there was no reason to deviate from the plain meaning of the words in the Act.
_	Other released papers showed that Chamberlain had considered seeking a grand coalition amongst European governments like that later advocated by Churchill, but had rejected it on the ground that the division of Europe into two camps would make war more, not less likely.
_	He declined to claim his brother's estates, on the ground that it would involve the "acknowledging an uncovenanted sovereign of these covenanted nations".
_	According to him, "though the region has been handed over to the security forces on the ground that there is a serious law and order problem created by the militants, the lawlessness of the security forces is adding fuel to the fire rather than quelling it".
_	Some occasional readers of detective stories are wont to criticize Mrs Christie on the ground that her stories are insufficiently embroidered, that she includes, for instance, no epigrams over the college port.
_	In District Court, the six defendants successfully "moved to dismiss the indictment on the ground that it did not charge an offense under the laws of the United States," according to the case.
_	H. H. Almond, a master at both Loretto and Merchiston, and a founding father of the game in Scotland, describing an incident in a Loretto versus Merchiston match, wrote: '…but so little did any of us, masters or boys, then know about it, that I remember how, when Lyall ran with the ball behind the Merchiston goal the resulting try was appealed against on the ground that no player may cross the line whilst holding the ball.
_	The removal of Arabic script was defended on the ground that it was not appropriate for the authentic Turkish phonology, which needs a new set of symbols to be correctly represented.
_	The highest ground resolution that can be obtained from the current AVHRR instruments is , which means that the satellite records discrete information for areas on the ground that are 1.1 × 1.1 kilometers.
_	On June 4, 2018, the Supreme Court granted review and vacated the judgment on the ground that the claim for injunctive relief granted by the lower court had become moot when the girl followed through with the abortion.
_	The following year a warrant for his arrest on the charge of murder was issued, but was later withdrawn, apparently on the ground that he was not a principal actor in the murder.
_	Romero knocked Rockhold down with a heavy overhand followed up with a punch on the ground that rendered Rockhold unconscious.
_	Maxwell wrote in his review of Kornbluh's book, "This demarche was apparently not delivered: the U.S. embassy in Santiago demurred on the ground that to deliver such a strong rebuke would upset the dictator," and that on September 20, 1976, the day before Letelier and his assistant Ronni Moffitt were killed, "the State Department instructed the ambassadors 'to take no further action' with regard to the Condor scheme."
_	Williams subsequently challenged Bowers' election on the ground that the votes for "Isaac Williams" were intended for himself.
_	The New Democratic Party and some recent Liberal leadership candidates have expressed opposition to Canada's expanded role in the Afghan conflict on the ground that it is inconsistent with Canada's historic role (since the Second World War) of peacekeeping operations.
_	Second, it means that member state and EU legislation, like Directives, may be challenged on the ground that they fail to comply with the general principle of equal treatment.
_	Later that year, when Emperor Xianzong was intending to award the military governor ("Jiedushi") Wang E (王鍔) an honorary chancellor title, Quan and fellow chancellor Li Fan earnestly opposed on the ground that Wang had no great accomplishments that warranted the title, and Emperor Xianzong ultimately did not give Wang such title.
_	But surely our Federation will not thereafter be open to objection on the ground that it is an exclusive organisation.
_	Kleene points out that, "the logicistic thesis can be questioned finally on the ground that logic already presupposes mathematical ideas in its formulation.
_	After the French defeat in the Franco-Prussian War of 1870–71, almost all of the Moselle department, along with Alsace and portions of the Meurthe and Vosges departments, was ceded to the German Empire by the Treaty of Frankfurt on the ground that the population in those areas spoke German dialects.
_	After the battle, the dead were so thick on the ground that one Australian, Captain Harold Jacobs of the 1st Battalion, remarked "[t]he trench is so full of our dead that the only respect that we could show them was not to tread on their faces, the floor of the trench was just one carpet of them, this in addition to the ones we piled into Turkish dugouts."
_	The 0.46 meters resolution of WorldView-2's panchromatic images allows the satellite to distinguish between objects on the ground that are at least 46 cm apart.
_	Most species are nocturnal and spend the day hidden in cracks, under bark, inside curling leaves, under stones or fallen logs, in leaf litter, or in the cracks in the ground that develop in dry weather.
_	During World War II the authorities considered closing Hermannsburg on the ground that its German staff constituted a security risk.
_	Lyerla appealed on the ground that it is a logical impossibility to attempt second degree murder, since attempt requires specific intent and recklessness implies lack of such intent.
_	This was effectively a large-bore mortar, dug into the ground that used the gas cylinders themselves as projectiles - firing a 14 kg cylinder up to 1500 m.
_	The cases on which the court of appeals and the defendants relied, such as "Appalachian Coals", were all dismissed on the ground that no intent to fix prices was involved in those cases while in the case at bar the "direct purpose and aim [was] the raising and maintenance of spot market prices and of prices to jobbers and consumers in the Mid-Western area."
_	Because an overly broad law may deter constitutionally protected speech, the overbreadth doctrine allows a party to whom the law may constitutionally be applied to challenge the statute on the ground that it violates the First Amendment rights of others.
_	Some critics object to open marriages on the ground that open marriages violate religious principles.
_	The Government of the Kingdom of the Netherlands objects to this reservation on the ground that it creates uncertainty as to the extent of the obligations the Government of the United States of America is prepared to assume with regard to the Convention.
_	Moreover, any failure by the United States of America to act upon the obligations contained in the Convention on the ground that such action would be prohibited by the constitution of the United States would be contrary to the generally accepted rule of international law, as laid down in article 27 of the Vienna Convention on the law of treaties (Vienna, 23 May 1969)
_	This led the Government seek to establish the invalidity of the patents, but "the trial court held that the government was estopped to attack the validity of the patents in the present proceeding, on the ground that such attack would constitute a review of action by the Commissioner of Patents which was not authorized by statute."
_	The only side of the ground that has not been redeveloped or are there any plans to do so is the Western Terrace due to there being a public right of way and housing behind it.
_	Roxio filed a motion to dismiss the case on the ground that the patent claim by Gracenote was invalid due to prior art.
_	Hastert is challenging the System's decision to terminate his pension (which amounted to about $16,000 a year) on the ground that the specific federal crimes of which he was convicted were not directly related to his time as a teacher.
_	The defendant may invoke the removal jurisdiction of a federal court to take a claim out of the state court, request for a change of venue because the case was brought in the improper court within the jurisdiction, and move for "forum non conveniens" on the ground that the case was brought in an inappropriate forum based on the locations of the parties or evidence.
_	The Returning Officer on the ground that nearly all the 87 were bribed declared Mr. Purling elected, but Mr. Rumbold was seated on petition.
_	The mash should be too crumbly and too thinly scattered to leave any lumps on the ground that domestic animals or desirable wild animals might otherwise pick up.
_	Curtis and Corrigan "moved to dismiss the bill on the ground that the covenant deprived the negro of property without due process of law, abridged the privileges and immunities of citizens of the United States, and denied him the equal protection of the law."
_	After prolonged negotiations, the tribunal decided to give blood money to the victims, and released Umar's son Ubaidullah on the ground that after the tragic incident of Umar's assassination people would be further infuriated by the execution of his son the very next day.
_	Part of the criticism of "Webb v Outtrim" by the majority was by reference to the statement that "The American Union, on the other hand, has erected a tribunal which possesses jurisdiction to annul a Statute upon the ground that it is unconstitutional"
_	When the case was tried, he objected to the introduction of any testimony, upon the ground that the information did not charge any offense against the laws of Oklahoma.
_	For the first time ever, the Court overturned a conviction in a capital case on the ground that the verdict was "unreasonable...having regard to the evidence".
_	Act for involvement in criminal activities on the ground that the detention was in the interests of public safety, peace and good order.
_	They argue that the document signed by the President would not have the force of law, on the ground that the enacting process bypassed the Bicameral Clause of the U.S. Constitution.
_	Some of the branches on the base bend down and grow into the ground that then can form oblong tubers, which are the fleshy underground stems.
_	The marriage was annulled in August 1928 on the ground that Mayo had another wife.
_	On the day of execution no order for a mitigation of the sentence had been received, but when the Indian was about to be hanged, Jack Powers moved a stay of proceedings on the ground that the commutation of the sentence was probably on the steamer which was then overdue.
_	The House of Lords declared that he was not a peer and therefore not so entitled, but the Court of King's Bench released him from his imprisonment on the ground that he was the Earl of Banbury and not Charles Knollys, a commoner.
_	In 1920, the Jewish members of the first High Commissioner's advisory council objected to the Hebrew transliteration of the word “Palestine” פלשתינה ("Palestina") on the ground that the traditional name was ארץ ישראל ("Eretz Yisrael"), but the Arab members would not agree to this designation, which in their view, had political significance.
_	Government authorities also initiated criminal investigations against these protests based on the ground that they were held without prior government approval.
_	[3] The investigation was terminated without any action against him, but the DC Bar found that Sofaer should be “informally admonished” for taking on the representation, on the ground that the US government investigation of the bombing was a “matter” under the Code of Ethics, like a litigation or appeal, and even though Libya was not even a suspect at the time Sofaer left the Department.
_	And beneath the ground that the tavern overlooks is a massive pit that houses the show animatronic Maleficent the Dragon, and the large Pinocchio characters seen in the show.
_	to be true, assume the ground that the true western boundary of Texas is the Nueces, instead of the Rio Grande; and that, therefore, in marching our army to the east bank of the latter river, we passed the Texan line, and invaded the territory of Mexico.’
_	Then on September 10, 2013, the Supreme Court's Criminal Division for Person Holding Political Position ruled that Mr.Apirak is found not guilty, on the ground that Mr.Apirak had followed all the procedure stated in the contract which came into force before he came into the office.
_	Before 1778, he was challenged to a duel by Barney Coyle, a whisky distiller and member of the catholic board, on the ground that he had publicly said that 'a papist could swallow a false oath as easily as a poached egg.
_	Some authors such as Robert Rosen criticize biophysics on the ground that the biophysical method does not take into account the specificity of biological phenomena
_	Under Irrigation ministry, TRS government redesigned the project Pranahitha-chevella project on the ground that the original plan had too many environmental obstacles and had very low water storage provision — only about 16.5 tmc ft.
_	He filed a motion to "dismiss the indictment on the ground that SORNA did not require him to update his registration in Kansas"; however his motion was denied and "Nichols conditionally pleaded guilty, reserving his right to appeal the denial of his motion."
_	She puts it specifically on the ground that they were promised, or promised themselves, the conquest of the whole world; and they have not got it.
_	Mr Stein once again obtained legal aid in relation to those claims, and Mr Blake brought this action to have the proceedings dismissed on the ground that the effect of the statutory set-off under section 323 meant that the claims could not validly be assigned.
_	No law and no provision of any law made after the commencement of this Act by the Parliament of a Dominion shall be void or inoperative on the ground that it is repugnant to the Law of England, or to the provisions of any existing or future Act of Parliament of the United Kingdom, or to any order, rule or regulation made under any such Act, and the powers of the Parliament of a Dominion shall include the power to repeal or amend any such Act, order, rule or regulation in so far as the same is part of the law of the Dominion.
_	Where the employer has failed to keep accurate or adequate records, Justice Murphy argued, the law does not deny recovery on the ground that the employee is unable to prove the precise extent of uncompensated work.
_	On five days a year at different times, the shadow caster is designed to create a circle of light around plaques placed in the ground that mark important events in Florida’s history.
_	In Japan, typefaces have been held not to be covered by copyright, on the ground that they function primarily as a means of communicating information, rather than an appeal to aesthetic appreciation.
_	The request again was denied on the ground that the purpose of the trip did not meet the previously prescribed standards for such travel.
_	We instruct the patient to put himself into a state of quiet, unreflecting self-observation, and to report to us whatever internal observations he is able to make" - taking care not to "exclude any of them, whether on the ground that it is too "disagreeable" or too "indiscreet" to say, or that it is too "unimportant" or "irrelevant", or that it is "nonsensical" and need not be said".
_	The large bird is so close to the ground that he settles down easily, accompanied by a shower of feathers from the small birds.
_	When, 3 months and 2 days after arrival, she lodged an unfair dismissal claim, the employer argued it was time barred on the ground that in ordinary contract law one is bound by a notice when a reasonable person would have read a message.
_	The resistance took the form of protests to county officials, called "valsschelden van vonnissen", or "faussement de jugement" (appeal to falsity of the verdict), on the ground that the judges had been corrupt, the law had been misinterpreted, or there had been mistakes in the procedure.
_	Word did not reach Washington until May 9, and Polk immediately convened the Cabinet and obtained their approval of his plan to send a war message to Congress on the ground that Mexico had, as Polk put it in his message, "shed American blood on the American soil".
_	A footnote in the U.S. Supreme Court case "Torcaso v. Watkins" referenced "Fellowship of Humanity v. County of Alameda," a 1957 case in which the organization sought a tax exemption on the ground that they used their property "solely and exclusively for religious worship."
_	In Southernport Developments (Pty) Ltd (Previously Known as Tsogo Sun Ebhayi (Pty) Ltd) v Transnet Ltd, an important case in the South African law of lease, Transnet excepted to Southernport Developments' particulars of claim on the ground that it disclosed no cause of action.
_	The Supreme Court in its judgement asked the Odisha government to re-investigate the closure of 315 cases out of the total 827 cases registered related to anti-Christian violence in Kandhamal district in 2008, and “see that the offenders are brought to book” which were earlier closed by the state police on the ground that either the offenders could not be traced or no offence was made out..
_	The other 5 runners, including his pacemaker, took the shorter and more conventional route against the inside rail on the ground that was described officially as Good to Soft, Soft in places.
_	Peter and Anita Mann sought an injunction against a winding up petition by Mr Sidney Goldstein and his wife, as well as Wallander Laboratories Ltd, on the ground that the debts were under dispute.
_	Several factors are considered in issuing a continuance on the ground that a witness or evidence is absent:
_	After completing his BA, Barua also passed the ICS examination, but the British Government at that time did not appoint him as an Administrative Officer on the ground that he could not ride horses.
_	By article XV of the law promulgated by the Diet of 1630, Jews were forbidden to take charge of the customs; and this decree was confirmed by the Diet of 1646 on the ground that the Jews were excluded from the privileges of the country, that they were unbelievers, and had no conscience ("veluti jurium regni incapaces, infideles, et nulla conscientia praediti").
_	Sabyasachi does not believe in the caste system, and towards the end of the book pleads for the destruction of "all that is eternal ("sanatan"), ancient, and decaying--[in] religion, society, tradition" on the ground that these are "enemies of the nation."
_	"(2) Any person who was a party to any proceeding before the court, or is aggrieved by the order, determination or other proceeding of the court, may question the proceeding on the ground that it is wrong in law or is in excess of jurisdiction by appealing to a county court.
_	Rashi interprets his father's statement of the naming of Noah (in Hebrew נֹחַ) "This one will comfort us (in Hebrew– yeNaHamainu יְנַחֲמֵנו) in our work and in the toil of our hands, which come from the ground that the Lord had cursed", by saying Noah heralded a new era of prosperity, when there was easing (in Hebrew – nahah – נחה) from the curse from the time of Adam when the Earth produced thorns and thistles even where men sowed wheat and that Noah then introduced the plow.
_	The libel complaint was eventually dismissed on June 2007 by the prosecutors’ office on the ground that being a public figure, remarks on Estrada’s presidency constituted privileged statements and therefore not libelous.
_	In the United States however the band failed to regain the ground that "Thirteen" had lost them.
_	To the question as to the responsibility for the death of Madero and Pino Suárez, Ambassador Wilson said he took the ground that they were private citizens when they died, and that it would be impolite for a foreign power to demand an investigation into a purely domestic matter.
_	The case set an important precedent by deciding several unsettled issues in the interpretation of the CBM provisions of the AIA>, including what are business-method patents under the AIA and whether the AIA authorizes the PTO to hold such patents invalid in CBM proceedings on the ground that they are patent ineligible under 35 U.S.C. § 101 as “abstract ideas.”
_	Cox criticized the oversight program on the ground that because of its voluntary nature and the SEC's limited statutory authority, the agency could not force changes in the hundreds of unregulated subsidiaries of large investment banks such as Goldman Sachs, Morgan Stanley, Merrill Lynch, Lehman Brothers and Bear Stearns as bank regulators could do with bank holding companies.
_	There is a small African Union force on the ground that will in time be incorporated into the U.N. force.
_	Maxwell wrote in his review of Peter Kornbluh's book, "This demarche was apparently not delivered: the U.S. embassy in Santiago demurred on the ground that to deliver such a strong rebuke would upset the dictator", and that, on September 20, 1976, the day before Letelier and Moffitt were killed, the State Department instructed the ambassadors to take no further action with regard to the Condor scheme.
_	Although he reported in December to begin training as a radio technician, he was relieved of duty on February 28, 1941 on the ground that his services were essential in Gebrüder Dassler.
_	She also alleged a violation of Article 14 on the ground that she was entitled to vote in European Parliament elections anywhere in the European Union where she lived except in Gibraltar.
_	However, considering Canada's colonial history and persistent bias in support of resource extraction industries, it is worth recognizing that many things happen on the ground that are not in fact sanctioned by law.
_	The court immediately issued an injunction, but removed it on 31 July 2013, on the ground that no similarity was found between the "Half Serious "script and the script that the complainant produced in the court.
_	There is no statutory basis for excluding such transactions from "gross income" on the ground that one purpose of the employer was to confer on the employee a "proprietary interest" in the business.
_	The case of Nicolas and Sinforoso Mercado against Benito Go Bio began as a suit “brought in the Court of First Instance of Manila (civil case No. 55449), to annul a contract of sale and another of lease on two parcels of land with improvements thereon, on the ground that the deed of sale purporting to convey to the defendant the parcels of land and improvements is not a sale with the right to repurchase but a mortgage to secure the payment of a loan.”
_	He delivered a speech in December before the governor and council in which he pronounced the Stamp Act invalid on the ground that Massachusetts had not given its assent to it, being without representation in Parliament.
_	Some anonymous sources claimed that Attorney General Griffin B. Bell objected to the nomination on the ground that Cox at 67 was too old, noting that the ABA suggested that no one over 64 be named to the job.
_	The ending was revised in an 1857 edition to a more gruesome ending wherein Rumpelstiltskin "in his rage drove his right foot so far into the ground that it sank in up to his waist; then in a passion he seized the left foot with both hands and tore himself in two".
_	Other versions have Rumpelstiltskin driving his right foot so far into the ground that he creates a chasm and falls into it, never to be seen again.
_	A fourth dissenter, Judge Oda of Japan, dissented largely on the ground that the Court simply should not have taken the case.
_	Never before had the Court of Criminal Appeal overturned a conviction in a capital case on the ground that the verdict was "unreasonable...having regard to the evidence", and that was the only realistic ground of appeal available to Wallace.
_	Again they broke through, advancing , and forcing the British to give back all of the ground that they had won the preceding year after weeks of battle.
_	Fania disqualified on the ground that he was serving a 12-month jail sentence (for political crimes).
_	We have no power "per se" to review and annul acts of Congress on the ground that they are unconstitutional.
_	A lawsuit was filed in U.S. District Court in Los Angeles on July 2, 2012, seeking to overturn the California foie gras law on the ground that it is unconstitutionally vague.
_	At 7:58 am EST, Commander Charles F. Bolden reported to the ground that one of the Thermal Protection System (TPS) blankets around "Discovery"’s forward RCS thruster below Commander Bolden's cabin window was slightly peeled back.
_	In Grigorenko's words, Leonid Brezhnev signed the decree of depriving Grigorenko of Soviet citizenship on the ground that he was undermining the prestige of the Soviet Union.
_	This was a means by which mercury could be removed from the atmosphere and deposit to the ground that was not previously known.
_	Squanto urged that the English simply "rifle" the women and take their skins on the ground that "they are a bad people and oft threatned you," but the English insisted on treating them fairly.
_	When in 1687 Edward Booth, alias Barlow, applied for a patent for "pulling or repeating clocks and watches", the Clockmakers' Company successfully opposed the application on the ground that the alleged invention was anticipated by a watch previously invented and made by Quare.
_	On 21 August 2015, the Court of Appeal of Singapore overruled the High Court's decision, and completely removed the freezing injunction, on the ground that the procedure launched by Dmitry Rybolovlev amounted to an abuse of procedure.
_	Accordingly, where the liquidator of a company claimed an order setting aside a mortgage bond and an order for the cancellation of the bond on the ground that the bond constituted a disposition without value in terms of section 26 of
_	He had married in Edward VI's reign, but some of the relatives sought to deprive his children of his property on the ground that they were illegitimate.
_	"The degree 'Scientiae Dentium Doctoris', which would leave the initials of DDS unchanged, was then considered, but was rejected on the ground that dentistry was not a science."
_	Amidst this international feinting and shaping, the Catholic Archbishop of Cashel, Maurice Reagh Fitzgibbon – an ally of the Irish leader in Munster James Fitzmaurice Fitzgerald – made some effort while in Spain to discredit Stucley's ambitions , much to the displeasure of Feria, and was supported by the Duke of Alba, who dismissed the proposed invasion on the ground that once England fell, Ireland would fall of itself.
_	The exemptions in favor of other moneyed capital appear to be of such a substantial character in amount as to take the present case out of the operation of the rule that it is not absolute equality that is contemplated by the act of Congress; a rule which rests upon the ground that exact uniformity or equality of taxation cannot, in the nature of things, be expected or attained under any system.
_	This enabled the JNA to retake the ground that it had lost and from then on the town was completely surrounded until it eventually fell on 18 November 1991.
_	In 2014, the United States Department of Justice intervened in a private lawsuit filed against UANI and requested its dismissal on the ground that the continued litigation of the case would jeopardize US national security.
_	Even before the cases were decided, Diokno, to the chagrin of the Supreme Court, opted to withdraw his petition on the ground that no fair decision can be made of the court to render him justice.
_	"On the application of any person a Magistrate may grant to the applicant a certificate of exemption from military training and service if the Magistrate is satisfied that the applicant objects in good faith to such training and service on the ground that it is contrary to his religious belief."
_	As soon as Edgar became king, he reversed this second choice on the ground that Byrhthelm had not been able to govern even his first diocese properly.
_	He rejected its canon 28 on the ground that it contravened the sixth canon of Nicaea and infringed the rights of Alexandria and Antioch.
_	Additionally, official national accounts may include in consumption of fixed capital the value of those "insurance premiums, interest and rents" paid from gross income, which relate directly to the acquisition or maintenance of productive fixed assets, on the ground that they are part of the cost of operating productive fixed assets.
_	The deaths of more than 50 Liverpool football supporters at Hillsborough in 1989 was undeniably a greater tragedy than the single death, however horrible, of Mr Bigley; but that is no excuse for Liverpool’s failure to acknowledge, even to this day, the part played in the disaster by drunken fans at the back of the crowd who mindlessly tried to fight their way into the ground that Saturday afternoon.
_	It is not indeed right to overlook the fact that some have rejected the Epistle to the Hebrews, saying that it is disputed by the church of Rome, on the ground that it was not written by Paul." EH 4.29.6 mentions the Diatessaron: "But their original founder, Tatian, formed a certain combination and collection of the gospels, I know not how, to which he gave the title Diatessaron, and which is still in the hands of some.
_	A river of charged particles and electrons in the ionosphere flowed from west to east, inducing powerful electrical currents in the ground that surged into many natural nooks and crannies.
_	In the past, some groups claimed superior rights on the ground that they belonged to the Aryan race or the Teutonic race.
_	The anthropologists rejected such claims on two grounds: first, on the ground that within the same human species no race is superior to any other; but also on the ground that there is no such thing as an Aryan race or a Teutonic race.
_	Anthony à Wood supposed, on the ground that he was more educated than was usual in his trade, that he had been a poor scholar of Oxford.
_	The court rejected this argument on the ground that it is irrelevant how a term is used outside the United States:
_	It was said that subjects such as Geography, Maths and Latin were not taught at all on the ground that they were too boring.
_	But the jury of Kentucky noblemen who returned the verdict -- being married men, and long used to forgiving a woman anything -- petitioned the governor to pardon Miss Delia on the ground that she belongs to the sect that can do no wrong -- and be punished for it.
_	Frank was opposed to the "Lublin Plan" on the ground that the SS were "dumping" Jews into his territory.
_	In 2001, the case was taken to the London High Court, which rejected the Indian government's request for extradition on the ground that there was no "prima facie" case against Saifi.
_	A crucial scene involved black actors and, in racially segregated America of 1957, the studio objected on the ground that to use black actors would mean commercial failure.
_	Motions to suppress J.D.B.'s statements at trial were denied on the ground that J.D.B. was not in custody.
_	The case was appealed to the Supreme Court, in part, on the ground that there were no black jurors.
_	The Show Grounds were offered to the Canterbury Rugby League by the council on a five-year lease, starting a long term relationship with the ground that continues to this day.
_	When the other traditionally top-rated vineyards of Vosne-Romanée were being classified in the 1930s as the AOC system was introduced, owner Henri Lamarche did not apply for Grand Cru status and La Grande Rue therefore remained a Premier Cru: "the explanation is that when the official classification was drawn up he believed there was nothing to be gained except perhaps increased taxes ... the domaine [François Lamarche from 1985] finally succeeded after a long and persistent campaign in persuading the authorities to reclassify it as Grand Cru, chiefly on the ground that it shares the same soil band as its neighbours"; and the INAO approved the dossier on 8–9 November 1989 andbut due to a political delay the actual decree did not go into effect until 8 July 1992.
_	He defended the exportation of bullion on the ground that by the re-exportation of the commodities the country was thus enabled to purchase, the treasure of the nation was augmented.
_	Although the stay was lifted, and the government freed of legal constraints that prevented it from deporting Demjanjuk, his appeal for the substantive review of the BIA decision on the merits (wherein the BIA effectively upheld the deportation order itself, by refusing to reopen the case on the ground that "torture" in Germany was more likely than not) was still pending before the Court of Appeals.
_	The Court granted the application for review on the ground that the applicant had a legitimate expectation to have the substantive benefit of staying in the nursing home as promised by the local authority.
_	R. Ramani, a leading advocate and Chairman of the Bar Council, appeared personally to object to Chan's petition on the ground that he had provided only one reason for abridgment of time when the relevant provision in the legislation referred to "reasons".
_	On 29 March 2007, U.S. District Judge Lee Rosenthal dismissed his case on the ground that all eight had immunity covering their actions.
_	On June 3, 1987, Layton's motion to set aside the conviction "on the ground that he was denied the effective assistance of counsel during his second trial" was denied by the United States District Court of the Northern District of California.
_	Andronikos appealed to the Church to annul the marriage but the Patriarch refused to assist him, on the ground that Jiajak was reported to be already pregnant.
_	The Court held that a claim of Presidential privilege as to materials subpoenaed for use in a criminal trial cannot override the needs of the judicial process, if that claim is based, not on the ground that military or diplomatic secrets are implicated, but merely on the ground of a generalized interest in confidentiality.
_	Burges had taken up his residence in London, and by a stretch of the royal prerogative he was prevented from practising physic in London on the ground that he had been in holy orders.
_	They discover the crack in the ground that released the gases earlier.
_	Each of the following places, being a site to which a permit applies within the meaning of paragraph 1 of Schedule 1 to the Nuclear Installations Act 1965, has, on the ground that information with respect thereto, or damage thereto, would be useful to an enemy, been declared to be a prohibited place for the purpose of this section:
_	He was again denied, on the ground that the resolution allowed only whites to vote (Nixon was black).
_	In 1906, the groundbreaking ceremony was performed on the ground that would become the school's campus on Bull Street.
_	There were reports from the ground that the disengagement of the militias was incomplete.
_	India's chief of army staff urged negotiations on the ground that they were running out ammunition and their number of tanks had become seriously depleted.
_	Cox had been refused equal-time by the station "on the ground that the program is a public service feature."
_	In mid-2010, following the June 2010 United Kingdom Budget, which allocated a series of cuts across government departments and the public sector, the Fawcett Society filed an action for judicial review, on the ground that the budget paid no regard to the disparate negative impact on women as it should have under section 84 of the Equality Act 2006 and section 76A of the Sex Discrimination Act 1975.
_	In January 1485 Richard intervened to prevent Foxe's appointment to the vicarage of Stepney on the ground that he was keeping company with the "great rebel, Henry ap Tuddor."
_	Mr Jennings, a gardener and bricklayer, sued the administrators of his former employer, for a large house and furniture (worth £435,000) on the ground that he had been given an assurance he would get it.
_	On 13 January 1297 Edward made a presentation to the church of Cavers, upon the ground that the lands of Alexander de Baliol were in his hands.
_	On June 30, 1972, Clayton moved in the County Court for a dismissal of the indictment on the ground that he had not been brought to trial as required by the mandate of the United States Court of Appeals.
_	However, the second part namely "and no law containing a declaration that it is for giving effect to such policy shall be called in question in any court on the ground that it does not give effect to such policy" was declared unconstitutional.
_	The court held Comerica liable for losses of US$560,000 that could not be recovered from the phishing attack, on the ground that the bank had not acted in good faith when it failed to recognize the transfers as fraudulent.
_	The collective edition of 1673 was brought to the notice of the House of Lords on 13 March 1676, on the ground that its incidental vindication of a republican form of government in England rendered it a seditious and treasonable publication.
_	McGuire argued that his contract with Brooklyn was invalid on the ground that the "reserve clause" was a violation of the Sherman Anti-Trust Act.
_	Protect the ground forces from enemy air attack and destroy any and all obstacles on the ground that prevented our forces from advancing.
_	The FTC sued S&H for this practice (among others) on the ground that this was unfair and oppressive to consumers.
_	When Hajjaj asked Dahir for the release of prisoners and compensation, the latter refused on the ground that he had no control over those.
_	Three years later, she was ordered by the Registrar of Businesses to alter her business name to one that did not mention "JC Penney" on the ground that the name was that of an American company, J.C. Penney Company Inc., which had registered two "Penneys" trademarks in Singapore.
_	Before Barère was sentenced to prison, "Carnot defended him on the ground that [Barère] was hardly worse than himself."
_	Below the ground that surrounds the base of the tree is ; surrounding the Charter Oak are its name, and .
_	As the federal government's chief antitrust enforcement officer, he attempted to ground all policy on economic foundations, disregarding populist or other political components on the ground that they could not be the basis for sound policy.
_	The Greek Federation was abolished for the ground that the number of teams was less of required number.
_	The foot-drumming may alert nearby offspring but most likely conveys vibrations through the ground that the rat is too alert for a successful attack, thus preventing the snake's predatory pursuit.
_	If a man has failed to find any good reason for believing that there is a God, it is perfectly natural and rational that he should not believe that there is a God; and if so, he is an atheist... if he goes farther, and, after an investigation into the nature and reach of human knowledge, ending in the conclusion that the existence of God is incapable of proof, cease to believe in it on the ground that he cannot know it to be true, he is an agnostic and also an atheist – an agnostic-atheist – an atheist because an agnostic... while, then, it is erroneous to identify agnosticism and atheism, it is equally erroneous so to separate them as if the one were exclusive of the other...
_	He was opposed to the League of Nations without reservations, on the ground that it would create a super-state.
_	Tarble's father filed a writ of "habeas corpus" on the ground that Tarble was a minor at the time of his enlistment, and that he enlisted without the consent of his father.
_	"He was so near the ground that he could have landed and have been alive today, but to quit... was not in him; instead of quitting he pulled hard on the steering lever and his little machine bounded straight up under his adversary.
_	Someone might therefore challenge it on the ground that it does not fall within the legislative functions of the ABS".
_	In September, 2008, part of the ground that supports the railway tracks were washed away after Hurricane Hannah.
_	Thompson's counsel unsuccessfully sought dismissal of the charges on the ground that a judgment of conviction on this record would deprive Thompson of property and liberty without due process of law under the Fourteenth Amendment, in that there was no evidence to support findings of guilt.
_	Jack Lang's father was sentenced by the court in Brive for failure to report his children as Jews, but was later acquitted by the Court of Appeal on the ground that the children's mother was a Catholic.
_	Leibowitz asserted his trust in the "God fearing people of Decatur and Morgan County"; he made a pretrial motion to quash the indictment on the ground that blacks had been systematically excluded from the grand jury.
_	The court on appeal sustained his conviction by a magistrate on the ground that the negligence which the accused there committed was not so much in the driving of the vehicle, but in his driving at all, knowing of his physical disability.
_	The fifth phase will activate a micro-discharge plasma thruster with a command from the ground that will autonomously operate when the thrusting vector is within a 15 degree cone of the anti-velocity vector.
_	Her last case as a lawyer before the Supreme Court was 1978's "Duren v. Missouri", , which challenged the validity of voluntary jury duty for women, on the ground that participation in jury duty was a citizen's vital governmental service and therefore should not be optional for women.
_	Jayne Nelson of "SFX Magazine" noted, "The action is clunky, the jokes fall flat time and again, and the script tries so hard to get off the ground that you can almost feel the wind hitting you in the kisser from its frantic wing-flaps."
_	It has been pointed out that the controversial law struck down by Nariman and Chelameswar had gained notoriety after many people in India started getting arrested for seemingly innocuous reasons on the ground that they had violated the now scrapped law.
_	When opponents sought to modify the tariff bill to allow for an income tax, Taft opposed it on the ground that the Supreme Court would likely strike it down as unconstitutional, as it had before.
_	The suit proceeds upon the ground that such levy violates the act of Congress prescribing conditions upon state taxation of national bank shares in this, that "other moneyed capital in the hands of individual citizens" of that county is exempted by the laws of Pennsylvania from such taxation.
_	Upon appeal to the Supreme Court of Pennsylvania, that judgment was affirmed on the ground that the laws of the state under which the defendants sought to justify the taxation were not repugnant to the act of Congress.
_	In subsequent criminal proceedings, in federal district court, the defendant moved to suppress the frisk-acquired gun evidence on the ground that the officer violated the defendant's Fourth Amendment right to be free from unreasonable searches and seizures—arguing that the officer didn't have "reasonable suspicion" to frisk him.
_	All large commercial aircraft have escape slides on the main doors of the plane, but some do not have slides over the wings, because when the flaps are fully lowered, the wings are low enough to the ground that passengers can evacuate safely.
_	Citing the text of the law under which Harper's brought their lawsuit,("The enactment of copyright legislation by Congress under the terms of the Constitution is not based upon any natural right that the author has in his writings ... but upon the ground that the welfare of the public will be served and progress of science and useful arts will be promoted by securing to authors for limited periods the exclusive rights to their writings."
_	Satisfied, he leaves the house, but finds marks in the ground that look like someone had been dragged.
_	The district court rejected that recommendation, however, on the ground that Congress had written the relevant guideline itself, rather than allowing the Sentencing Commission to do so.
_	Both TV stations refused to run the Sloan paid TV ads on the ground that Sloan had failed to meet his burden to substantiate bona fide candidacy for the Office of the President of the United States under the threshold established by the Communications Act of 1934 and regulations of the Federal Communications Commission.
_	In the following days, Fitzthomas, followed reluctantly by Donal MacCarthy, laid waste to Lord Barry's territory of Ibawne, on the ground that Barry had refused to join the rebellion.
_	Lachit updated Chakradhwaj Singha about this proposal, who rejected the offer on the ground that it was beneath his dignity to duel a mere servant "who has no umbrella over his head" (who is not a "Chhatrapati").
_	Gifts of land and other possessions to a church were often expressed as donations to its principal saint, so the seizure of such a saint's remains from an unreformed community could then justify the transfer of its wealth to a Benedictine monastery, on the ground that as property had been donated to the saint, it should follow his or her body to its new home.
_	Justice O'Connor stated that the layoff provision was not narrowly tailored to achieve its asserted purpose, on the ground that it was designed to safeguard a hiring goal that was tied to the percentage of minority students in the school district, not to the percentage of qualified minority teachers within the labor pool, and that such a hiring goal itself had no relation to the remedying of employment discrimination.
_	But Frege criticized Cantor on the ground that Cantor defines cardinal numbers in terms of ordinal numbers, whereas Frege wanted to give a characterization of cardinals that was independent of the ordinals.
_	Even on lines where the ICE is not faster than an ordinary IC or EC train (for example Hamburg to Dortmund), an additional surcharge will be levied on the ground that the ICE trains have a higher comfort level than IC/EC trains.
_	In May 1873, Japanese diplomats arrived in Beijing and put forward their claims, but the Qing government immediately rejected Japanese demands on the ground that the Kingdom of Ryukyu at that time was an independent state and had nothing to do with Japan.
_	The term "μίασμα" (Greek for miasma): "stain, pollution", was coined by Hippocrates of Kos who used it to describe dangerous fumes from the ground that are transported by winds and can cause serious illnesses.
_	In "United States v. Ellenbogen", 1965, a prosecution for bribing a purchasing agent of the General Services Administration and for conspiring to commit similar offenses, wherein the purchasing agent pleaded guilty prior to the trial and was the principal witness for the government in the defendant's case, it was held that the trial court's refusal to allow the production of a signed sworn statement of the purchasing agent in which he explained in detail his similar unlawful dealings with bidders other than the defendant, on the ground that such statement had nothing to do with the present case, was error where on direct examination the agent was examined by the government on the point of such other dealings as covered in the requested statement.
_	On the other hand, various private colleges have defended capitation fee on the ground that it avails institutions with funds to reinvest in the institution to impart quality education.
_	Three humble voters confessedly backed by more powerful people, lodged an election petition against the new member on the ground that he and his agents had been guilty of bribery and corruption.
_	It stands on the ground that was once home to the Eagle's Nest Art Colony, which Taft founded in 1898.
_	Following conviction, a new trial was sought, and unexpectedly Judge Ballard granted the motion on the ground that not enough evidence had been produced to warrant the verdict.
_	The National Right to Work Legal Defense Foundation funded a claim against the Illinois's Public Labor Relations Act, on the ground that it violated the First Amendment.
_	Back in Africa, Uhlenbroek explains that it is the monkeys that have come out of the forest to live on the ground that are the most intelligent and have the most sophisticated societies as shown by the patas monkey and olive baboon.
_	In economics, he is best known by his vindication of the American writer H. C. Carey, who attracts him both by his theory of value, which suggests an ultimate harmony of the interests of capitalists and labourers; and also by his doctrine of national political economy, which advocates protection on the ground that the morals and culture of a people are promoted by having its whole system of industry complete within its own borders.
_	Lastly, provocation is used when the spouse accused of abandoning the marriage defends the suit on the ground that the filing spouse provoked the abandonment.
_	Voorhees opposed the adjournment and moved for Jackalow's immediate release on the ground that there was no jurisdiction because no crime had been proved to have been committed.
_	The judge said: "On the ground that I have stated to you, you are not asked to disclose anything that a penitent may have said to you in the confessional.
_	She refused to answer any of the questions put to her on the ground that she would neither be 'her own hangman' nor could she 'in her conscience be an accuser of others'.
_	Before Allenby arrived, the British command had "contemplated withdrawing the swords from the Yeomanry regiments to lighten the burdens of their horses, on the ground that the "arme blanche" was little likely ever to be used."
_	On September 8, 2003, EPA denied the ICTA petition on the ground that it did not have authority under the CAA to promulgate regulations to address global climate change and that CO and other GHGs therefore could not be considered "air pollutants" under the provisions of the CAA, including section 202.
_	Spenser declines to comply with the request on the ground that he had already undertaken "The Faerie Queene", 'a work tending to the same effect'; and finally the poet invites Bryskett to read to the company his own translation of Giraldo, which Bryskett willingly consents to do.
_	However, this cancellation was itself cancelled in a subsequent HCO Policy Letter of 8 September 1983, "Cancellation of Issues on Suppressive Acts and PTSes", which cancelled a number of HCOPLs on the ground that they "were not written by the Founder [Hubbard]".
_	Adebisi Akande dissolved the state Council of Obas and Chiefs in 2001, on the ground that it was too large.
_	Justice Black dissented on the ground that charging practically nominal initial court costs in civil actions does not violate either the due process or equal protection clause.
_	The complexity of the relationship between ethnicity and the Chinese identity can be seen during the Taiping rebellion in which the rebels fought fiercely against the Manchus on the ground that they were barbarian foreigners while at the same time others fought just as fiercely on behalf of the Manchus on the grounds that they were the preservers of traditional Chinese values.
_	As a delegate to the 1899 Hague Convention, Mahan argued against prohibiting the use of asphyxiating gases in warfare on the ground that such weapons would inflict such terrible casualties that belligerents would be forced to end wars more quickly, thus providing a net advantage for world peace.
_	Therefore, the court affirmed the summary judgment on the ground that the direct infringement predicate for indirect infringement was not shown and it vacated the ruling as to exhaustion.
_	Thereafter, Marines shot and/or bayonetted any Japanese soldier lying on the ground that moved, although about 15 injured and unconscious Japanese soldiers were taken prisoner.
_	Healey was one of the heroes of Collingwood’s 1953 Premiership victory and was rated by many as one of the best players on the ground that day.
_	When Hitler attacked the Soviet Union it continued to attack Randolph's proposed March, but now on the ground that it undermined the unity needed to win the war.
_	The WTUL was strongly opposed to the Equal Rights Amendment drafted by the NWP after the passage of the Nineteenth Amendment on the ground that it would undo the protective legislation that the WTUL had fought so hard to obtain.
_	After a trial, the three-judge court denied an injunction against the enforcement of § 792 on the ground that the proofs did not establish that its application to Florida avocados violated any provision of the Federal Constitution.
_	The less extreme party, though limiting the Church's infallibility to the question of dogma, thought that the formula might be signed absolutely and without qualification, on the ground that, by general usage, subscription implied assent to the dogma, but, in relation to the fact, only external reverence.
_	Charles Hedley stated in 1922 :"Sowerby changed the name of this species on the ground that "Mangilia bella" was preoccupied by Hinds, but as a matter of fact Mangilia was used for this species neither by Hinds nor by Adams and Angas, so that the innovation was not necessary.
_	CPA moved to reconsider on the ground that the conversion of the motion to dismiss into a motion for summary judgment was improper.
_	On the other hand, Cecile Jackson objects the claim of Agarwal on the ground that it is important to focus on gendering land questions instead of treating land issues only in terms of land rights of women as Agarwal does.
_	Proposals to admit Turkey have been debated but are now currently stalled, partly on the ground that Turkey is beyond Europe's historic frontier and it is yet to comply with the 35 point policy areas set out by EU.
_	Each of the following places, being a site belonging to or used for the purposes of the United Kingdom Atomic Energy Authority, has, on the ground that information with respect thereto, or damage thereto, would be useful to an enemy, been declared to be a prohibited place for the purpose of this section:
_	For visual air navigation (see the article on visual flight rules), waypoints may be directly associated with distinctive features on the ground that are easily identifiable from aircraft, such as stadiums, power plants, racetracks, etc.
_	The stoppage has been attributed to factors such as Myddelton facing difficulties in raising funds, and landowners along the route opposing the acquisition of their lands on the ground that the river would turn their meadows into "bogs and quagmires".
_	The petition for the writ based the right to the relief which it prayed, and which the court below granted, on the ground that the detention complained of was in violation of the Constitution and laws of the United States and in disregard of a right arising from and guarantied by a treaty made by the United States with the Bannock Indians.
_	Therefore, in the absence of evidence of consumer recognition as a mark, the examining attorney should refuse registration on the ground that the hologram does not function as a mark, under §§1, 2 and 45 of the Trademark Act, 15 U.S.C. §§1051, 1052 and 1127.
_	Generally, if a hologram has two or more views, the examining attorney should also refuse registration under §§1 and 45 of the Trademark Act, 15 U.S.C. §§1051 and 1127, on the ground that the application seeks registration of more than one mark.
_	Balfour, having secured his wife's generous dowry, refused to honour his side of the marriage settlement, by which he had promised his wife a jointure of £300, on the ground that Anne had committed adultery.
_	I, whose delegates were absent when this resolution was passed and who protested against it, recognized the council as ecumenical and confirmed its doctrinal decrees, but rejected canon 28 on the ground that it contravened the sixth canon of Nicaea and infringed the rights of Alexandria and Antioch.
_	Justice Rehnquist dissented on the ground that the Fourteenth Amendment does not protect minorities other than racial minorities.
_	In 1804 he had refused to accept the same honor from Harvard on the ground that he was too young, and he also declined the provostship of the University of Pennsylvania in 1823.
_	Later, they came across a charismatic man in that land, whom could cause the ground that he stood on to grow grass.
_	The layer is called supra-permafrost (above the permafrost) talik; it is different from traditional taliks, which are usually associated with water bodies, in that supra-permafrost talik occurs because the ground that thawed in the summer does not completely refreeze in the winter.
_	In the 1850s, he ran a tobacconist and cricket ball shop on Bramall Lane, Sheffield, which was close to the ground that became home to both Yorkshire County Cricket Club and Sheffield United Football Club.
_	Even at that date Trithemius admitted him to his "Catalogus illustrium virorum" with warm eulogies, on the ground that the youth had surpassed many men of mature age, including even doctors.
_	Nevertheless, the ECJ decision does not preclude a further test of the validity of the directive on the ground that it is inconsistent with the Agreement on Trade-Related Aspects of Intellectual Property Rights (TRIPS).
_	The popular long-running segment of the show is entitled Saturday Specials, and highlights all of the outstanding marks, goals or other efforts around the ground that took place on the day just finished.
_	This usage could also be justified on the ground that the isodynamic points are related to the three Apollonian circles associated with a triangle.
_	AC later sold and delivered the machines to Vasco without paying all the instalments due to "T," who then claimed the machines from Vasco on the ground that they were the owners because they had paid "C" and taken delivery first by means of "traditio brevi manu", and then from AC by "constitutum possessorium".
_	In October 1939, the Judge Advocate General, Maj. Gen. Allen W. Gullion, turned down one such recommendation on the ground that his office had recently published U.S. Army Field Manual FM 27-10, "The Rules of Land Warfare", which contained a substantial section on civil administration.
_	Also in June 2017, other officials in the Trump administration, including Dan Coats and Jeff Sessions, declined to describe in congressional hearings conversations they had with President Trump, on the ground that they wanted Trump to have an opportunity to decide whether to invoke executive privilege.
_	However, the vessel was returned to the Swedish owners on the ground that Sweden had not prohibited the trade and tolerated it in practice.
_	He continued a Member of Parliament until 2003, when he resigned in protest to the amendment to the Constitution by which the parliament extended its tenure for a further 2 years, which Bin Shamlan deemed an unconstitutional move and resigned on the ground that his 4-year mandate by the people is over.
_	Cantarini further refused to engrave Guido's designs on the ground that his own works were as much worthy of publication.
_	He remained a firm opponent of Roman Catholic emancipation, even defending the penal laws on the ground that after the Revolution, they were not laws of persecution but of political necessity; but after 1786, he does not appear to have attended the parliament in Dublin.
_	Ripley subsequently engineered a coup in WWF-US which involved the overthrow of its president, C. R. Gutermuth, on the ground that he had taken up a conflicting position as president of the National Rifle Association.
_	"Both constitute attempts to achieve a 'racially pure' voting bloc justified on the ground that the right to vote has merely been limited to those 'primarily affected' by the decisions of the elected officials."
_	The original NCHRH Bill was re-drafted after several States raised objections on the ground that the body was highly centralized and would usurp the powers of the States.
_	The hopes of ultimate success were, however, frustrated by the intervention of Russia; all appeals to the western powers were vain, and on 11 August Kossuth abdicated in favor of Görgey, on the ground that in the last extremity, the general alone could save the nation.
_	Hillgruber defended his call for the identification with the German troops fighting on the Eastern Front in an interview with the "Rheinischer Merkur" newspaper on 31 October 1986, on the ground that he was only trying "…to experience things from the perspective of the main body of the population".
_	The squadron's planes monitored information provided by sensors on the ground that had been delivered by other aircraft or special forces.
_	The respondents resisted the application for an interdict on the ground that it would violate the constitutional right to freedom of expression.
_	Local Serbs, on the ground that Agreement, established the Serb National Council and gained the right to establish the Joint Council of Municipalities.
_	On another occasion he was asked to advise on a commission to reform the customs at Chester, but refused on the ground that he did not have adequate time.
_	In November 2003, Judge Lourdes Baird granted Sony Music's motion for summary judgment on the ground that Laws's state law claims were preempted by Section 301 of the United States Copyright Act.
_	Porphyroid neomorphism occurs when a small number of large crystals form in the area of static groundmasses, which are—as the name implies—areas of the ground that are characterized by relatively insignificant and unsubstantial metamorphic changes.
_	He vacated the charter of the Sugar Trust of New York on the ground that it was a monopoly.
_	Mugambi is critical of Rudolf Bultmann's project of "demythologisation", on the ground that hermeneutically, myth cannot be abstracted from the Gospel.
_	Lee took ASLEF to the Employment Tribunal to contest his expulsion, under section 174 of the Trade Union and Labour Relations (Consolidation) Act 1992, which prohibits unions from excluding or expelling persons wholly or to any extent on the ground that the individual is or was a member of a political party.
_	Eventually, as he tries to stomp it into the ground, he causes a large crack in the ground that extends for miles and miles and sets off a large avalanche which nearly crushes him.
_	Prior to the battle, Smyth had created a plan of the ground that allowed Wellington to place his troops rapidly and advantageously.
_	In 1948 a ban on the organisation was proposed, on the ground that the organisation was under the influence of communists in East Pakistan.
_	This classification received criticism from other biologists such as Johan Gottschalk Wallerius, Jacob Theodor Klein and Johann Georg Gmelin on the ground that it is illogical to describe a human as 'like a man'.
_	In the night of 14–15 November 1775, a flood caused the water to rise and the entire area of the Scheepmakersdijk came under water, and the windows of Het Scheepje were so low to the ground that the water came in through the windows.
_	Hess issued a decree stating: "No National Socialist may suffer any detriment on the ground that he does not profess any particular faith or confession or on the ground that he does not make any religious profession at all."
_	His Office of Management and Budget Deputy Director Caspar Weinberger was opposed to this, persuading Nixon to keep the remaining Moon missions, but recommended that if such cancellation would happen that it be "on the ground that Apollo 15 was so successful in gathering needed data that we can now shift, sooner than previously expected, to the Space Shuttle, Grand Tour, NERVA, etc."
_	Hoffmann LJ held Mr D'Jan's failure was negligent, but exercised discretion to relieve liability on the ground that he owned almost all of his small business and had only put his own money at risk.
_	In a letter to Otto Dov Kulka of 8 December 1986 Nolte criticized the work of French Holocaust denier Robert Faurisson on the ground that the Holocaust did in fact occur, but went on to argue that Faurisson’s work was motivated by admirable motives, in the form of sympathy for Palestinians and opposition to Israel.
_	On 16 June 1536, Petre appeared in Convocation and made a novel claim to preside over its deliberations, on the ground that the King was supreme head of the church, Cromwell was the King's vicegerent, and he was Cromwell's deputy.
_	The condemnation by the United Nations Security Council was vetoed by Russia on the ground that the condemnation sought to blame Alexander Zakharchenko's announcement of beginning of the attack on Mariupol as being irresponsible and to condemn separatist forces who, according to Russia, are "self-defense forces".
_	The piles will hold back the ground that consists of a few metres of fill, then a to thick sand layer which becomes weathered sandstone further down.
_	Earlier in August 2014, Supreme Court had dismissed few Writ Petitions challenging the validity of NJAC on the ground that the challenge was premature as the constitutional amendment and the NJAC Act had not been notified then.
_	Benedict was formerly credited with the authorship of the "Gesta" on the ground that his name appears in the title of the oldest manuscript.
_	Justice Douglas wrote, "If owner after owner were permitted to resist these redevelopment programs on the ground that his particular property was not being used against the public interest, integrated plans for redevelopment would suffer greatly."
_	A great many intelligent persons tolerate or encourage our fake natural history on the ground that they find it entertaining, and that it interests the school-children in the wild life about them.
_	Justice Brennan, too, cited "Railroad Commission v. Pullman Co.", in which “this Court held that the District Court should have stayed its hand while state issues were resolved in a state court when an injunction was sought to restrain the enforcement of the order of a state administrative body on the ground that the order was not authorized by the state law and was violative of the Federal Constitution.
_	It was Schultens too who conquered the difficulties opposed to his graduation at the last moment by the faculty of theology on the ground that some of his theses had a materialistic ring.
_	The head of the Pattani Dutch trading post, Victor Sprinckel, refused on the ground that he was too busy dealing with Portuguese opposition in Southeast Asia.
_	In 2005 The Victorian Court of Appeal annulled the guilty verdict of the first trial in 2004 and ordered a retrial on the ground that the trial judge had failed to answer a question from a member of the jury asking if the term reasonable doubt could be expressed as a percentage.
_	The judge in Thomas' trial then, sua sponte (of his own accord), issued an order indicating a possible "manifest error of law" in connection with his "making available" jury instruction, on the ground that it may have contravened binding 8th Circuit precedent, and on the ground that a case upon which the RIAA and the Court had relied had been vacated by the Court which had issued it, without Judge Davis's knowledge.
_	Subsequently, the Court vacated the judgment, on the ground that "making available" could not be equated with "distribution" under "settled case law".
_	The Seventh Circuit dismissed the petition on the ground that the FTC lacked authority to seek such relief (that is, it had no standing to sue), since Congress had not passed any statute giving the FTC specific authority to seek a preliminary injunction.
_	Berisha had refused any recount of the votes, on the ground that the Albanian Constitution does not foresee such procedure.
_	The editor (Gibb) rejected the title "Bareface" on the ground that readers would mistake it for a Western.
_	The court struck down the Son of Sam law in New York on the ground that the law was violative of the First Amendment, which protects free speech.
_	Justice Stewart dissented on the ground that the plain language of the exclusive remedies clause clearly precludes a criminal prosecution for interfering with rights secured by the "Public Accommodations" part of the Act.
_	According to The Wall Street Journal: "A Spanish court found that César Alierta, chairman of Telefónica SA, enriched himself through insider trading before he joined the telecom company, but it acquitted him on the ground that the statute of limitations had run out".
_	Many Germans objected to the confession of guilt, on the ground that they had also suffered in the war, as a result of Allied wrongdoing (particularly Soviet).
_	However, Chesarek learned from radio traffic from the ground that he was now the target and was drawing weapons fire, and that a rocket-propelled grenade had just missed the tail of his helicopter.
_	Ermita invoked the privilege on the ground that "the information sought to be disclosed might impair our diplomatic as well as economic relations with the People’s Republic of China," and given the confidential nature in which these information were conveyed to the President, Neri "cannot provide the Committee any further details of these conversations, without disclosing the very thing the privilege is designed to protect."
_	Clause 2 of the Bill sought to amend article 31(2) of the Constitution to clarify that no law providing for the compulsory acquisition or requisitioning of property could be called in question in any Court on the ground that the amount fixed or determined under such law to be given to the owner of the property is not adequate.
_	Southern Senators opposed anti-lynching laws and other civil rights legislation on the ground that blacks were responsible for more crime, more babies born out of wedlock, more welfare and other forms of social assistance, and that strong measures were needed to keep them under control.
_	The opinion of the Privy Council states that "The American Union, on the other hand, has erected a tribunal which possesses jurisdiction to annul a Statute upon the ground that it is unconstitutional"
_	The Council investigated Hele in 1604, and the matter was referred to the Star Chamber, which found against Hele on the ground that he had gone outside due process in dealing with Cobham.
_	The concept of an open market in this general sense is sometimes criticized on the ground that participation in it is conditional on having sufficient money, income or assets.
_	Underneath that chest was a hole in the ground that led to what was called the "King's grave" PG-789.
_	The ship was promptly boarded by representatives of the Federal Government who refused Kisch entry to Australia on the ground that he was "undesirable as an inhabitant of, or visitor to, the Commonwealth".
_	Local Jews and Arabs lobbied the British about the overprint (pictured):"The Jewish members of the <nowiki>[Advisory]</nowiki> Council objected to the Hebrew transliteration of the word "Palestine", on the ground that the traditional name was "Eretz Yisrael", but the Arab members would not agree to this designation, which, in their view, had political significance.
_	The marriage was annulled in August 1928 on the ground that Mayo had another wife.
_	His election was challenged by the defeated Akali candidate Guru on the ground that he is a Muslim and thus does not belong to a scheduled caste making him ineligible to contest from a reserved seat.
_	To a summons and declaration claiming damages from the insurer of the tram, the insurer of third defendant's car (the second defendant) and the third defendant, the second defendant had excepted on the ground that the plaintiffs' injuries had neither been "caused by" nor "arisen out of" the third defendant's driving of the car within the meaning of section 11 (1) of the Motor Vehicle Insurance Act.
_	Justice Moore rejected the claim on the ground that the plaintiff had not shown that making a demand on the board would have been futile.
_	Hashim Qureshi filed Habeas Corpus, challenging the magistrate's order on the ground that his detention was illegal and that he could not be retried as per the law as he was already sentenced to life by a Pakistan court and had served a prison term for over nine years.
_	In December 2009, NEASC placed the college on probation on the ground that it was not meeting NEASC's standards for financial resources.
_	The prohibition of any advertisement or display of any contraceptives that seeks to suppress completely any information about the availability and price of contraceptives cannot be justified on the ground that advertisements of contraceptive products would offend and embarrass those exposed to them and that permitting them would legitimize sexual activity of young people.
_	At first instance the judge rejected the claim for 'cost of cure' damages on the ground that it was an unreasonable claim in the circumstances, but awarded Forsyth 'loss of amenity damages' of £2500.
_	In the 1908–09 session presided by Governor Sir Frederick Lugard, an Ordinance to amend the Magistrate's Ordinance 1890 and to effect certain other amendments in the criminal law was tabled in the Legislative Council, criminalising the Chinese habit of spitting in and out of doors were strongly dissented by Sir Ho Kai and Sir Boshan, on the ground that to penalise a universal and almost involuntary habit would antagonise the whole Chinese population.
_	However, awards such as the "Bharat Ratna" have been held to be valid by the Supreme Court on the ground that they are merely decorations and cannot be used by the recipient as a title.
_	In "Taw Cheng Kong", the respondent challenged his conviction for corruption on the ground that section 37 of the Prevention of Corruption Act, which extends the effect of the Act to corrupt acts by Singapore citizens (but not non-citizens) occurring outside Singapore, discriminated against citizens and thus violated Article 12(1).
_	During multiparty period (after 1945) Halkevleri were severely criticized on the ground that this project was a supporter of the governing Republican People’s Party.
_	Although he was initially refused on the ground that Rumeli sanjaks were not offered to princes, with the support of the vassal Crimean khan Meñli I Giray (who was his father-in-law), he was able to receive the sanjak of Semendire (modern Smederevo in Serbia), which, although it was technically in Rumeli, was quite far from Istanbul nevertheless.
_	The hands and feet were curved and the ankles and wrists did not have the usual stability needed to travel on the ground that most other "Lemurids" have.
_	Justice Benjamin Robbins Curtis, in dissent, attacked much of the Supreme Court's decision as "obiter dicta", on the ground that once the court determined that it did not have jurisdiction to hear Scott's case, it must simply dismiss the action, and not pass judgment on the merits of the claims.
_	An attempt has been made to justify Van Espen's conduct in this matter, on the ground that he merely declared that episcopal ordination performed by a single bishop was valid.
_	Previous demands by Germany's Green party and the IPPNW to construct an external control stand were refused by Hessen's environment minister Lucia Puttrich (CDU) on the ground that both units could provide each other with energy should an incident occur.
_	In its decision of 1 July 1997, in the case of "Sutherland v. United Kingdom", the European Commission of Human Rights found that Articles 8 and 14 of the European Convention on Human Rights were violated by a discriminatory age of consent, on the ground that there was no objective and reasonable justification for maintaining a higher minimum age for male homosexual acts.
_	T. M. Charles-Edwards dismisses William's account as an "improbable story" on the ground that Cornwall was by then firmly under English control.
_	After the French defeat in the Franco-Prussian War of 1870–1871, 4% of the Vosges department in the extreme northeast of the department was annexed to the German Empire by the Treaty of Frankfurt on the ground that the people there spoke Germanic dialects.
_	"The theme to the album artwork is 'jumping off of the ground that is breaking beneath you.'
_	Section 46 of the Evidence Ordinance provides that evidence shall not be excluded on the ground that it is hearsay in civil proceedings unless: the party against whom the evidence is to be adduced objects to the admission of the evidence; as well as: the court is satisfied, having regard to the circumstances of the case, that the exclusion of the evidence is not prejudicial to the interests of justice.
_	The judgment on those verdicts was reversed by the Court of Appeals for the Sixth Circuit on the ground that the federal trial judge had mishandled an out-of-court threat against a juror.
_	In some countries, adultery laws have been struck down by courts on the ground that they discriminated against women, such as Guatemala (1996), where the Guatemalan Constitutional Court struck down the adultery law based both on the Constitution’s gender equality clause and on human rights treaties including CEDAW.
_	Britain, on the ground that she had no immediate interest in the Italian question, was represented only by the Lord Stewart, the ambassador at Vienna, who was not armed with full powers, his mission being to watch the proceedings and to see that nothing was done beyond or in violation of the treaties.
_	At this critical moment the government of Honduras despatched a minister to London, who took the ground that the question at issue was one that primarily concerned Honduras, and he demanded the surrender of the islands, equally as a measure of justice to that republic, and as a means of withdrawing a dangerous issue between the United States and Great Britain, upon which each had committed itself beyond the power of receding.
_	On 26 March, the National Assembly voted 53–21 to block the referendum on the ground that it would violate the constitutional provision which prohibits popular votes on laws eliminating an unconstitutionality in the field of human rights and fundamental freedoms.
_	An example of the second scenario is "Verstappen v Port Edward Town Board", where the plaintiff sought an interdict on the ground that she was suffering health problems, as the local authority was dumping waste on the adjoining property without the requisite permit.
_	The position is controversial within some currents of egalitarian thought, and the philosopher Elizabeth S. Anderson has been a vocal critic of it — on the ground that, amongst other things, the fact that something is chosen does not necessarily make it acceptable.
_	"No citizen should question the loyalty of another citizen on the ground that he belongs to a particular community."
_	The court also made clear, through para 83 of the judgement, that Article 74(2) gives freedom to the President by making his order unquestionable on the ground that it was either contrary to the advice tendered by the ministers or was issued without obtaining any advice from the ministers.
_	He assisted her in carrying out the resolution, and he gave evidence of this statement before the magistrates but prefaced his evidence by a declaration that he must withhold any further information on the ground that it had been received under the seal of "sacramental confession".
_	However, the Dean and Chapter declined to admit him on the ground that there was no room, until Burghley remonstrated with them.
_	The Golak Nath family petitioned under Article 32 of the Constitution of India, on the ground that the 1953 Act denied them their constitutional rights to acquire and hold properties and practice any profession under Articles 19 (f) and 19 (g).
_	About 1517 he was one of twelve challengers chosen to tilt against the King and his companions, but excused himself on the ground that he feared to run against the King's person.
_	The initial application for a work permit for Anderson was rejected on the ground that he did not have enough international caps.
_	During this phase of the war the 59th Battalion was not committed to any major attacks, but it did play a defensive role at the end of the Second Battle of Bullecourt in May, holding the ground that the Australians had gained earlier in the fighting.
_	In his "History of Civilization in England", "Buckle criticized historians on the ground that they were too much interested in biography and in military and political history and failed to seek universal principle or laws."
_	The college, renamed once again to "Woman's College of Alabama," moved all of its furniture, lab chemicals, and records into Hamner Hall in Montgomery August 24, 1909, but the building burned to the ground that night, destroying the records of the college's first 50 years and all of its belongings.
_	Admitting that his refusal to obey the order was wilful, the petitioner defended his conduct on the ground that he was entitled to a statutory exemption from all forms of national service since the facts he had presented to the board showed that he was a 'regular or duly ordained' minister.
_	To this complaint the defendants severally demurred on the ground that it did not state facts sufficient to constitute a cause of action.
_	This Hundred Days Offensive resulted in the Germans retreating or being driven from all of the ground that they had taken in the Spring Offensive, the collapse of the Hindenburg Line, and the capitulation of the German Empire that November.
_	From various locations in Puerto Rico, Begnaud filed multiple reports of conditions on the ground that were broadcast through CBS News.
_	Justice Brennan concurred on the ground that while denying indigents access to the courts for nonpayment of a fee is a denial of due process, it is also a denial of equal protection of the laws, and no distinction can be drawn between divorce suits and other actions.
_	During Alvarado's murder trial in a state court, motions to suppress the statements given by Alvarado were denied on the ground that Alvarado was not in police custody at the time of the interrogation and thus did not have to be read his Miranda rights.
_	In 2009, calls for recognition were denied on the ground that law only granted aboriginal status to those whose parents were registered as aboriginal.
_	However, this dating was disputed by Hypatius of Ephesus, who met the monophysite party during the 532 meeting with Emperor Justinian I; Hypatius denied its authenticity on the ground that none of the Fathers or Councils ever cited or referred to it.
_	Greenpeace has called clause 3.7 of the Kyoto Protocol the ""Australia clause"" on the ground that it unfairly made Australia a major beneficiary.
_	I can recall three or four balls that were blown for picking off the ground that I didn’t think were off the ground.
_	Here, China objected on the ground that sanctions only work to victimize civilians and due to their coinciding with the Abuja peace talks; sanctions could forego any potential positive outcome of those talks.
_	In a case over the disputed will of Gahan's friend John Butler, 12th Baron Dunboyne, the priest refused to answer certain questions on the ground that to do so would violate the seal of the confessional, despite a ruling(which was overturned in the twentieth century) that the common law did not recognize the seal of the confessional as a ground for refusing to answer.
_	As a result, the Court has considerable discretion to refuse to hear these petitions filed directly before it on the ground that such should have been filed instead with the Court of Appeals or the appropriate lower court.
_	There was no need to twist the meaning of words to reach a fair result,if unfair contract terms could be scrapped on the ground that one party had unequal bargaining power.
_	The Castle at this point was level with the ground that it was built upon.
_	The Scottish heirs protested in court on the ground that the bequests to Fischer had been made for an immoral consideration (i.e. “ob turpem causa”).
_	However, in "Yong Vui Kong v. Public Prosecutor" (2010), the Court of Appeal distinguished Privy Council cases such as "Reyes", "Hughes", "Fox" and "Watson" on the ground that were decided in different textual contexts, as inhuman punishment was expressly prohibited by the constitutions of the respective jurisdictions from which the cases originated.
_	Historically, British industry opposed metrication on the ground that most of British exports went to countries that used the imperial or US customary systems of units.
_	In the "Panama Refining" case, however, the Court struck down the provision on the ground that Congress had set "no criterion to govern the President's course."
_	Clark dissented on the ground that neither the equal protection clause nor the due process clause requires more than what is provided in the California rule.
_	On August 13, 2018, she ruled against Concord Management and Consulting, one of 16 Russian entities charged by Special Prosecutor Robert Mueller, when it sought to void its indictment on the ground that his appointment to his position violated Constitutional separation of powers.
_	Later, however, she later partly dismissed it, mostly on the ground that she disagreed with Stirner about the nature of God: Stirner saw God as a repressive idea, imposed from the outside, from society, so it could control the individual.
_	The plaintiffs sued for $50,000 damages on the ground that Franklin and Wilkinson, while in their employ, took "certain new ideas with regard to automobiles, models and drawings belonging to them and formed the H. H. Franklin Manufacturing Company giving them no returns for the money they had spent in developing the machines."
_	They had been refused a hearing about the original railway on the ground that they had no "locus standi".
_	Many different economic and moral arguments were made to either justify or else criticise the incomes gained from different activities, on the ground that they were "productive" or "unproductive", "earned" or "unearned", "wealth-creating" or "wealth-consuming".
_	Her memorial garden features a life-size statue and a large electronic keyboard set in the ground that can be played by visitors who walk on its keys.
_	The first is from an African bishop named Pontianus, in which he entreats the emperor to withdraw the Three Chapters on the ground that their condemnation struck at the Council of Chalcedon.
_	Emmel called obstruction on the ground that López's action, within the language of the rule, had "impede[d] the progress of" Crawford by not letting him see precisely when it was safe for him to leave the base.
_	In retaliation, Cleomenes urged Leotychidas, a relative and personal enemy of Demaratus, to claim the throne on the ground that the latter was not really the son of Ariston, but of Agetus, his mother's first husband.
_	The injunction was granted on the ground that there was an overwhelming need to ensure that provincial laws are respected.
_	They requested that the court declare the statute unconstitutional on the ground that it denies persons under eighteen years of age equal protection of the law in violation of the Fourteenth Amendment.
_	Numan counsel him against doing so on the ground that public support had not been sufficiently organized to risk a confrontation with the Imam.
_	This explains the apparent non-existence of compassionate release on the ground that a prisoner has given birth.
_	Lord Palmerston was put to great straits in his defence, as it could not be denied that Burnes's despatches had been changed; but Benjamin Disraeli came to his rescue, and on the ground that the matter was now twenty years old advised the house not to reopen it.
_	Lau Chin-shek of the Hong Kong Christian Industrial Committee was initially nominated by a labour joint conference to stand for selection by was turned down by Xu Jiatun on the ground that "quite a few businessmen in Hong Kong resented him."
_	Folded-unipole antenna sites are affected less by disturbances near the ground that cause attenuation in other monopole antenna designs.
_	Ellis and Watkins sought reversal at the appellate level on the ground that the trial judge had erred in compelling Izzard's testimony.
_	The other two were Surrey wicketkeeper Dennis Sullivan, who was born in Mitcham, and amateur Burnett Bullock, who was "mine host" at the public house opposite the ground that now bears his name.
_	His contempt of court charge was also upheld on the ground that it was not disputed; similarly, he was unable to dispute the charge because there had been no hearing to do it in.
_	Despite his protest, and their previous agreement with Martin V, the cardinals of the conclave that followed the latter's death (1431) refused to recognize Capranica's nomination, and the new pope, Pope Eugene IV, sustained their decision on the ground that the delivery of the hat and assignment of the title were necessary for the validity of a cardinal's nomination.
_	Mr. Kondolf dealt with calls by Broadway producers for the abolition of the project, on the ground that it was unfair competition.
_	(Though the miscreants were arrested and tried by the Sessions Court at Bombay, later on they were all acquitted on the ground that the panchanamas were defective and that the eye–witnesses were not produced).
_	He discounts Oates' involvement on the ground that he was a physical coward; Bedloe's conduct suggests that he had heard something about the murder from his underworld connections but was not directly involved.
_	California cross-appealed on the ground that the district court should have dismissed the action for want of equity, rather than for lack of merit.
_	This contrasts with the conventional national accounting procedure, where many property rents are excluded from new value-added and net product on the ground that they do not reflect a productive contribution.
_	He opposed commercial development on ordinary European lines on the ground that it involved the existence both of a dangerous proletariat and of a prosperous middle class equally inimical to autocracy.
_	The château was approached by a long double allée of trees forming one of three avenues that met at a "patte d'oie" before the outer gates, which curved inwards to form half of a circle on the ground that was completed by the pattern formed by the three approaching approaches through the town; this nodal feature, with its flanking pavilions, survives, in the town's "place du Cardinal".
_	The appointment was subjected to an unsuccessful legal challenge on the ground that Bodkin had retired from the Bar at the time; when asked in Parliament what had induced the (illiterate) complainant to lodge his affidavit against Bodkin, the then Chief Secretary for Ireland, Augustine Birrell, replied, apparently with complete truth: ‘A pint of porter’. Maume (1999, p. 92) says Bodkin had ‘dubious legal qualifications’, but there is no doubt that he had wide experience as a barrister and on his own account had defended some twenty people on capital charges.
_	The dealers then sought an injunction against enforcement of the order on the ground that the order violated the Federal Constitution's commerce clause (Art I, 8, cl 3).
_	In October, 2016 the Clerical Assembly of the Armenian Patriarchate of Turkey decided to superannuate the Patriarch Mesrob II on the ground that he has been unable to perform his duty for 7 years and announced that there will be an application for starting the election process.
_	Under the provisions of Article 31, which themselves were amended several times later, laws placed in the Ninth Schedule could not be challenged in a court of law on the ground that they violated the fundamental rights of citizens.
_	Again. the Patent Office (initially) rejected the application on the ground that the product was obvious over the prior art.
_	The Central Election Commission refused to register fourteen candidates on the ground that some of their collected signatures were supposedly forged, seven of which appealed the decision with the Supreme Court.
_	The same committee declined to order parish ministers to keep registers of deaths, on the ground that 'none or few of the ministrie had manses or gleebes for residence.
_	Hess issued a decree stating: "No National Socialist may suffer any detriment on the ground that he does not profess any particular faith or confession or on the ground that he does not make any religious profession at all."
_	He succeeded at the "Reichstag" of Speyer in 1544 in obtaining a new letter of protection for the German Jews from the emperor, wherein they were expressly allowed to charge a much higher rate of interest than the Christians, on the ground that they had to pay much higher taxes than the latter, though all handicrafts and the cultivation of land were prohibited to them.
_	Raymond then proceeded to stage a gas leak in the Tall Ship with Kennedy's Zippo Lighter that was thrown onto the ground that set it alight as the gas leaks in.
_	Harlan, J., concurred in the judgment on the ground that the state statute bore a rational relation to a constitutionally permissible objective.
_	The banks conceded that they had converted the pieces of paper, but denied liability for the face value of the instruments on the ground that by virtue of section 64(1) of the Bills of Exchange Act 1882 the materially altered cheque or draft was avoided and therefore worthless in their hands.
_	"If this law, therefore, is constitutional, it must be supported on the ground that the lakes and navigable waters connecting them are within the scope of admiralty and maritime jurisdiction, as known and understood in the United States when the Constitution was adopted."
_	Some, such as David Lewis, have objected to paraconsistent logic on the ground that it is simply impossible for a statement and its negation to be jointly true.
_	However, in July, the Prime Minister led ACC rejected this proposal on the ground that the officer had not completed requisite cooling off period between two deputations.
_	The Minister reassessed the taxpayer on the ground that the entire amount constituted income from a business.
_	Chatterton granted the injunction on the ground that the Corporation had exceeded its statutory powers; rather unwisely, he also attacked the merits of the decision, accusing the Corporation of "sentimental notions".
_	Tennessee later moved to vacate the consent decree largely on the ground that the state was in substantial compliance with the decree's provisions.
_	As for the company's name, the plan was to use a contraction of Adi's nickname and last name (much as Rudolf originally contemplated by naming his firm "Ruda" before deciding on "Puma"), but "Addas" was rejected on the ground that it was used by a children's shoe manufacturer.
_	Following investigations, he was detained with a view to removal from the UK on the ground that he had obtained an entry certificate by deception.
_	Despite objections from William Bedloe, Scroggs permitted female observers like Mary, Lady Worcester to take notes of the evidence, on the ground that "a woman's notes will not signify, truly - no more than her tongue".
_	In 1864, Governor Johnson said, "The better class of them will go to work and sustain themselves, and that class ought to be allowed to vote, on the ground that a loyal negro is more worthy than a disloyal white man."
_	In "Eason v Newman" , a finder of a chattel was held liable on the ground that he had wrongfully refused to return it to the true owner.
_	On July 28, 1786, the authorities decided that he should not be charged, on the ground that he must be mentally unbalanced.
_	Holstein did not approve the later developments of German policy in the Morocco, on the ground that the result would merely be to strengthen the Anglo-French entente.
_	Although absent from Gibraltar, Xiberras continued his involvement in the politics of Gibraltar by authoring various articles and letters in the local press, opposing the 2002 Joint Sovereignty Deal between the British and Spanish Governments and also the European Constitution, on the ground that it would "make Gibraltar a disputed territory 'in perpetuity'".
_	In that capacity, in 1771, he pleaded the cause of Mr Le Boeuf de Valdahon in a famous case against the who was opposing Valdahon's marriage to his daughter, on the ground that he had seduced her eight years before, while she was still under-age.
_	By 1326 his influence was such that there were rumours of a conspiracy to make him King of Ireland; modern historians tend to dismiss the story, on the ground that the alleged conspirators were other magnates who were more interested in increasing their own power than aggrandising Desmond.
_	The head of the Pattani Dutch trading post, Victor Sprinckel, refused on the ground that he was too busy dealing with Portuguese opposition in Southeast Asia.
_	After the Act of Union 1800 the Recorder was eligible to sit in the English House of Commons, although an objection was made to this in 1832, on the ground that a judge should not sit in Parliament.
_	On April 12, 2018 Bangladesh High Court banned the "two-finger test" on the ground that the tests have no scientific merit or evidential value.
_	He appealed the conviction, in part on the ground that the government's prosecution of him was "unconstitutionally selective."
_	Several members dissented from its inclusion on the ground that it is in common use throughout the country; and a naval officer who was present said that it has for years been a popular expression in the service for a tool or implement, the exact name of which is unknown or has for the moment been forgotten.
_	In 1933 an application by a bus operator to run a service paralleling the line was refused by the Road Traffic Commissioners, on the ground that the line's precarious finances meant that it would close if the bus service operated.
_	Soon he was arrested by the French government, tried at Lyon, and sentenced by a police-court magistrate (under a special law passed on the fall of the Paris Commune) to five years' imprisonment, on the ground that he had belonged to the IWA (1883).
_	Lord Slynn and Lord Steyn dissented from this conclusion on the ground that it was for the national court to assess the effect and that on the facts the statistics were not significant enough.
_	Newton rejected this idea, mainly on the ground that both men apparently could only envision light as a longitudinal wave, like sound and other mechanical waves in fluids.
_	The motion was rejected on the ground that it would be more costly for the municipality to rework the city's land use plan and cancel existing contracts than to continue the construction.
_	In the discussion on the Grand Remonstrance he assailed the doctrine that bishops had brought popery and idolatry into the church, and he subsequently defended the retention of bishops on the ground that, if the prizes of the lottery were taken away, few would care to acquire learning.
_	In November 2003, Judge Lourdes Baird granted Sony Music's motion for summary judgment on the ground that Laws's state law claims were preempted by Section 301 of the United States Copyright Act.
_	They saw a group of women, poking with a long stick something on the ground that looked like a piece of ivory.
_	On February 24, 1965, however, Federal Judge William Harold Cox, an ardent segregationist, threw out the indictments against all conspirators other than Rainey and Price on the ground that the other seventeen were not acting "under color of state law."
_	In November 1892, stranded on rocks at the entrance to Ferrol Harbour; Fairfax as officer commanding the squadron was court-martialled but was acquitted on the ground that the chart in use was unreliable.
_	Almost simultaneously the negotiations assumed two phases: (a) respecting the ratification of a treaty in which lurked the possibility that American citizens who were not Christians might be discriminated against, and (b) concerning the actual discrimination in Switzerland against American citizens, on the ground that they belonged to the Jewish faith.
_	It strikes me that men who are accustomed to contemplate the active or passive extirpation of the weak, the unfortunate, and the superfluous; who justify that conduct on the ground that it has the sanction of the cosmic process, and is the only way of ensuring the progress of the race; who, if they are consistent, must rank medicine among the black arts and count the physician a mischievous preserver of the unfit; on whose matrimonial undertakings the principles of the stud have the chief influence; whose whole lives, therefore, are an education in the noble art of suppressing natural affection and sympathy, are not likely to have any large stock of these commodities left.
_	The opposition-dominated senate objected on the ground that toxic wastes would be sent to the Philippines; the government denied this due to the diplomatic notes which stated that it would not be accepting Japanese waste in exchange for economic concessions.
_	According to Russell, Thomas advocates the indissolubility of marriage "on the ground that the father is useful in the education of the children, (a) because he is more rational than the mother, (b) because, being stronger, he is better able to inflict physical punishment."
_	He sought to defend on the ground that as a Jehovah's Witness he was a minister of religion and that he had been improperly denied exemption from service, because the classifying agencies acted arbitrarily and capriciously in refusing to classify him as IV-D.
_	Immediately after Christmas, the Latin Patriarch of Jerusalem, Arnulf of Chocques, was deposed on the ground that his election had been uncanonical, and with Bohemund's support, Dagobert was elected in his place.
_	The High Court case of "Re Fong Thin Choo" (1991) is authority for the fact that, in Singapore, a public authority's decision may be challenged on the ground that it is based on no evidence or insufficient evidence.
_	Merlin de Douai convinced the Committee of Public Safety to agree with the closing of the Jacobin Club, on the ground that it was an administrative rather than a legislative measure.
_	On the other hand, the relevant Singaporean provision is Order 15, rule 16, of the Rules of Court, which reads: "No action or other proceedings shall be open to objection on the ground that a merely declaratory judgment or order is sought thereby, and the Court may make binding declarations "of right" whether or not any consequential relief is or could be claimed."
_	On April 27, 1893, Bentley was found guilty, but the verdict was overturned by the judge on the ground that the jury did not adequately consider all the evidence.
_	It was not known by any of the U.S. forces on the ground that day that the B-1B Sniper Pod was incapable of detecting infrared strobes, which is one of the primary methods used by coalition forces to identify friendly forces at nighttime.
_	The claim was upheld on the ground that the plaintiff had subsequently cancelled the sale.
_	In 1651 he was assigned by the court as one of the counsel for Christopher Love on his trial for high treason in plotting with the Scots to bring about the restoration of the monarchy; but exception was taken to Archer on the ground that he had not subscribed the engagement to be true to the commonwealth, as required by a resolution of the House of Commons passed on 11 October 1649, to be subscribed by public functionaries 'and by' all sergeants at law, counsellors, officers, ministers, and clerks, and all attorneys and solicitors.
_	When the seven bishops were discharged from his custody he demanded fees of them; but they refused, on the ground that their detention and Hales's commission were both illegal.
_	The D.C. District Court dismissed the case on the ground that any restrictions on "independent" spending amounted to an unconstitutional abridgment of freedom of speech.
_	The borough appealed on the ground that Guarnieri's lawsuit and grievance were not protected under the First Amendment as they did not address matters of public concern, a view affirmed by Courts outside the Third Circuit.
_	Defeated, Shylock concedes to accepting Bassanio's offer of money for the defaulted bond, first his offer to pay "the bond thrice", which Portia rebuffs, telling him to take his bond, and then merely the principal, which Portia also prevents him from doing on the ground that he has already refused it "in the open court".
_	In his ruling Justice Longe averred among other things that,"...the Attorney general did not oppose the objection raised by counsel to the 'accused' persons, Chief Rotimi Williams, on the ground that the information was filed by private prosecutor (Chief Gani Fawehinmi) when the information had not been completed and especially when the 'INFORMATION IMPLICATED ONE OF THE PROSECUTION WITNESSES'(Kayode Soyinka)...the proof of evidence before the Court was mere HEARSAY….
_	Tom Stott, a former employee at Turner's, warned that any development of the site could be an environmental disaster, and that there could be so much asbestos waste in the ground that serious disturbance could lead to "Rochdale's Chernobyl."
_	Hammond was tried by court-martial, and unanimously acquitted (28 November 1644), on the ground that he had acted in self-defence.
_	Fowke states that the grounds were not purposefully smoothed out by the builders, and that the ground is naturally like that and that the ground is no more special than the ground that surrounds it without works built upon it.
_	The Nantlle Valley is famous within Wales for being the main setting of the Fourth branch of the Mabinogion - 'Math fab Manawydan' - the story of Lleu LLaw Gyffes, Blodeuwedd and Gwydion, the story is set mainly in the area with Gwydion finding Lleu transfigured into an eagle in an oak tree at Baladeulyn - the ground that used to exist between the two lakes before industrialisation.
_	The Bull's first breath blows a hole in the ground that one hundred men fall into and its second breath creates another hole, trapping two hundred more.
_	According to Catholic teaching, the essential note of faith lies in the complete and unhesitating acceptance of the whole "depositum" on the ground that it is the revealed word of God.
_	He then, at the ensuing summer Assizes (1633), laid the matter fairly before the justices and grand jury, professing his inability to comply with the royal mandate on the ground that the order had been made by the joint consent of the whole bench, and was in fact a mere confirmation and enlargement of similar orders made in the county since the time of Queen Elizabeth, all which he substantiated from the county records.
_	William Westbrooke Burton, the third judge, objected to this on the ground that his previous appointment as a judge at the Cape of Good Hope made him senior to Dowling.
_	During the "kurultay" after Taspar's death, Ishbara (then called Shetu), who was also a claimant, saw that he had no chance and supported the pacifist Anlo against Apa on the ground that Apa's mother was not of noble birth.
_	The clergy successfully opposed the renewal of these privileges on the ground that they were contrary to the canonical regulations.
_	The California Superior Court dismissed the charges against Greenwood and Van Houten on the ground that unwarranted trash searches violated the U.S. Constitution's Fourth Amendment, as well as the California Constitution.
_	The original Irish name for Sixmilecross is 'Na Corracha Mora', this refers to marshy ground, probably the ground that runs along the Glusha river at the back of the village.
_	On December 2, 2010, the Mississippi Supreme Court issued its decision, in which it held that Maye was entitled to a new trial on the ground that the trial court had improperly refused to issue a self-defense instruction that would have highlighted for the jury Maye's right to act in defense of his infant daughter, who was present in the home on the night of the police raid that led to the shooting.
_	This agreement, moreover, may be explained on the ground that the comments and interpretations in question are very old, and were included both in the Babylonian Talmud and in the Palestinian sources used by the redactor of the Shir ha-Shirim midrash (see below; comp. also Theodar, "Zur Composition der Agadischen Homilien," in "Monatsschrift," 1879, p. 343).
_	Nevoy was appointed to the bench by Charles II of England, and was admitted "without trial or examination, on the ground that he had been nominated by the king in place of the viscount Oxford".
_	Article 29 of the Law concerning involuntary hospitalization in a mental hospital shall not apply to senior officials and the judiciary on the ground that they are vested with parliamentary or judicial immunity.
_	As a discretionary, equitable remedy, specific performance was refused on the ground that considerable hardship would be caused.
_	For the most part, Sherman refused to revise his original text on the ground that "I disclaim the character of historian, but assume to be a witness on the stand before the great tribunal of history" and "any witness who may disagree with me should publish his own version of [the] facts in the truthful narration of which he is interested."
_	Originally built as the permanent ground of the local Orrell rugby union team, but the club departed the stadium in 2007, with the development team of Wigan Warriors beginning to use the ground that same year.
_	Present also are swamps and hardwood wetlands along the Suwannee, along with many sinkhole ponds, including one with a cave 90 feet below the ground that connects to a popular divers' destination known as the catfish hotel.
_	They see a cylinder in the ground that looks like a well.
_	In March 2005, Weinstein of Brooklyn Federal Court dismissed a lawsuit filed by the Vietnamese victims of Agent Orange against producers of chemicals defoliants/herbicides, denying millions to those poisoned by the rainbow defoliants, on the ground that use of the herbicide in warfare had been legal under the international law of the time.
_	The Court cited "Arlington Heights v. Metropolitan Housing Corp." to apply a heightened form of review, a two-part test: "When a statute gender-neutral on its face is challenged on the ground that its effects upon women are disproportionably adverse, a twofold inquiry is thus appropriate.
_	His liberty was demanded in April by Sir Allen Apsley, on the ground that he was one of the Duke of York's menial servants; the gaolers delayed until the case went to the House of Lords.
_	Sarsaparilla, which for more than a hundred years later was a highly esteemed drug, was detected by Pitt to be inert; and he condemned the use of bezoar, of powder of vipers, of mummy, and of many other once famous therapeutic agents, on the ground that accurate tests proved them of no effect.
_	This approach was criticized by Joseph Greenberg on the ground that genetic classification is necessarily prior to linguistic reconstruction, but this criticism has so far had no effect on Nostraticist theory and practice.
_	Cato changed his mind and supported this on the ground that any government was better than no government.
_	However, the DC-3 design's fuselage was so high off the ground that loading from most truck beds was difficult, and its narrow door and weak floor could not sustain heavy cargo.
_	This Amazaspes, as time went on, was denounced to the Emperor Justinian by one of his friends, Acacius by name, on the ground that he was abusing the Armenians and wished to give over to the Persians Theodosiopolis and certain other fortresses.
_	The government in an inter-ministerial meeting on May 5 banned import and assembly of the vehicles and decided to send off-road those already plying, primarily on the ground that it consumes electricity mostly through illegal connections.
_	Because the Quarantine Station has experienced over 150 years of quarantine activity, there is a layering of evidence on and in the ground that reflects the slow growth of the Station, the major development and redevelopment programs, and the subsequent removals and constructions.
_	It won reversals of these convictions in "Norris v. Alabama", , on the ground that the exclusion of blacks from the jury pool had violated the defendants' constitutional rights.
_	Article 809 has been much criticised by family lawyers and the Korean Law Association on the ground that it infringes on the freedom of choice in marriage, and that it reinforces traditional paternalism.
_	Alarmed at the new growth of the Jesuits, Alexander published an edict on December 20, 1815 expelling them from St. Petersburg and taking over their High School on the ground that the Jesuits were using it to convert Russian nobles to Catholicism.
_	In April 1998, Michael Beloff QC, sitting as a Commissioner of the Royal Court, struck out legal proceedings brought by Syvret challenging the legality of his suspension from the States assembly on the ground that the court had no jurisdiction over the legislature's internal procedures.
_	In fact he was offered the office of Lord Chief Justice of Ireland: but his English colleagues advised him to refuse it, on the ground that he would shortly be offered a place on the English Bench.
_	He proposes to her but is refused on the ground that she does not want to marry someone who is not in the profession.
_	The Bill sought to add to the Ninth Schedule to the Constitution, 14 additional legislations relating to land reforms, enacted by the States of Assam, Bihar, Haryana, Tamil Nadu, Uttar Pradesh and West Bengal and the Union territory of Goa, Daman and Diu with a view to provide that the enactments shall not be deemed to be void on the ground that they are inconsistent with any of the provisions of Part III of the Constitution relating to Fundamental Rights.
_	Russell wrote that, if he claims that a teapot orbits the Sun somewhere in space between the Earth and Mars, it is nonsensical for him to expect others to believe him on the ground that they cannot prove him wrong.
_	Another school of thought refuses to bend the excessive leads of components and use them for wiring, on the ground that this makes removing a component later hard or impossible, e.g. when a repair is needed.
_	Negroponte was opposed to early drafts of peace settlements on the ground that they would have left undisturbed what he described as an enormous threat presented by expansion of the Nicaraguan armed forces with Soviet and Cuban aid.
_	He turned down the second proposal to escape to Mecca on the ground that he had heard from Muhammad that a man of the Quraish would be buried in Mecca on whom would be half the chastisement of the world, and he did not want to be that person.
_	He rejected the third proposal on the ground that he could not forsake Medina.
_	While the effect of an over-inclusive classification may be to accord similar treatment to persons differently placed, courts have nonetheless justified it on the ground that the exigencies of the situation require such classification.
_	Columella in his "Res Rustica" states that for slaves kept chained in the underground ergastulum it should be as healthful as possible and be lit by windows with narrow bars which are far enough from the ground that it is not possible to reach them by hand.
_	After Worrall's conviction by jury, Dallas had moved for a judgment of acquittal on the ground that the Judiciary Act of 1789 did not empower the circuit court to try common law crimes (in 1798, there was no federal statute criminalizing the bribery of the relevant federal official).
_	Guillaume du Bellay and his brother Jean du Bellay wrote in defense of the alliance, at the same time minimizing it and legitimizing on the ground that Francis I was defending himself against an aggression.
_	Synechism is specially directed to the question of hypothesis, and holds that a hypothesis is justifiable only on the ground that it provides an explanation.
_	Sztybel contends that Singer's philosophy of animal liberation is not really about liberating animals in general; he accuses Singer of being a speciesist for defending the vivisection of animals on the ground that they have inferior cognitive capacities.
_	Bristol-Myers sought to dismiss the claims of the non-California resident plaintiffs on the ground that the courts of California, a state where the company was neither incorporated not headquarters, lacked personal jurisdiction over the company with respect to claimants who were not injured in California.
_	An advocate of the staple system on the ground that, while it made possible exchange without usury, it was favourable to freedom of enterprise and the development of commerce, he denounced the usurious practices of the new school, and argued that the monopoly of the Merchant Adventurers led to the growth of London at the expense of the outports, deprived merchants of free traffic, and diminished the revenue.
_	Street artists often use tricks of point-of-view to create 2-dimensional scenes on the ground that appear 3-dimensional.
_	In 1992, Timbers wrote a majority opinion that upheld, by a 2-1 vote, a district court ruling that blocked the extradition of former Irish Republican Army (IRA) member Peter McMullen to Britain, on the ground that the 1986 Supplementary Extradition Treaty between the United States and Britain unlawfully singled out McMullen and two other men for punishment.
_	He also considers pregnant women and their unborn babies to be valid targets on the ground that the babies could grow up to join the Israeli Army.
_	Dr. C.D. Salfield, a neighborhood activist, announced that he would sue to prevent the construction "on the ground that the addition of another story would be a violation of the building ordinance, and that it was bad policy to compel small children to climb several flights of stairs."
_	Employees having priority among creditors, albeit not above fixed security holders, dates back to 1897, and is justified on the ground that employees are particularly incapable, unlike banks, of diversifying their risk, and forms one of the requirements in the ILO Protection of Workers' Claims (Employer's Insolvency) Convention.
_	Most anti-aircraft missiles of the era use semi-active radar homing, with an "illumination radar" on the ground that reflected signals off the target that were picked up by a small receiver in the missile's nose.
_	The policy of the Rudd government contrasts with that of the former Australian government, which refused to ratify the agreement on the ground that following the protocol would be costly.
_	Judge White moved for summary judgment on the ground that he was entitled to "judicial immunity" from a civil damages suit.
_	The basic facts of the case are similar to "Cadder", but Salduz had challenged on the ground that his "confession" (later retracted) had been given under duress, due to maltreatment during interrogation.
_	In 1963, he was the author of a controversial opinion that banned the sale in New York State of "Tropic of Cancer," a novel by Henry Miller, on the ground that it was pornographic.
_	However, following some controversies, the Amateur Athletic Federation of India (AAFI) did not ratify the national record on the ground that no dope tests had been carried out during the meet.
_	This gives the landowner a statutory period of time [65 business days] to object to the adverse possession, object to the application on the ground that there has not actually been the necessary 10 years’ adverse possession, and/or to serve a "counter-notice".
_	However, Narla vehemently resented criticism of the play by the official journal of the Sahitya Academy, on the ground that being the mouthpiece of the publishers it should not voice criticism of the work.
_	In his last days, Narla took up cudgels against Viswanatha Satyanarayana, on the ground that he promoted revivalism.
_	In a logical criticism, an objection is raised about an idea, argument, action or situation on the ground that it does not make rational sense (there is something wrong with it because it is illogical, it does not follow, or it violates basic conventions of meaning;– see Straight and Crooked Thinking).
_	Two U.S. citizens, Charles Cook and Bernard Stokes, who married citizens of Guyana filed a suit challenging the INS procedure for determining whether to grant preferential status on the ground that the two non-citizens were "immediate relative" of U.S. citizens.
_	Soon after his arrival in Ireland Essex asked him to declare himself his friend only, and to detach himself from Sir Robert Cecil but Grey declined on the ground that he was indebted to Cecil.
_	In a Times Of India interview in 2006, the birth centenary year of Golwalkar, former spokesperson Vaidya disowned the book on the ground that it was "neither representing the views of the grown Guruji nor of the RSS".
_	By an order of the parliamentary committee, dated 8 March 1649, he was granted a fifth of the annual value of the living for the support of his family, but his successor, John Ley, succeeded in obtaining a dispensation from this payment in 1652, on the ground that Hyde was possessed of lands and woods in Wiltshire, and that his wife's father was wealthy.
_	Many of his comic strips feature a single, striped sock standing upright on the ground that appears once in each story that acts as a trademark.
_	When Columbian refused the request on the ground that "women did not have the mentality for law", the two women became determined to complete the students' education themselves and to found a co-educational law school that was specifically open to women.
_	Finally, the shark falls into a hole in the ground that the townspeople dug to catch it.
_	R. N. Dogra the Chief Engineer of Chandigarh persuaded Prof M. S. Thacker, then Member of the Planning Commission to set up an IIT at Delhi on the ground that the country was divided into five regions, and all but the North had an IIT each.
_	This is not a very efficient method due to the difficulty of eliminating all the surrounding berries littering the ground that will soon replace the removed material.
_	On April 2, 2008 the Seventh Circuit Court of Appeals reversed a judgment in favor of Google, on the ground that the case had been pursued using contradictory principles, both treating those companies as extensions of Stoller himself, and as separate legal entities.
_	The United States District Court for the Eastern District of Michigan dismissed the criminal indictment on the ground that it was not an "emission standard," but a "work practice standard," which under the terms of the statute, did not carry criminal liability.
_	Muhammad Zaman Mirza, the fugitive Mughal general made his claim on the ground that Bahadur's mother adopted him as her son.
_	In a letter to the Israeli historian Otto Dov Kulka of December 8, 1986, Nolte criticized the work of the French Holocaust denier Robert Faurisson on the ground that the Holocaust did occur, but went on to argue that Faurisson's work was motivated by what Nolte claimed were the admirable motives of sympathy towards the Palestinians and opposition to Israel.
_	In Russe, the local committee did not approve a meeting with him on the ground that he had not filed a preliminary summary of the matters he was about to address.
_	Outrageous government conduct is a criminal defense that presupposes the defendant's predisposition to commit the crime but seeks dismissal of the indictment on the ground that the conduct of law enforcement agents was "so outrageous that due process principles would absolutely bar the government from invoking judicial process to obtain a conviction."
_	Muhammad Zaman Mirza, the fugitive Mughal prince made his claim on the ground that Bahadur's mother adopted him as her son.
_	About 20 years ago excavations were made at the base of it to discover what means had been used to plant it so firmly in the ground that it had borne the whole weight of the mill and withstood the winter storms for two hundred years.
_	Hard plastic "skate guards" are used when the skater must walk in his or her skates when not on the ice, to protect the blade from dirt or material on the ground that may dull the blade.
_	Directly beneath the mural was a large window embedded into the ground that looked down into the underground law library.
_	In February 2016, the appeal court reversed the district court decision on the ground that the claimants did not have standing to bring the claim.
_	The general principles mentioned by Watermeyer CJ, in "R v Attwood", are that an accused is entitled to an acquittal on the ground that he was acting in self-defence if it appears as a reasonable possibility on the evidence
_	All five judges upheld the appeal on the ground that the French authorities had no intention to try him at this stage; four of the judges also upheld the argument that the European Arrest Warrant prohibited surrendering Mr Bailey to France because the alleged offence occurred outside French territory and there was an absence of reciprocity.
_	The judgment was reversed by the Supreme Court of Pennsylvania on the ground that the deceased was not a passenger within the meaning of the proviso, and a judgment was rendered for defendant, to which this writ of error was prosecuted.
_	They can also be sustained on the ground that they do not affect the basic structure of the constitution or on the fact that they are reasonable restrictions on the fundamental rights in public interest.
_	In "Sykes v Walls" , a claim of wrongful detention by a bailee was upheld as a good claim on the ground that a refusal to deliver up constituted a "misfeasance".
_	The change was criticized on the ground that it leads to "a race to the bottom".
_	The Third Circuit reversed, on the ground that dismissal for forum non conveniens is never appropriate where the law of the alternative forum is less favorable to the plaintiff.
_	A U.S. federal judge awarded the treasure to Spain in December 2009, on the ground that the ship remained the property of Spain, but Odyssey appealed the ruling.
_	Its identification of bargaining units was within its discretion, including its exclusion of suburban newsboys on the ground that they were not in the union.
_	Article 31, as it stood prior to the Amendment, specially provided that no law providing for the compulsory acquisition or requisitioning of property which either fixes or specifies on which and the manner in which the compensation is to be determined and given, shall be called in question in any court on the ground that the compensation provided by that law is inadequate.
_	His Austrian policy has been much criticized, on the ground that in establishing the system of dualism he gave too much to Hungary, and did not really understand multinational Austrian affairs; and the Austro-Hungarian crisis during the early years of the 20th century has given point to this view.
_	Marxist economists object to this accounting procedure on the ground that the monetary imputation made refers to a flow of income which does not exist, because most home owners do not rent out their homes if they are living in them.
_	In "Marbury", the Supreme Court held that Madison's failure to deliver the commission to Marbury was illegal, but did not grant Marbury a writ of mandamus on the ground that § 13 of the Judiciary Act of 1789 was unconstitutional insofar as it authorized the Court to issue such writs under its original jurisdiction.
_	The King of Greece tendered him the grand cross of the Order of San Sauveur, but Leon declined on the ground that it was anti-republican.
_	He was opposed to the summoning of the states-general advocated by Malesherbes (6 May 1775), possibly on the ground that the two privileged orders would have too much power in them.
_	The French nobility protested on the ground that Colonna was an Italian, but his appointment was maintained and approved by the king.
_	The second phase included the demolition of the Cricket Field Stand, a new stand to be built at that end of the ground that would incorporate a hotel, a restaurant and a newly constructed cricket pavilion, and would be able to accommodate 2,500 fans.
_	He was offered his release if he would pay the gaoler's fees, which he refused to do on the ground that his imprisonment was illegal, when he was offered the oath of abjuration, and on his declining to take it was committed to prison for six months.
_	Because they are usually transported by air, such military units are usually lightly armed, but extremely well trained to compensate for their lower caliber, small arms weaponry and lack of heavy equipment like tanks and other armored vehicles that will soon follow by the larger “heavy” units that are to sustain and hold the ground that the RRF has captured and/or controlled from the spearheaded efforts.
_	The case led to the Football Association charging Stretford with misconduct in June 2005, a case he at first attempted to have heard in a public court and then challenged on the ground that the FA's disciplinary procedures did not comply with Article 6 of the European Convention on Human Rights and that one of the FA's rules was an unlawful restraint of trade –claims rejected by the Court of Appeal in March 2007.
_	However, the Singapore Court of Appeal dismissed the applicability of both cases on the ground that the terms of Article 14 of the Constitution differ materially from Article 10 of the European Convention on Human Rights, which was relied upon by the court in "Lingens"; as well as the First Amendment and the Fourteenth Amendment to the United States Constitution, which were relied upon by the court in "New York Times".
_	Stewart dissented on the ground that the taxpayer was entitled to follow the accounting method adopted by it upon proof that its average costs of service in future periods reasonably matched dues allocated to such periods.
_	The plaintiffs filed suit in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia, arguing that the ACA was unconstitutional, even in light of the "saving construction" given the law in "National Federation of Independent Business v. Sebelius". on the ground that the enactment of the essential coverage mandate violated the Origination Clause.
_	After some of the courts overturned state laws for redistributing land from "zamindar" (landlord) estates on the ground that the laws violated the zamindars' fundamental rights, the parliament passed the 1st amendment to the constitution in 1951, followed by the 4th amendment in 1955, to uphold its authority to redistribute land.
_	Orwell wrote, "People who ought to know better have lent themselves to the deception on the ground that if you tell the truth about Spain it will be used as Fascist propaganda."
_	States B and C cry foul, on the ground that this would significantly harm their established uses.
_	In "Chan Hiang Leng Colin v. Ministry of Information and the Arts" (1996), the appellants sought leave to apply for a quashing order to invalidate an order banning publications of the International Bible Students Association, a Jehovah's Witnesses organization, on the ground that it violated their right to freedom of religion protected by Article 15(1) of the Constitution.
_	An invitation from the Liberal League for an exchange of preferences in the Legislative Council had been rejected by the Executive on the ground that "our constitution does not permit the council to comply with their request".
_	In 1628, Dr. Rives, acting for the vicar-general, declined to receive objections made to Richard Montague's election to the See of Chichester on the ground that they were not made in legal form.
_	Secretary of State Adams alone took the ground that Jackson's acts were justified by the incompetence of Spanish authority to police its own territory, arguing that Spain had allowed East Florida to become "a derelict open to the occupancy of every enemy, civilized or savage, of the United States, and serving no other earthly purpose than as a post of annoyance to them."
_	The Court also refused to grant the injunction on the ground that the counter-drama leveled unfounded allegations against Thoppil Bhasi, the CPI and its leaders.
_	Bernadotte refused to make any such agreement, upon the ground that his obligations to Sweden would not allow it; Napoleon exclaimed “Go, and let our destinies be accomplished” and signed the act of emancipation unconditionally.
_	Cardozo, C.J., held that the claim in negligence failed on the ground that the auditors owed the plaintiff no duty of care, there being no sufficiently proximate relationship.
_	The diocesan chapter of Armagh in 1216 chose Netterville as archbishop; but their act was annulled on the ground that the assent of the Crown of England had not previously been obtained.
_	Immediately adjacent to the floor area is a large depression in the ground that probably represents a water soak.
_	The State and Local Government Committee rejected the bill, on the ground that the secession leaders had not followed the legal process: they would need to start over with signature gathering and another referendum.
_	Costello justified both decisions on the ground that Lavery was one of the Bar's top earners and had taken a considerable pay cut as Attorney General.
_	John Rawls's Difference Principle on the ground that the well-off could threaten a lack of social cooperation to the worse-off, just as Rawls implies that the worse-off will be assisted by the well-off for the sake of social cooperation.
_	The Consul said that the Emir Abdullah urged acceptance on the ground that realities must be faced, but wanted modification of the proposed boundaries and Arab administrations in the neutral enclave.
_	At the time, CAG aimed to enrol 5,00,000 volunteers ahead to help Modi's campaign, which would give the BJP's prime-ministerial candidate "a potent youth force on the ground that is independent of the BJP and is functional, unlike the dysfunctional youth wings of mainstream political parties", according to the "Economic Times".
_	The decision was taken to form the unit from police forces, as opposed to from the military, like the equivalent forces in other countries, on the ground that German federal law expressly forbids the use of the military forces against the civilian population.
_	In January 1972, Bukovsky was convicted of spreading anti-Soviet propaganda under Criminal Code, mainly on the ground that he had, with anti-Soviet intention, circulated false reports about political dissenters.
_	When the priests demanded a persecution of the Christians, he declined on the ground that the throne and the government could only be safe if it gained the goodwill of both concurring religions.
_	The legality of this constitution was disputed by the two German great powers, on the ground that the estates of the duchies had not been consulted as promised in the royal letter of December 6, 1851.
_	In February 2015, the ECHR upheld the lawfulness of whole life orders, on the ground that they can be reviewed in exceptional circumstances, following a fresh challenge by murderer Arthur Hutchinson, who had been sentenced to life imprisonment for a triple murder in Sheffield more than 30 years earlier.
_	Defense counsel objected to the admission of the wife's statement, on the ground that Mr. Crawford would be unable to confront (i.e. cross-examine)
_	As midnight came and went, a river of charged particles and electrons in the ionosphere flowed from west to east, inducing powerful electrical currents in the ground that surged into many natural nooks and crannies.
_	In September 1932, the government commuted the sentences to life imprisonment, on the ground that the new decree was unknown to the defendants at the time of the murder.
_	He declined an offer by Guthrie to give him the satisfaction of a gentleman and an officer of the same service, on the ground that the offer was not made until after events at the hospital had been allowed to take their course.
_	However, in December 2016, France's highest administrative court, the Conseil d'Etat, canceled the extradition order, on the ground that Russia had a political motive in making the extradition request.
_	Wilbur justified his choice on the ground that Hoover was "the great engineer whose vision and persistence ... has done so much to make <nowiki>[the dam]</nowiki> possible".
_	The work was surveyed and "pegged out" on the ground that same year.
_	On 8 September 1841 he resigned his seat for that constituency on the ground that a petition would have 'proved gross bribery against his colleague' in which his own agent would have been implicated.
_	He tells Emma Swan (Jennifer Morrison) it's their secret, but Regina Mills (Parrilla) finds him and plans to clear the castle away on the ground that it is a safety hazard.
_	While rejecting GE's argument that the latter claim fell within a field - nuclear safety - that had been completely pre-empted by the Federal Government, the court nevertheless dismissed the claim on the ground that it conflicted with three particular aspects of 210 and was therefore pre-empted.
_	The District Court, awarding summary judgment to the organization on the ground that the 75-percent requirement was a form of censorship prohibited by the First and Fourteenth Amendments, declared the ordinance void on its face, enjoined its enforcement, and ordered the municipality to issue a charitable solicitation permit to the organization.
_	Following Wilson's resignation in 1910 to become Governor of New Jersey, there were two years of agitation, before Hibben was elected president, though not unanimously, chiefly on the ground that Princeton's first need was peace and that Hibben was best fitted to promote it.
_	Today's land surveyor sets monuments at actual physical points on the ground that define angle points of boundary lines dividing neighboring land parcels.
_	Diogenes Laërtius says that he declined to identify the Good with the Useful, and that he denied the value of the negative proposition on the ground that affirmation alone can express truth.
_	The Delaware conceded that Thomas Penn had "sovereign authority," but challenged the transaction on the ground that it was fraudulent.
_	A Dutch publisher, to whom Diderot initially sent the manuscript, rejected it on the ground that it was too inflammatory.
_	With the captaincy crown returned to Flintoff, Strauss could focus solely on his batting prowess at the ground that made him famous.
_	Although repeatedly being approached by third parties to debate the book, Dershowitz refused on the ground that he had a "longstanding policy against debating Holocaust deniers, revisionists, trivializers or minimizers".
_	On November 29, 2010, High Court revoked the proceedings of the case on the ground that the charges against Chowdhury were not specifically disclosed in the case.
_	However, the court dismissed the suit on the ground that the claims were brought years too late, and thus the merits of the suit were never addressed.
_	However, the Louisiana Court of Appeal for the Second Circuit rejected the suit on the ground that the DA had absolute immunity in the prosecution of Connor.
_	Leveson experienced difficulty in being admitted to the Merchant Adventurers; in 1586 the Privy Council sent a letter to the Company urging Leveson's admission on the ground that he had been apprenticed to Robert Roe, one of the Company's members, and had committed no fault.
_	It is a matter known to all persons of common intelligence in the state of Oklahoma that the Governor takes the position that legal executions are judicial murder; and that he refuses to permit them to be carried into effect, upon the ground that he would thereby become a party thereto; and that he has expressed his fixed determination to strictly adhere to this policy until the expiration of his term of office.
_	However, White "vigorously opposed this bill, on the ground that the educational resources of the state were already too much dispersed".
_	Colonel Sanderson is prepared to refute any charges made against him, and his papers are in the hands of Senator Cowan, of Pennsylvania; but the difficulty is to get the case before the Senate from the Military Committee and have action taken upon it, and my object in writing you is to ask you to unite with such of your friends as may be willing to do so with you in asking the U. S. Senators from this State to try and bring the case before the Senate for their action, on the ground that the interests of this State demand, in view of the important position that he holds, that the matter should be settled at once.
_	It defending the decision not to set up a Cancer Drugs Fund as in England, on the ground that the fund's own chair has admitted it provides funding for cancer drugs which have 'no impact on survival' and 'uncertainty as to whether quality of life is improved or not' and pointed out that the All-Wales Medicines Strategy Group got new drugs such as Sativex approved for use in Wales more quickly than the National Institute for Health and Care Excellence in England.
_	Composed over a year's time in 1894–95, serialized in 1895–96, and published in book form in 1897, it was the sole historical novel by an author who had earlier disapproved of historical novels on the ground that they inevitably distort history.
_	This deposition, however, was not for doctrinal reasons, but on the ground that he had caused much bloodshed and had admitted to communion a deacon guilty of fornication.
_	The canonicity of the New Testament he ventures openly to deny, on the ground that the canon could be fixed only by men who were inspired.
_	Applying the above principles to the case in point, the court dismissed the argument that the appellants had a legitimate expectation on the ground that the various statements made by government officials regarding the allocation of fishing quotas did not amount to statements which were "clear, unambiguous and devoid of relevant qualification."
_	For example, if a human came across an indentation in the ground that might be a lion's footprint, it is advantageous to err on the side of caution and assume that the lion is present.
_	Not only will I throughout this discussion openly and boldly take the ground that "Slavery as it exists in America ought to be perpetuated", but that slavery is an established and inevitable condition to human society.
_	I will maintain the ground that God always intended the relation of master and slave to exist; that Christ and the early teachers of Christianity, found slavery differing in no material respect from American slavery, "incorporated into every department of society"... that slavery having existed ever since the first organization of society, it will exist to the end of time.
_	The English courts determine a foreign revenue law on the ground that a party may receive a hand back as evidence that the obligation to pay the state is not a foreign revenue law.
_	He refused to sign the report of the royal commission on the law of divorce, of which he was a member, on the ground that the dissolution of the marriage tie was contrary to Scripture, and besides vindicating his views in a pamphlet entitled 'The Law of Scripture against Divorce' (1856), offered vigorous opposition to the measure of the following year.
_	The Treasury had exercised powers to freeze the appellants' financial assets and economic resources on the ground that it reasonably suspected the appellants were or might be persons who had committed, attempted to commit, participated in or facilitated the commission of terrorism, pursuant to the Terrorism (United Nations Measures) Order 2006 and the Al-Qaida and Taliban (United Nations Measures) Order 2006 made under the United Nations Act 1946.
_	It is characteristic of him that he expresses extreme dislike of Hegel's philosophy on the ground that its terms are unintelligible.
_	Despite parliamentary opposition on the ground that they amounted to an infringement of the Great Charter, the new customs remained in force.
_	After they had both been widowed Disraeli is said to have proposed to her, but she declined on the ground that people over seventy just look foolish when they decide to marry.
_	It is conjectured that he was named after the city of Sabbionetta; but in the seventeenth century he resided in Sale, and, with Jacob Sasportas, participated in the condemnation of the followers of Shabbethai Ẓebi for refusing to keep the four chief fast-days, on the ground that the Messiah had already arrived.
_	Sidney was convicted and executed: Jeffreys' conduct of the trial caused some unease, in particular his ruling that while two witnesses were normally required in a treason trial, and the Crown had only one, Sidney's own writings on republicanism were a second "witness" on the ground that "to write is to act".
_	Note also the hat on the ground that is filled with coins, as if the players are collecting money for a performance.
_	His employers gave the statutory 12-week notice to terminate his contract, but made no payment of wages on the ground that the employee was not entitled to sick pay.
_	The entire transmitter was surrounded by a high "clutter fence" located away from the antenna, which reflected the signal away from local objects on the ground that would otherwise create false returns.
_	The Pacific Legal Foundation initiated a lawsuit, "Sissel v. U.S. Dept. Health & Human Services", in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia arguing that the ACA was still unconstitutional, even in light of the "saving construction" given the law in "NFIB v. Sebelius", on the ground that the enactment of the essential coverage mandate violated the Origination Clause.
_	At the close of the Government's case, the district court granted a motion for acquittal on the ground that the facts established did not constitute violations of Section 1 of the Sherman Act without evidence that what was obtained by defendants by their alleged agreements was more than a normal and reasonable reward to a patentee.
_	The banker subsequently cancelled the contract on the ground that the client posed a risk to the bank's reputation.
_	This view, expressed by way of "obiter dictum", was particularly criticised by Peter Birks on the ground that the more straightforward way to establish a claim would be for unjust enrichment, should trigger a proprietary remedy in a similar circumstance, regardless of the position of one's notional conscience.
_	Attempts by Johnston to have the Liberal activist who pushed Hatton off the platform arrested failed, according to Johnston, on the ground that the police could find no witnesses.
_	The embassy failed to meet the Doge of Venice, as he declined an interview on the ground that he was meeting an ambassador from the Ottoman Empire.
_	The JPO rejected the application on the ground that the invention was incomplete.
_	Justice Reed stated succinctly, "It is settled law that the clause of the Fifth Amendment, protecting a person against being compelled to be a witness against himself, is not made effective by the Fourteenth Amendment as a protection against state action on the ground that freedom from testimonial compulsion is a right of national citizenship..."
_	In two conservative institutions the Volunteers voted separation from the SVM on the ground that we are too liberal theologically."
_	Another extremely common paribhoga cetiya is the Buddha footprint, which are found across the Buddhist world symbolizing the ground that Buddha walked on and the powerful size of his dhammakāya.
_	It has been pointed out that the controversial law struck down by Chelameswar and Nariman had gained notoriety after many people in India started getting arrested for seemingly innocuous reasons on the ground that they had violated the now scrapped law.
_	It was held that (1) operation of the Anti-Injunction Act could be avoided only if there was proof of both irreparable injury and certainty of success on the merits, a pre-enforcement injunction being permissible only if it was clear that under no circumstances could the government ultimately prevail; (2) the instant action was a suit "for the purpose of restraining the assessment or collection of any tax" under the Anti-Injunction Act, since (a) the plaintiff's allegations indicated that a primary purpose of the suit was to prevent the assessment and collection of income taxes from the plaintiff, (b) even if the plaintiff would owe no federal income taxes because of possible deductions for depreciation of plant and equipment, the plaintiff would still be liable for federal social security and unemployment taxes, which taxes were also contemplated by the Anti-Injunction Act, and (c) in any event, the plaintiff sought to restrain the collection of taxes from its donors by forcing the Internal Revenue Service to continue to provide advance assurance that contributions to the plaintiff would be tax-deductible, thereby reducing the donors' tax liability, which aspect was also covered by the Anti-Injunction Act even though the plaintiff sought to lower the taxes of persons other than itself; (3) the Anti-Injunction Act was not rendered inapplicable on the ground that the Service's actions constituted an attempt to regulate the admissions policies of private universities rather than an effort to protect the government's tax revenues, since there was no showing that the Service's position did not represent a good-faith effort to enforce technical requirements of the tax laws; (4) application of the Anti- Injunction Act did not deny due process of law to the plaintiff because of any irreparable injury it would suffer pending resort to alternative procedures for review whereby the plaintiff could obtain Tax Court review of any assessment for income taxes or alternatively could institute a refund suit after payment of income, social security, or unemployment taxes, since such alternative procedures offered the plaintiff a full, even though delayed, opportunity to litigate the legality of the Service's actions; and (5) the Anti-Injunction Act barred the instant action since the plaintiff's contentions as to violations of its constitutional rights were sufficiently debatable so as to foreclose the necessary determination that under no circumstances could the government ultimately prevail.
_	It was ‘impossible to convict any member of NALGO of conduct which rendered him unfit to be a member... on the ground that the member did not comply with the instructions’ to not co-operate with the election.
_	Feedback was gathered not only from the pilots but also the ground crew that serviced it; allegedly, the welded construction of the aircraft presented several issues on the ground that have never before been encountered.
_	Asked to quash the convictions on the ground that the verdicts were unsafe and unsatisfactory, in February 1984 the court refused the appeal by majority.
_	The Council exercised these by serving notice and the Trust did not contest their validity which left the Council to seek possession against the occupiers on the ground that, on termination of the leases, they (the defendants) had become trespassers; they were never its tenants, nor its licensees.
_	The Court distinguished the "Lorain Journal" case on the ground that there the newspaper's refusal to sell space to advertisers who advertised on the local radio station manifested "bold, relentless, and predatory commercial behavior," which was absent in the "Times-Picayune" case.
_	Several prominent economist such as central banker Raghuram Rajan are against helicopter money on the ground that helicopter money would be ineffective because people would not spend the money.
_	In 2001, Admiral Tasnim refuted the Indian Navy's claim of sinking the "Ghazi", maintaining on the ground that "the sub was lost due to operational accident and Indians have never claimed it as such."
_	The Supreme Court held that the expenses could not be deducted on the ground that the expenses in question had been incurred by the taxpayer for his own convenience rather than for business reasons.
_	Nadar on the ground that the prosecution had not been able to prove the charges against the accused.
_	It also provides a better safeguard to wives by inserting section 13D by which the wife may oppose the grant of a decree on the ground that the dissolution of the marriage will result in grave financial hardship to her and that it would in all the circumstances be wrong to dissolve the marriage.
_	In "Verstappen v Port Edward Town Board," where the plaintiff sought an interdict on the ground that she was suffering health problems due to the local council's dumping waste, without the requisite permit, on the adjoining property, she might have invoked section 24, but did not.
_	The company plans on appealing the verdict on the ground that the judge should have barred the scientific evidence presented by the Johnson's attorneys.
_	In a recent development, the Tis Hazari Special Court granted him bail on the ground that the police had failed to identify the public official allegedly bribed, accepting the argument made by his lawyer Mr. Aman Lekhi.
_	This ruling was then appealed to the United States Supreme Court, by Sheriff Eisenstadt, who had prosecuted the case, on the ground that Baird lacked standing to appeal, being neither an authorized distributor under the statute nor a single person.
_	The proposal is a very tall and slender building, with a peak height above the ground that would be more than .
_	Today, the ground that the priory was located on is a cattle farm.
_	To this Mr. Chickering disagreed, on the ground that the photographs were not copies of any drawings, but of actual scenes on the stage, which any man might sketch.
_	The applicants appeal to the Court of Appeal was allowed on the ground that there was not sufficient evidence of the Presidents satisfaction as required under section 8(1) of the ISA.
_	In 1696 he was counsel for the defence of Ambrose Rookwood and Peter Cook, both charged with high treason; of Cook and William Snatt, the nonjuring parsons who gave absolution on the scaffold to Sir William Parkyns; and in November he defended Sir John Fenwick, strongly deprecating the proceedings by bill of attainder, on the ground that if he were acquitted his client would still be liable to proceedings under the common law.
_	Along with Green MP Jürgen Trittin, Annen claimed that the American counterinsurgency mission was hindering civilian reconstruction under the umbrella of the second mission, the International Security Assistance Force, because of what they called a heavy-handed approach by the U.S. military on the ground that was alienating the local population.
_	An item is not to be excluded from the Register on the ground that items with similar characteristics have already been listed on the Register.
_	On his return, he founded and edited "El Pensamiento de la Nación", a Catholic and conservative weekly; however, his fame rests principally on "El Protestantismo comparado con el Catolicismo en sus relaciones con la Civilización Europea" (Protestantism and Catholicity compared in their Effects on the Civilization of Europe), an able defence of Catholicism on the ground that it represents the spirit of obedience or order, as opposed to Protestantism, the spirit of revolt or anarchy.
_	The other demands were rejected on the ground that they would infringe the sovereignty and honor of Greece.
_	The Commissioner of Patents refused to grant the patent on the ground that the claimed method was not the kind of discovery which fell within the definition of “invention” in the Patent Act.
_	But he prefaced his evidence by a declaration that he must withhold any further information on the ground that it had been received under the seal of "sacramental confession".
_	Justice Marshall Harlan, the lone dissenter in the decision, stated “What can more certainly arouse race hate…than state enactments, which, in fact, proceed on the ground that colored citizens are so inferior and degraded…?
_	Borrekens and Teniers did not get along and at some point Borrekens reported Teniers to the authorities on the ground that Teniers was passing himself off as an aristrocrat and was using a coat of arms.
_	A. R. Pillai along with all these compatriots was imprisoned by the German Government on the ground that they were British subjects.
_	A Catholic organization initiated criminal proceedings on the ground that the article was an insult to a group because of its religion.
_	First National Bank (FNB) sought to avoid liability on the ground that a term of the contract for the provision of the box expressly excluded liability.
_	Although its steel girders rest on concrete pylons and most of the bridge is solid concrete, the bridge uses a hollow box girder design to minimize weight, as the ground that supports the bridge covers underground parking garages.
_	Rabbi Joshua asked who would remove the dust from the eyes of Rabban Johanan ben Zakai (so that he might hear this wonderful proof), as Rabban Johanan ben Zakai said that another generation would pronounce clean a loaf that was unclean in the third degree on the ground that there is no text in the Torah according to which it would be unclean.
_	The season also saw the removal of the old wooden tea bar at the ground that had been in place since the club began, the management team purchased a redundant porta cabin which they developed into a more usable hospitality area.
_	I, whose delegates were absent when this resolution was passed, recognized the council as ecumenical and confirmed its doctrinal decrees, he rejected its canon 28 on the ground that it contravened the sixth canon of Nicaea and infringed the rights of Alexandria and Antioch.
_	Daniels' personal attorney, Michael Avenatti, vowed to sue the Columbus, Ohio police on the ground that the arrest was politically motivated.
_	Rather than escaping and parachuting out safely, he decided to stay with the plane and land it safely, because of a village on the ground that would have been damaged.
_	In August 2014, the Court of Appeal for Ontario upheld the lower court decision on the ground that succession rules are not subject to the charter of rights and that the applicant had no standing to bring the challenge as he has no connection with the Royal Family.
_	This was because the Court dismissed the appeal on the ground that the appellant, Madam Vellama, lacked standing.
_	A small elevated viewing lounge for VIPs and invited guests of the club, with a small tuck shop located underneath, once stood at the end of the terrace but this was demolished in May 2011 as part of a major redevelopment of the ground that saw a new 650 all-seated stand erected.
_	Neff adds that "Frankfurter claimed that Gibson 'had no right to make reports to the department in regard to Jewish matters and should have 'refused' on the ground that I could not possibly learn enough about them to make even general observations.'
_	The Court dismissed the argument on the ground that Dow Jones could not rely on the Article as it only applied to Singapore citizens.
_	The spokesman admitted there were logs of all such conversations, but that they would not be turned over on the ground that they were covered by "executive privilege."
_	In March 1951 he initiated a debate calling for additional recruitment of soldiers from British dominions and colonies overseas, on the ground that it allowed the build-up of a voluntary force which could relieve British troops.
_	Saint Thomas Aquinas refused to concede the Immaculate Conception, on the ground that, unless the Blessed Virgin had at one time or other been one of the sinful, she could not justly be said to have been redeemed by Christ.
_	That year, Doug Nicholls became one of the first aboriginals to play senior football in Melbourne and according to Mavis Thorp Clark in her 1965 book on Nicholls, "Pastor Doug", Adams warned the players before taking the ground that although "they had colour in the side, they were to kick to the guernsey and disregard the colour".
_	Demand for European Championships appeared at the 1979 congress, but it was rejected on the ground that they would either belittle the World Championships or offer a poor fencing level.
_	In response to the requirements to pay, Trustco disputed its liability on the ground that it was “not indebted to the [taxpayer] alone”.
_	Soon after that controversy had been solved, the Shahi Imam of Fatehpuri Mosque, Mohd Mukarram Ahmed wrote to Kapil Sibal asking for the removal of a medieval painting of Archangel Gabriel and another of pilgrims at the Kaaba from the chapter 'The Central Islamic Lands' on the ground that they were against the Sharia law.
_	The Court held both claims patent-ineligible, however, on the ground that the computer-equipment limitation was too trivial to avoid preempting the idea, since the method could not feasibly be used except with a computer.
_	Courses may also have other design features which the skilled player will avoid; there are earth bunkers (pits or depressions in the ground that are not filled with sand but require a lofted shot to escape), high grass and other dense vegetation, trees or shrubs, ravines and other rocky areas, steep inclines, etc.; while disadvantageous to play from, these are typically not considered "hazards" unless specifically designated so by the course (a ravine or creekbed may be termed a "water hazard" even if completely dry)
_	Others may accept the Lurianic version of Kabbalah but retain the ancestral liturgy on the ground that, even according to Luria, this is the Kabbalistically correct thing to do.
_	However the Spaniard would not recognize Laussat's rights to make such a demand: he took the ground that, until the Province was actually transferred to France, Spanish authority prevailed.
_	In 1639 Barnabas succeeded his brother Henry as sixth earl of Thomond, and applied for the governorship of Clare, which Thomas Wentworth, Earl of Strafford refused him on the ground that his conduct differed entirely from that of his brother, and that he deserved nothing.
_	By the end of 1923 the Board decided to dispose of the Singleton Home on the ground that the premises were unsuitable.
_	His own house near Farnham was plundered, and he himself was captured by a troop of Royalist horse, owing his life to the intervention of Sir John Denham, on the ground that so long as Wither lived he himself could not be accounted the worst poet in England.
_	In its 2013 edition, The Howard and Moore Complete Checklist of the Birds of the World emended the trinomial name of the King Island emu to "D. n. minor", based on Spencer's "D. minor", on the ground that Vieillot's "D. ater" was originally meant for the mainland emu.
_	The fight saw Askren implement a dominant top game on the ground that stifled Hornbuckle's bottom game.
_	The Court of Appeals had distinguished the "Edwards" rule on the ground that Jackson's request for an attorney had been made at his arraignment, whereas Edwards' request had been made during a custodial interrogation by the police.
_	In "Morrison", the Court, as it had in "Boerne", again distinguished "Morgan", on the ground that "Morgan" had involved federal legislation "directed at New York officials" instead of private parties.
_	The towers stood one or two storeys high and measured in diameter, with a single doorway five metres off the ground that one could access only via a ladder which the occupants could remove.
_	On 14 April 2014 Ukrainian Supreme Court sitting en banc reversed the conviction of Yulia Tymoshenko and closed the case against her on the ground that "no crime was committed".
_	Furthermore, all three states continue to maintain most of their civil procedure laws in the form of codified statutes enacted by the state legislature, as opposed to court rules promulgated by the state supreme court, on the ground that the latter are undemocratic.
_	The site was dug up to within 2 feet of the water table, which is the area of the ground that is above the area of groundwater.
_	On 10 May the Coalition forces recaptured all the ground that they lost on the 8th and the French army retired to the Camp of Famars.
_	However, the second part namely "and no law containing a declaration that it is for giving effect to such policy shall be called in question in any court on the ground that it does not give effect to such policy" was declared unconstitutional.
_	With some support from French Mandate officials, the movement actively lobbied for autonomy direct under French rule and separation from Syria on the ground that majority of the inhabitants were not Arabs.
_	Clottemans appealed the verdict on the ground that she was interrogated by police without the presence of her attorney.
_	This took the form of a light projection on the ground that plays only in the evening, during cultural events.
_	The 1911 "Encyclopædia Britannica" characterizes the mooted etymology connecting Bevis (Boeve) with Béowa (Beowulf), as "fanciful" and "inadmissible" on the ground that they were both dragon slayers.
_	On 21 August 2015, the Singapore Court of Appeal removed the freezing injunction, on the ground that the procedure launched by Rybolovlev amounted to an abuse of procedure.
_	San Francesco’s church, in the homonym square (XII–XIV sec.), it is located in the nucleus of the Oldest City of Prato and an Important Place of Catholic worship and one of the first Franciscan Churches with his big convent built on the ground that was donated by the municipality to the friars minor only eight days after the canonization of the saint, in 1228.
_	The challenge by the Earl of Northumberland was on the ground that the work was within the Royalties granted to his family in a former reign.
_	Company also admitted that it had tried to convince the SEC that the bribes should be kept secret, on the ground that disclosure would hurt the company and its stockholders.
_	In 1968 British Railways proposed complete closure of the branch on the ground that it was loss-making, but the Minister of Transport refused consent, and the line continued in use.
_	She resigned on the ground that she refused to participate in a predictable hardening of policy of this organization.
_	The data quality has also often been criticized on the ground that what pretends to be "data" in reality often consists only of estimates extrapolated from mathematical models, not direct observations.
_	He also petitioned to be cleared of liability for a sum of £100 given to him by the late King Edward II, during the conflict which led to King Edward's final downfall in 1327, to pay the wages of the soldiers at Gloucester, on the ground that he could produce no written evidence as to whether or not the wages had actually been paid, since he had given the money to one Simon de Reading.
_	The mufti gave the opinion that he cannot execute his son without any witnesses, and could only be executed on the ground that his death would satisfy his father.
_	Valentine Goesaert, the plaintiff in the case, challenged the law on the ground that it infringed on the Fourteenth Amendment's Equal Protection Clause.
_	The administration also rejected use of the statutory procedure provided under Section 18 of the Selective Service Act of 1948 that might have permitted seizure of the industry's steel plants on the ground that compliance with this procedure was too time-consuming and the outcome of compliance too uncertain.
_	Though good running form is useful in increasing speed, fast and slow runners have been shown to move their legs at nearly the same rate – it is the force exerted by the leg on the ground that separates fast sprinters from slow.
_	Petitioner moved to dismiss the count under the Bias-Motivated Crime Ordinance on the ground that it was substantially overbroad and impermissibly content based, and therefore facially invalid under the First Amendment.
_	A verdict was entered for the plaintiff, but in the Queen's Bench the verdict was entered for the defendants, without calling on them to argue, on the ground that the infant was identified with its grandmother.
_	In August 2005 the government lost the case "Leung TC William Roy v. Secrertary For Justice", where the applicant had requested a judicial review by the High Court on the law related to age of consent on gay sex (which was being set to 21 at the time), on the ground that the provisions in "Section 118, Crimes Ordinance" is discriminatory and against both the Basic Law of Hong Kong and the Hong Kong Bill of Rights".
_	A trench is a type of excavation or depression in the ground that is generally deeper than it is wide (as opposed to a wider gully, or ditch), and narrow compared with its length (as opposed to a simple hole).
_	The East Stand is the only part of the ground that is covered and has seating.
_	Ecologists and environmentalists have criticized Marx on the ground that natural resources have (or should have) a value which has nothing to do with production costs in labour time, because in fact they are entropic "non-reproducible" goods.
_	Following the case of South African athlete Caster Semenya, the International Association of Athletics Federations (IAAF) introduced a now suspended policy to exclude women athletes from competing as women if they have hyperandrogenism, on the ground that the condition could confer an unfair advantage.
_	On August 22, 2007, inventor Dr. Triantafyllos Tafas sued the USPTO in the United States District Court of the Eastern District of Virginia on the ground that the rule changes were in violation of the U.S. patent law and therefore are invalid.
_	At the same meeting, he also stated that "politicians keep their ear so close to the ground that an ant can jump in" referring to their ability to know what their constituents are thinking.
_	You can prevent Smoglings from appearing by the holes in the ground that they appear out of until the holes shrink away to nothing..
_	As the UK is in a minority of countries to still charge tuition fees, increasing demands have been made to abolish fees on the ground that they burden people without wealthy families in debt, deter disadvantaged students from education, and escalate income inequality.
_	Where deep snow accumulates, American marten prefer cover types that prevent snow from packing hard and have structures near the ground that provide access to sub nivean sites.
_	Also in March 2012, Jackson overturned a decision by the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) that revoked a permit for the Spruce 1 mine project in Logan County, West Virginia, on the ground that the EPA did not have power under the Clean Water Act to rescind the permit.
_	Similarly, criticisms have been levelled against the Court on the ground that the human dignity test is muddled and is not sufficiently coherent a concept so as to effectively address concerns of equality claimants.
_	De Sacy explains it on the ground that in Arabic the name of the prophet Jeremiah is almost identical with that of the city of Urmiah, where, it is said, Zoroaster lived.
_	Respondent, on the other hand, filed a motion to dismiss on the ground that the complaint had no cause of action against him and that it raises a political question.
_	The District Court granted the County's motion for summary judgment on the ground that the suit was barred by sovereign immunity.
_	On the application of any person a Magistrate may grant to the applicant a certificate of exemption from military training and service if the Magistrate is satisfied that the applicant objects in good faith to such training and service on the ground that it is contrary to his religious belief.
_	Theresa—mainly on the ground that the fall of the house of Austria would dangerously increase the power of France, even if she gained no accession of territory.
_	The majority of delegates signed a resolution that denounced Wilson's policy of military preparedness, but a substantial minority refused to sign the resolution, on the ground that the resolution was unpatriotic.
_	Cabranes dissented from the denial of en banc rehearing of this case, observing that the appeal raised important questions of first impression regarding the application of the Fourteenth Amendment's Equal Protection Clause and Title VII's prohibition on discriminatory employment practices-primarily, whether a city employer may disregard the results of a qualifying employment examination, which was carefully constructed to ensure race-neutrality, on the ground that the results of that examination yielded too many qualified applicants of one race and not enough of another.
_	Before the retrial, Dinitz moved to dismiss the indictment on the ground that a retrial would violate the Double Jeopardy Clause of the Constitution.
_	It consists of light that is either emitted directly upward or reflected from the ground that is then scattered by dust and gas molecules in the atmosphere, producing a luminous background or light dome.
_	A lawyer made application to have Abu Zayd divorced from his wife on the ground that a Muslim woman cannot be married to an apostate.
_	Terry and Chilton were found guilty, an intermediate appellate court affirmed the conviction, and the Ohio State Supreme Court dismissed the appeal on the ground that "no substantial constitutional question" was involved.
_	On July 2, 1866, the Bendahara acknowledged a letter in which Governor Cavenagh had declared he was unable to recognize the validity of Tun Ahmad's authority over the Pahang islands on the ground that they were subject to the rule of the Temenggung.
_	The Court of Appeals did not consider the question whether the jailhouse statement should be suppressed on the ground that they were the fruits of the statement made at the house.
_	Mandelbaum's appointment was controversial and he was opposed by several bar associations on the ground that he had no experience of any kind in federal court.
_	The federal court eventually overturned the rule on the ground that it violated the Clean Air Act.
_	The records of the pseudo-Council of Sinuessa, which were fabricated at the beginning of the 6th century, state that Marcellinus after his fall presented himself before a council, which refused to try him on the ground that "prima sedes a nemine iudicatur" ("The first See is judged by none").
_	The Act on the Employment of Foreign Workers which states that “a foreign worker shall not be given discriminatory treatment on the ground that he/she is a foreigner”, was put into force on 16 August 2003.
_	Based on Rebecca’s testimony, Hudspeth was convicted and sentenced to death, but the Arkansas Supreme Court set aside the conviction on the ground that the trial judge, R. H. Powell, had improperly barred testimony regarding Rebecca’s alleged lack of good character.
_	Productive force determinism is then criticised on the ground that whatever technologies are adopted, these are the result of human choices between technical alternatives, influenced by the human interests and stakes existing at the time.
_	A claim for Rancho La Puente was filed with the Public Land Commission in Fall 1852 when the commission held proceedings in Los Angeles, but after the land commission approved the claim two years later, the government appealed to the courts on the ground that the Pico grant was not legitimate.
_	A subsequent draft of the opinion adopts a suggestion by Justice Harlan Stone that the case should be disposed of "on the ground that self-help through boycott was impermissible, even to vindicate a legal right."
_	This privilege is reviewable, however, on the ground that it is not a reasonable limit on the right to make full answer and defence in a particular case.
_	In June 2011, Hochul opposed legislation that would cut funding for the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) by 44 percent, on the ground that the CFTC curbs speculation in oil and the resulting layoffs of CFTC personnel would "make it easier for Big Oil companies and speculators to take advantage of ... consumers".
_	At this time, the authorizer of the Thumpamon Vadakkumnatha Temple which cannot desire antiquity prior toAD 950 opposed the reconstruction of the Church on the ground that the Velichappad of the temple had predicted that the construction of a Christian church there would pollute and de-santise the temple.
_	On April 21, 2014, the Supreme Court granted Lewin's certiorari petition in the follow-up case of "Zivotofsky v. Kerry", which concerns the question whether a federal statute that directs the Secretary of State, on request, to record the birthplace of an American citizen born in Jerusalem as born in "Israel" on a Consular Report of Birth Abroad and on a United States passport is unconstitutional on the ground that the statute "impermissibly infringes on the President's exercise of the recognition power reposing exclusively in him".
_	The Supreme Court unanimously ruled in 1961 that states could not compel officeholders to declare a belief in God, striking down a provision of the Maryland Constitution on the ground that it was a "religious test for public office" invading the individual's right to religious freedom.
_	He dissented solely on the ground that the law was "a clear violation of the constitutional principle of separation of powers".
_	Renouvin wrote all of the contradictions of the armistice, which created facts on the ground that were difficult to change, as well as the very differing interests of the powers became the basis of the Treaty of Versailles in June 1919, a compromise peace that displeased everyone, as it did not destroy Germany as a great power while being irksome enough to ensure that the Germans would never accept Versailles as legitimate.
_	Note:The new Tucson Electric Power headquarters at 88 E. Broadway sits on land that was part of the ground that Russell as a Tucson City Councilman and others obtained back in 1899.
_	In 1503 he resigned his office of alderman on the ground that he lacked the financial resources to support election as Lord Mayor.
_	The Censor objected to the characters, and the play was banned on the ground that Shaw was satirising real individuals.
_	The judgment on those verdicts was reversed by the Court of Appeals for the Sixth Circuit on the ground that the federal trial judge had mishandled an out-of-court threat against a juror.
_	The Old Chapter, however, were unrelenting, on the ground that it was unsuitable in England and would lead to dissentions among the clergy, and ultimately Bishop Bonaventure Giffard suppressed it.
_	Denied work after the war (on the ground that she had to have a college degree to be a director), she was forced, at age forty-two, to return to Mizoguchi as his script girl.
_	Some LGBT advocates critiqued Trump's reference to LGBT people, on the ground that it stood in contrast to positions he had taken on LGBT issues during the campaign; activists such as Chad Griffin of the Human Rights Campaign and Rick Zbur of Equality California suggested that the statement was an attempt to turn LGBT people against Muslims and pit minority groups against each other.
_	A sheriff's helicopter spotted a man at 9:25p.m. in a nearby backyard and told officers on the ground that he had shattered a window using a tool bar, run to the front of that house, and then looked in an adjacent car.
_	In 2004, the Greens regained the ground that they had lost in 1999 and won two additional seats in the Chamber.
_	Different methods for reducing search disallow the generation of some tableau on the ground that a closed tableau can still be found by expanding the other ones.
_	Chief Justice Fred M. Vinson dissented on the ground that the jury instruction which the majority objected to had been affirmed by both appellate courts.
_	In 2013 their decision was appealed on the ground that the Bugatti was a modified version - the limiter was turned off, a fact already known in 2010.
_	This is a narrow shaft drilled into the ground that collects water from beneath the earth.
_	The authorship of "Awake, ye saints, awake" is ascribed to Cotterill, on the ground that he wrote the most of what is its present form.
_	In the end the case was dismissed in February 1577, apparently on the ground that one eye-witness was not sufficient in a matter of such gravity.
_	In his trial in Jerusalem Nazi war criminal Adolf Eichmann claimed he was simply following legal orders under paragraph 48 of the German Military Code which provided: "punishability of an action or omission is not excused on the ground that the person considered his behaviour required by his conscience or the prescripts of his religion".
_	Spencer, who had become an Anglican clergyman and a minor canon of Canterbury Cathedral, years later sought and obtained leave from Queen Victoria to change his family's name to Meadows, his petition having been received on the ground that his wife was the sole heir of her maternal grandfather of that name.
_	But their motion was rejected on the ground that the party was already taking steps to a more democratic environment.
_	Bismarck was livid, and he resigned the premiership of Prussia (while remaining Chancellor of the German Empire), telling an ally, "in domestic affairs I have lost the ground that is for me acceptable through the unpatriotic treason of the Conservative Party in the Catholic question."
_	He disapproved of Henry Flood's renunciation agitation, on the ground that he did not make his amendments at the proper time, and in parliament supported Flood's Reform Bill.
_	In a dispatch of the same date to the French ambassador at Berlin, Bismarck explained that, although the German Government considered, in view of the proofs of guilt, the arrest to be fully justified, it was deemed expedient to release Schnaebelé on the ground that business meetings between frontier officials "must always be regarded as protected by a mutually-assured safe conduct."
_	The defense filed a motion to dismiss the Barker charges on the ground that retrying Bell would amount to double jeopardy.
_	As his obituary in "The New York Times" stated, "The Kent State case came to an abrupt halt when [Judge Battisti] dismissed it on the ground that Government prosecutors had failed to prove 'beyond a reasonable doubt' that guardsmen had willfully intended to deprive the students of their rights".
_	The equation of new value added with net output or GDP (also known as gross value added) would have made no sense to Marx, mainly because net output "includes" depreciation (or the consumption of fixed capital), yet "excludes" various property rents paid by producing enterprises from their gross income (on the ground that renting out an asset does not itself constitute production) as well as a portion of net interest (regarded as property income).
_	When reaching the age of 65, Mr Palacios was notified of the automatic termination of his contract of employment on the ground that he had reached the compulsory retirement age as provided for in art.19(3) of a collective agreement and that, on July 2, 2005, a national law had been published, a single transitional provision which authorised such a measure.
_	They see a cylinder in the ground that looks like a well.
_	In more modern collections, it was attributed to Thrupp on the ground that it was found in the "Hymns for the Young", which she edited.
_	In this case, the defendant's motion to dismiss had not prayed for relief "in furtherance of justice", but rather on the ground that the mandate of the United States Court of Appeals had not been followed by the People.
_	His name was submitted for a brevet-majority but passed over on the ground that he had been promoted to captain only a few weeks before.
_	A British Entry Clearance Officer refused his application for settlement on the ground that he had "failed to demonstrate strong ties with the UK".
_	The Siemens challenged the VLT Act on the ground that section 16 was ultra vires the power of the provincial government's authority as it was a matter under the federal criminal law power, and that it violated their right to freedom of expression under section 2(b) of the Charter, their right to life, liberty, and security of person under section 7 of the Charter, and their right to equality under section 15(1) of the Charter.
_	Even if there is no indication that the convicted person will try to evade justice, bail may be refused on the ground that the prospects of success on appeal are small.
_	In 1350, she sought a divorce on the ground that they had been contracted in marriage (in other words betrothed) before she was of marriageable age, and that she had never consented to cohabit with him.
_	This time he was defeated by James M. Cook by a margin of only 228 votes (200,693 for Cook; 200,465 for Welch Jr.), but he contested successfully the election on the ground that the ballots cast for "B. Welch", "Benjamin Welch" (without the "Jr.") and "Benjamin C. Welch Jr." (with erroneous middle initial) had not been counted, but had been cast for him.
_	There is a story that one of the Knights who abducted her on Warenne's behalf, described as an undersized hunchback named Richard de St. Martin, claimed that Alice was his wife on the ground that he had carried her off and married her before she was betrothed to the Earl of Lancaster.
_	On March 17, 2015, Sierra Leone's President Ernest Bai Koroma sacked Sam-Sumana as Vice President on the ground that he had abandoned his position to seek an asylum in the United States Embassy in Freetown, and for not belonging to a political party as stated in the constitution .
_	Tagore justified the ban on the book, on the ground that it was a seditious book, while Sarat justified his book on the ground that "throughout India, large numbers of people are being imprisoned or externed by the government on flimsy grounds without trial or in flagrant miscarriage of justice."
_	When my foot hit the ground that boy started swinging, so by the time I came around with the whip he was way off stride and couldn't get anywhere near the ball.
_	On the following day Gessler arrived, and he proceeded at once to make a formal request that the 100,000 men, which was the limit of the German army allowed by the treaty, should continue to be exceeded, on the ground that it was impossible for the government to keep order with such a small force.
_	The petition was included in a letter to the Speaker, William Lenthall, and sent to a committee, which quickly rejected it, on the ground that it was
_	He furthermore did not provide a detailed description of the aircraft to the ground controllers: "I did not tell the ground that it was a Boeing-type plane; they did not ask me."
_	The enormous part of it was the ground that filled the gaps between arch domes and which historically fulfilled the role of heating.
_	Following the report of the slash in the penalty fee, MTN Nigeria head to court challenging the 20% reduction on the ground that the amount will diminish their profit.
_	35 employers, represented by Starke, objected to the award being made a common rule on the ground that the provisions were unconstitutional.
_	The Commissioner of Patents refused the patent application on the ground that the death ray was "inoperable for the purpose for which it was designed."
_	Yet you seem to justify Fascism with its intolerance, racial hatred, economic slavery, fanning of the war spirit...mainly on the ground that...
_	He declined to serve, on the ground that levying war against the Lord Protector Oliver Cromwell was not within the statute of treason; and in consequence was removed from his place (3 May), and resumed practice at the bar.
_	Some critics, on the ground that Horace would not have ventured to attack so dangerous an adversary, assume the existence of a poet whose real name was Furius (or Cornelius) Alpinus.
_	Thomas Lord himself was a professional bowler at the White Conduit who was given the job of finding the ground that was afterwards named after him.
_	The losing party in the 5–4 decision sought reargument on the ground that Black should have been disqualified; Black declined to recuse himself and the decision stood, but Justice Robert H. Jackson wrote a short opinion suggesting that the decision that Black should sit in the case was Black's alone and the Court did not endorse it.
_	In a letter to Otto Dov Kulka of 8 December 1986 Nolte criticized the work of French Holocaust denier Robert Faurisson on the ground that the Holocaust did in fact occur, but he went on to argue that Faurisson’s work had admirable motives in the form of sympathy for Palestinians and opposition to Israel.
_	At the second trial (filed by the state on July 24, 1970, ruled on December 20, 1975, at Tokyo High Court), Judge Azakami rejected the appeal by the state on the ground that the decision of the authorization lacks consistency.
_	Part of the complaint against the IOR was dismissed in 2007 on the basis of sovereign immunity, and the remainder of the claim against that defendant was dismissed on the ground that the property claim had no nexus to the United States, a decision confirmed in February 2010 by the Ninth Circuit.
_	They are situated above 400–500 metres (1300–1600 feet) and are mostly an uninhabitable volcanic desert, because the water precipitating as rain or snow infiltrates so quickly into the ground that it is unavailable for plant growth.
_	Olson was also the Assistant Attorney General for the Office of Legal Counsel when then President Ronald Reagan ordered the Administrator of the EPA to withhold the documents on the ground that they contained "enforcement sensitive information."
_	Clarke left Istanbul on , travelling covertly back to Egypt via Syria and Lebanon in order to reconnoitre the ground that British forces would have to invade when entering the country.
_	Kildare jury was convicted of perjury, on the ground that having taken an oath to deliver a true verdict they had in breach of their oath and in flagrant disregard of the evidence acquitted two men who, according to the Castle Chamber, were obviously guilty of murder.
_	Meade refused the office on the ground that it would interfere with his flourishing private practice (although Hart notes that contemporary serjeants like Sir Richard Stephens became extremely rich through the perquisites of the office).
_	Houska castle, and most specifically the chapel, has been constructed over a large hole in the ground that is allegedly a "gateway to Hell", which was said to be so deep no one could see the bottom of it.
_	Justice Jackson, dissented on the ground that the administrative decision was impeachable not only for fraud, but also for a gross mistake necessarily implying bad faith.
_	The grave site features a statue of Teng and a large electronic piano keyboard set in the ground that can be played by visitors who step on the keys.
_	He said that, "Judicial punishment can never be used merely as a means to promote some other good for the criminal himself or for civil society, but instead it must in all cases be imposed on him only on the ground that he has committed a crime."
_	Several years prior, one of the most powerful men in the small island nation of Horai, Tenro Horai, discovered an incredible magical power deep within the ground that gave him god-like strength, the Ubusunagami Okinokai.
_	Carneiro's theory has been criticized by the Dutch "early state school" emerging in the 1970s around cultural anthropologist Henri J.M. Claessen, on the ground that considerable contrary evidence can be found to Carneiro's theory.
_	After the restoration of peace the Jews were expelled from many cities that feared their competition; thus Esztergom expelled them in 1712, on the ground that the city which had given birth to St. Stephen must not be desecrated by them.
_	Herne was assigned 23 October 1641 to defend the bishops impeached for issuing the new canons of 1640; but declined to act on the ground that as a commoner he was "involved in all the acts and votes of the House of Commons".
_	The envoy brought a firman confirming Muhammad Ali Pasha as governor of Egypt, and ordering Hurshid Ahmed Pasha to go to Alexandria, there to await further orders; but this he refused to do, on the ground that he had been appointed by a "Hatt-i Sharif".
_	The ruling was overturned by the Seventh Circuit on the ground that the taxpayer plaintiffs lacked standing.
_	On September 29, 2006, US District Court Judge David S. Cercone of Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania ordered the revocation of Geiser's US citizenship, citing Title 8 Chapter 12 § 1451(a) of the US Code, which states that citizenship should be revoked and the certificate of naturalization canceled "on the ground that such order and certificate of naturalization were illegally procured or were procured by concealment of a material fact or by willful misrepresentation".
_	The conference ruled that Dunlap remained eligible on the ground that Lenox was not a college.
_	In a footnote, the opinion refused to distinguish "Weber" on the ground that this case involved a public employer. 733 F.2d, at 227, n. 8. Finally, the court rejected the District Court's characterization of the "remedy" as "fundamentally flawed," noting that the score adjustment did not displace nonminority candidates from the list or bar their advancement.
_	There are 3 approaches that have been taken to this possibility of pain and suffering: (1) provide palliative medications where there are physical signs compatible with distress; (2) withhold all such medications on the ground that even if signs of distress are occurring, the patient does not have sufficient cognition to interpret any sensations as noxious; or (3) provide palliative medications prophylactically to prevent any possible distress.
_	This habitat also lacked the predators found on the ground that our chimp-like ancestors would have been poor defenders against.
_	However, the Fourth Circuit at the Circuit Court of Appeals dismissed the case on the ground that the federal courts lacked the jurisdiction over the case.
_	Justice Brennan said he "would affirm on the ground that the challenged classifications violate the Equal Protection Clause because they fail the rational basis test."
_	It had black eyes that blazed with light, and its four legs were so firmly planted in the ground that every effort to dislodge it was unavailing."
_	Preservation for D601 was denied on the ground that it was too far gone to be restored to operational condition and was not considered to be worth preserving for display only.
_	Pritchard sued on the ground that King never made a settlement with her, although evidence showed he intended to.
_	He declined on the ground that it should be possible to clear up the difficulties with the New South Wales government.
_	Shankar also appealed on the ground that the Disciplinary Committee, by virtue of its excessive intervention in the case, had descended into the arena and adopted an inquisitorial role, which had impaired its judgment and ability to properly evaluate and weigh the evidence.
_	According to legend, Avis declined to collect his full fee, on the ground that it was wrong to profit from building a house of God.
_	He advocated the principle that St. Paul ought to be interpreted by St. James, not St. James by St. Paul, on the ground that St. James wrote later, and was presumed acquainted with St. Paul's teaching.
_	The plaintiff applied for an injunction to restrain Gibson’s threatened action on the ground that it would be inconsistent with the legally required performance of the charter-party (in private, civil law) of which Gibson had known when he had taken his mortgage.
_	On the ground that he was diverting its revenues from the hospital, the custody of the manor was ordered to be taken from Thomas Salkeld in 1359 and given to English members of the order.
_	("What's behind the blouse?") were considered vulgar by some, others defended the song on the ground that it was based on folk traditions.
_	Non-technical Turkish was vernacularized and simplified on the ground that the language of Turkish people should be comprehensible by the people.
_	The District Court dismissed the complaint on the ground that respondents lacked standing to bring the suit and the Court of Appeals reversed.
_	Mālik rejected the stories of Muhammad and the Jews of Medina on the ground that they were taken solely based on accounts by sons of Jewish converts.
_	In January 1897 the State Board of Pardons granted her a full pardon on the ground that the shooting was justified in that Foley had "wronged her," that she had been sufficiently punished and that she had a child to raise.
_	Ranendra Mohan Das, the legislator from Karimganj (North) assembly constituency and an ethnic Bengali, protested against the bill on the ground that it sought to impose the language of a third of the population over the rest two thirds.
_	George later supported limited copyright, on the ground that temporary property over a unique arrangement of words or colors did not in any way prevent others from laboring to make other works of art.
_	And after two years at the school, her mother was successful in having her removed from the school on the ground that it allowed her too much association with boys, and she then spent a year in an advanced girls’ school; although unhappy there, she also met her best friend, Madeleine Gallet.
_	Queen Victoria was prostrated with grief, and considered ennobling Ralph or Coningsby as a memorial to Disraeli (without children, his titles became extinct with his death) but decided against it on the ground that their means were too small for a peerage.
_	There has been opposition to the holiday on the ground that the syncretism trivializes both festivals.
_	The defense counsel moved to discharge the whole jury on the ground that the prosecutor's removal of the black veniremen violated petitioner's rights under the Sixth and Fourteenth Amendments to a jury drawn from a cross section of the community, and under the Fourteenth Amendment to equal protection of the laws.
_	In 1941 the Syrian Committee to Help Iraq was established to support the Iraqi Government led by Rashid Ali al-Gaylani against the British invasion during the Anglo–Iraqi War. Al-Arsuzi, the leader of the other Arab Ba'ath movement, was skeptical of the new committee, and opposed helping the Iraqis on the ground that they would lose anyway.
_	The deputy speaker then accepted the Supreme court ruling, but declared the seat again immediately vacant on the ground that Somare had been absent for 90 days.
_	On March 8, 1996, the Second District Illinois Appellate Court unanimously reversed and remanded the case for a new trial on the ground that Cowlin erred in failing to grant a motion to suppress Gary’s allegedly inculpatory statements.
_	The Fiji Military Forces and the Methodist Church are to make submissions at the meeting, but the secretariat of the Great Council had refused a request from the opposition Labour Party (FLP) to make one, ostensibly because of time constraints and on the ground that if they accepted a submission from the FLP, they would have to accept one from every political party.
_	At the twentieth Zionist Congress, held in Zurich in August 1937, the plan was discussed and rejected on the ground that a larger part of Palestine should be assigned to them.
_	Its composition has been placed as far back as 44 BC, on the ground that certain works of art, known to have been removed to Rome about that date, are referred to as being at a distance from the city.
_	This was subsequently interpreted by the courts to include "imprisoning" the king, on the ground that history had shown that when a king is held captive by a usurper, he often dies in captivity.
_	The to-be "Forlorn Hope" never stormed the fort as it surrendered first; no medals were awarded on the ground that the unit failed to assault the earthworks.
_	Mountmaurice meanwhile obtained Raymond's recall on the ground that his power threatened the royal authority, but the constable was delayed by a fresh outbreak at Limerick, the earl's troops refusing to march without him.
_	The scale takes into account the instrument's distance from the epicenter, or the point on the ground that is directly above the earthquake's origin.
_	His Hoegaarden Brewery burned to the ground that year, and Celis, who was under-insured, wound up selling his Hoegaarden brand to Belgian giant Interbrew.
_	Those lawmakers had asked for a preview on the ground that the movie could be "anti-Japanese".
_	Upon her release, her extradition from the Republic of Ireland was blocked as the Irish High Court ruled in March 1978 that O'Hare should not be extradited to Northern Ireland, on the ground that the offences that she was alleged to have committed fell within the political offence exception.
_	Phelps defended the bill on the ground that Congress had the constitutional power to regulate the value of money, but when the bill was brought back up to be considered on January 14, 1857, the legal tender provision had been removed.
_	Do not assail this divine Aeneid; nay, rather prostrate revere the ground that it treads.
_	However, Elector Palatine Louis III objected to this appointment, on the ground that the Golden Bull of 1356 had given the position of imperial vicar to the Elector Palatine for the areas were Franconian law was in force, and to the Elector of Saxony for the areas were Saxon law was in force.
_	Two days later the New Zealand Foreign Affairs Minister Murray McCully announced an additional NZ$550,000 was to be made available to the Samoan government, as well as the Samoan Red Cross and any agencies on the ground that might need it.
_	On the spot however, the situation was more complex for in 1843 Haji Sharmaarke from Berbera sized Zeila, imprisoned the Shariff's garrison and offered to put the port under British protection ; the government of India rejected the offer on the ground that Aden was merely a depot for coals and that any intervention in the affairs of the African coast would be expensive and unprofitable and might excite the jealousy of other European powers.
_	Employees having priority among creditors, albeit not above fixed security holders, dates back to 1897, and is justified on the ground that employees are particularly incapable, unlike banks, of diversifying their risk, and forms one of the requirements in the ILO Protection of Workers' Claims (Employer's Insolvency) Convention.
_	One of the seven, David Kemiss (or Kemish), was found unfit to plead on the grounds of his great age and ill-health, while another, Alexander Lumsden, was acquitted, on the ground that he was a Scot, not an Englishman, and therefore could not be said to have "acted as a priest in England" within the meaning of the Jesuits, etc. Act 1584.
_	The Commissioner disallowed the deductions for amortization on the ground that taxpayers' life interest was "acquired by gift, bequest, or inheritance" and that the deductions were therefore prohibited by § 273 of the Code.
_	However, on appeal Second Circuit Court of Appeals reversed, removing the government from the suit, on the ground that it was not a party to the controversy, and awarded the yacht to Johnson.
_	In October 2011, the Liberty Legal Foundation filed suit in Arizona, seeking to enjoin the Democratic National Committee from certifying Obama as its nominee for the 2012 U.S. presidential election on the ground that he did not have two citizen parents and thus, it contended, was not a natural-born citizen.
_	Æthelwulf seized an estate in East Malling from the Canterbury church on the ground that it had only been granted by Baldred when he was in flight from the West Saxon forces; the issue of archiepiscopal coinage was suspended for several years; and the only estate Wulfred was granted after 825 he received from King Wiglaf of Mercia.
_	The municipality applied for an injunction ordering the company to cease its aviation activities on Lac Gobeil on the ground that operation of the aerodrome and the associated business in that zone violated the by‑law.
_	Yet, as Clarence Hill's own case shows, lower federal courts have often refused to hear suits challenging methods of execution on the ground that the prisoner brought the claim too late and only for the purposes of delay.
_	However, he did record that "some have rejected the Epistle to the Hebrews, saying that it is disputed by the church of Rome, on the ground that it was not written by Paul."
_	The hopes of ultimate success were, however, frustrated by the intervention of Russia; all appeals to the western powers were vain, and on 11 August Kossuth abdicated in favor of Görgey, on the ground that in the last extremity the general alone could save the nation.
_	Transfers may be preferred to subsidies on the ground that i) any given expenditure of State funds will increase welfare more if it is given as an income-transfer rather than via subsidising the price of some commodities, and ii) transfer payments can be better targeted at a specific income groups as compared to free or subsidised goods.
_	But Justice Douglas wrote a concurring opinion, in which he distinguished "Sapir" from "Bryan" on the ground that Bryan had "asked" for a new trial and, therefore, had "open[ed] the whole record for such disposition as might be just."
_	Strafford, who became all powerful in Ireland, and who was well aware that Alexander had been professionally disgraced in England, vetoed his appointment as a judge of assize on the ground that he was unfit for any public office, and refused him leave to go to England.
_	It is the only part of the ground that has had no major redevelopment nor are there any plans to.
_	On 4 September, the league met again and exonerated both Italy and Ethiopia of any culpability in the Walwal incident, on the ground that each nation had believed Walwal was within its own territorial borders.
_	The simple, indeed, (I will not call them unwise and unlearned,) who always constitute the majority of believers, are startled at the dispensation (of the Three in One), on the ground that their very rule of faith withdraws them from the world’s plurality of gods to the one only true God; not understanding that, although He is the one only God, He must yet be believed in with His own οἰκονομία .
_	Some tax protesters argue that they should be immune from federal income taxation because they are sovereign individuals or "natural individuals," or on the ground that they have not requested a privilege or benefit from the government.
_	This he declined, on the ground that if he were an official his influence would be lessened; but in 1852 he accepted a public testimonial of £3,248., including £100 from the Royal Bounty Fund.
_	The Supreme Court, in an opinion by Chief Justice Harlan Fiske Stone (and in which Justice Robert Jackson did not participate), held that in view of 26 U.S.C. § 1606(a) (providing that no person shall be relieved from compliance with a state law requiring payments to an unemployment fund on the ground that he is engaged in interstate commerce) the fact that the corporation is engaged in interstate commerce does not relieve it from liability for payments to the state unemployment compensation fund.
_	Manuelo tells the Marshalls that there is a secret hole in the ground that would lead them past the Caatinga and that if they release Ze with a message to his wife, he would lead them through it personally.
_	In 1932, he applied for disability benefits, which were denied by the Repatriation Commission "on the ground that his ill health was not due to war service."
_	Wood indicated his only remaining witness was a neurologist, an expert witness, and McNamara for the LIRR moved to dismiss the case on the ground that Palsgraf had failed to present evidence of negligence, but Justice Humphrey denied it.
_	The name was also used for the ground that belonged to a monastery.
_	Greenberg's Eurasiatic hypothesis has been dismissed by many linguists, often on the ground that his research on mass comparison is unreliable.
_	In Abell v Strauss, Abel applied to sequestrate the estate of Strauss, a taxi driver, on the ground that he had committed an act of insolvency in terms of section 8(a), in that he had departed from his dwelling with the intention of evading or delaying the payment of his debts.
_	It is only in the case of rays grazing the ground that the differences are meaningful.
_	Among other things, a fraction of profit, interest and rent income which is payable from the gross income of producing enterprises is excluded from value added in the official accounts, on the ground that it is unrelated to production.
_	Wigmore commented that Wavell conceded the point "on the ground that [Percival] was the commander responsible for results and had long studied the problem."
_	According to him hereditary aristocracy should be abolished on the ground that it breeds indolence and incompetence.
_	He criticized the then prevailing policy of the French government to let private individuals collect tax on the ground that the tax collectors often extort double the money they are supposed to collect from the citizens.
_	He was dismissed from a job as the teacher in the South Sweden Nursing School on the ground that he held a lecture on sexual health.
_	In "The Wealth of Nations" Adam Smith had already recognized the central importance of the division of labour for economic growth, on the ground that it increased productivity ("industriousness" or "efficiency"), but, Marx suggests, Smith failed to theorize clearly "why" the division of labour stimulated economic growth.
_	Thermtron Products, Inc. v. Hermansdorfer, 423 U.S. 336 (1976), was a case in which the United States Supreme Court held that a United States District Court may not decline jurisdiction over a case that has properly been removed to it from state court on the ground that the court is backlogged with other cases, and that a District Court's refusal to hear a case on this ground may be reviewed by a writ of mandamus.
_	The measure was challenged by a company SA, Roquette Frères, on the ground that the European Parliament was not properly consulted.
_	The Board justified this on the ground that she had not told the employer about having previously worked for the Ford Motor Company, and so for ‘untruthfulness and lack of trust’.
_	The court also rejected claims of 65 plaintiffs on the ground that their relationship with the victims could not be established.
_	Defendant appealed the conviction on the ground that there was no intent to kill any specific person.
_	She, along with her temple and priests, was swallowed up by a hole in the ground that opened beneath her, as the result of Philip's curse.
_	"The nine had set up a system in which the majority decided court policy in May 1985", an obituary reported, "but Judge Battisti conceded that he ignored it on the ground that 'the chief judge must make the decisions'".
_	Weaver filed a petition pursuant to 28 U.S.C. s 2255 seeking to have his guilty plea set aside on the ground that his former lawyer, R. Kenneth Mundy, had had a conflict of interest.
_	Typically each TOID is associated with a polygon that represents the area on the ground that the feature covers, in National Grid coordinates.
_	However, Slade made an appeal, which was sustained, on the ground that the words "by palmistry or otherwise" had been omitted in the indictment.
_	Because the Quarantine Station has experienced over 150 years of quarantine activity, there is a layering of evidence on and in the ground that reflects the slow growth of the Station, the major development and redevelopment programs, and the subsequent removals and constructions.
_	The first court of appeal confirmed the lower court's judgment on the ground that the cartoons targeted only terrorists or fundamentalists—not the whole Muslim community.
_	Gower defended his Fellows; he refused on the ground that the mandamus should not have been made peremptory in the first instance.
_	Furthermore, while Wildermuth personally surrendered to British troops on 12 September, after being wounded in the thigh, he refused to order the surrender of the garrison on the ground that as a prisoner of war he no longer had any authority to do so.
_	It welcomed the work of Scottish PSC and others:" "That this House welcomes the Stop the Jewish National Fund (JNF) Campaign launched on 30 March 2011 by the Palestinian Boycott National Committee, the International Jewish Anti-Zionist Network, Scottish Palestine Solidarity Campaign and others to inform the public about the JNF – Karen Kayemet L’Yisrael, its ongoing illegal expropriation of Palestinian land, concealing of destroyed Palestinian villages beneath parks and forests, and prevention of refugees from returning to their homes; notes that the JNF’s constitution is explicitly discriminatory by stating that land and property will never be rented, leased or sold to non-Jews; further notes that the UN rejected the JNF USA’s application for consultative status with the Economic and Social Council on the ground that it violates the principles of the UN Charter on Human Rights; regrets that the Prime Minister is a JNF honorary patron; and believes that there is just cause to consider revocation of the JNF’s charitable status in the UK.
_	The plane was in such a flat spin when it reached the ground that it skidded sideways over the surface of a field until the tail section hit a haystack and broke off.
_	On motion, the trial court set aside the award of damages with respect to the haulage contract on the ground that the damages were unproved.
_	Worse yet, the bugs have been disturbing the sleep of a large entity from a bygone age that has been slumbering for eons beneath the ground that The World is being built upon.
_	After their conversation, Burge-Lubin suggests a game of marine golf, but Confucius refuses on the ground that he is too mature to enjoy playing games.
_	O'Flanagan suggests that his record as Deputy was subject to criticism: when Cranley was asked to present a memorial to the Crown on the state of Government in Ireland, Merbury caused controversy by refusing to affix the Great Seal of Ireland to it, apparently on the ground that some of the complaints were directed against him personally.
_	In 1984, Supreme court uphold decision of Bihar government to forfeit all the copies of book 'Vishwa Itihas (Pratham Bhag)' on the ground that it contained derogatory reference to Mohammad which outraged the religious feelings of the Muslim community.
_	In 1604 he published a treatise entitled "Of the Fabrique of the Church and Churchmens Livings" (London), dedicated to James I, whose chaplain he was, in which he attacked the tendency of puritanism towards ecclesiastical democracy, on the ground that it paved the way for spiritual anarchy.
_	In 1386 the King authorised him to appoint attorneys to act for him in Meath and Louth, on the ground that he was so heavily employed on royal business throughout Ireland that he could not properly attend to his business in these two counties.
_	Typically, each TOID is associated with a polygon that represents the area on the ground that the feature covers, in National Grid coordinates.
_	It would, thus, be a denial of common sense for a driver, whose conduct was objectively dangerous, to be acquitted on the ground that he was not thinking of his manner of driving at the time of the accident
_	Justice Powell, joined by Justice Rehnquist, dissented on the ground that discriminatory intent must be proved primarily by objective evidence.
_	Prabhakara refutes Kumarila’s "Doctrine of Inferability of a cognition" on the ground that there is no reason or mark from which cognition may be inferred, the existence of an object cannot serve as the mark of inference, also the cognition of an object cannot be the mark of inference.
_	The State instead insisted that Osborne’s claim must be brought under 28 U.S.C. §2254, which allows a prisoner to seek “a writ of habeas corpus . . . on the ground that he is in custody in violation of the Constitution.”
_	The Jesuits appealed to the pope to have it condemned on the ground that it contained errors and was very injurious to the Society.
_	He received assistance with tuition fees (following "Gravier v City of Liège") but his application for a student loan was refused on the ground that he did not have ‘settled’ status.
_	The historicity of this story has been questioned on the ground that there are several variants: according to one version the person who withdrew was Amr ibn Ubayd, and according to another the decisive break came in the time of Hasan's successor Qatada ibn De'ama.
_	They forage for their prey amongst foliage and in the leaf litter on the ground that may have accumulated as debris during floods.
_	Naturally enough for a 'Waterloo man' he refused this dubious honour on the ground that he was in bad health and had a family of eight children.
_	When Tarecawawaho (Long Hair or Big Hair) was invited to visit the United States President James Monroe, he refused to do so, upon the ground that it would be too great a condescension.
_	The main empirical criticism is simply that there is no observable quantitative correspondence at all between changes in relative expenditures of labour-time, and changes in relative market prices of products, however measured (the measures are also contested, for example on the ground that qualitatively different kinds of labour cannot be compared and equated).
_	Included in the team's claims were claims that the Tampa Bay Buccaneers' pirate logo diluted the team's California trademark in its own pirate logo and for trade dress dilution on the ground that the League had improperly permitted other teams (including the Buccaneers and Carolina Panthers) to adopt colors for their uniforms similar to those of the Raiders.
_	His capacity for hard work was such that a brother justice asked Hubert de Burgh to excuse him from going on circuit with Pateshull on the ground that he wore out his colleagues by his incessant activity.
_	Nawaz has used the phrase "regressive left" to describe left-leaning people who—in his opinion—pander to Islamism, which he defines as a "global totalitarian theo-political project" with a "desire to impose any given interpretation of Islam over society as law" and which he opposes on the ground that "any desire to impose any version of Islam over anyone anywhere, ever, is a fundamental violation of our basic civil liberties".
_	However, Chan Sek Keong J, delivering judgment on behalf of the Court of Appeal, dismissed this argument on the ground that the Minister's failure to give the appellants an opportunity to make representations neither amounted to unfair treatment nor had prejudiced it in any way.
_	The House of Lords declared that he was not a peer and therefore not so entitled, but the Court of King's Bench released him from his imprisonment on the ground that he was the Earl of Banbury and not Charles Knollys, a commoner.
_	Gopi asks Raghupati Rao for his daughter's hand, but he refuses, on the ground that the hard-up Gopi is not worthy of her.
_	The case was finally dismissed ""on the ground that there was no live controversy"".
_	In Upper Hungary they asked for the revocation of the Tolerance tax imposed by the chamber of Zips County (Szepes, Spiš), on the ground that otherwise the Jews living there would have to pay two such taxes; and they asked also to be relieved from a similar tax paid to the Diet.
_	Socialists frequently oppose free trade on the ground that it allows maximum exploitation of workers by capital.
_	The appellant successfully applied to the Disciplinary Committee to delete certain paragraphs of the statement of case which had been formulated against him by the Council of the Law Society, on the ground that the facts in those paragraphs did not appear in the Inquiry Committee's report.
_	Bairu Tefla, on the other hand, although he is aware of the various sources, which assert that Mengesha was the natural son of Yohannes, has placed him as the son of Gugsa on the ground that "Most of the old people agree that Mengesha was the son of Gugsa, the eldest brother of the sovereign."
_	Byrhthelm was a supporter of Eadwig, and as soon as Edgar became king he reversed this act on the ground that Byrhthelm had not been able to even govern the Diocese of Wells properly.
_	However, because the globe contains no actual stars, and because the circles on the globe are drawn inexactly and ambiguously by a sculptor copying the Hellenistic model rather than by a modern astronomer, the dating of the globe is still uncertain and its source or sources remain controversial; Schaefer's conclusions have been strongly contested (e.g., Dennis Duke, "Journal for the History of Astronomy", February 2006) most particularly on the ground that regardless of the globe's date the constellations on it show large disagreements with the only existing work by Hipparchus.
_	The song proved as successful as the band's previous hits, "This Love" and "Harder to Breathe", hitting No. 1 on the Mainstream Top 40 and Adult Top 40 charts, but it prompted many alternative radio outlets to remove Maroon 5 from their playlists, on the ground that the band's newer songs were too light for alt-rock audiences.
_	In Britain, mines rescue teams may be called to investigate holes in the ground that have appeared because of land surface subsidence into old mineshafts and mine workings.
_	The unvarying and unmerited favor he showed the duke has been accounted for on the ground that he took a paternal interest in the duchess, Ana de Mendoza daughter.
_	Burger, joined by Stewart, Blackmun, and Rehnquist, concurred in the judgment on the ground that the challenged classification was rationally justifiable on the basis of administrative convenience.
_	These claims have been criticized on the ground that social policy, not AI, causes unemployment.
_	Johnny stumbles on a room of instruments levitating and playing on themselves, and then walks into a great hall with an orb embedded into the ground that begins projecting the image of Johnny's mother.
_	The RR battalions and their national service counterparts, the Independent Companies, rarely received much attention in the media but covered most of the ground that was ever covered on aggressive foot patrols by the Rhodesian Forces.
_	The court dismissed the claim against the hospital on the ground that the physicians were not employees of the hospital.
_	It stands on the ground that was once home to the Eagle's Nest Art Colony, which Taft founded in 1898.
_	In 1970, the group was dissolved at the suggestion of Glaberman over James' objections on the ground that it was too small to have an impact.
_	Until the lex Hortensia passed by Quintus Hortensius in 287 BC, the patricians refused to accept the plebiscites as being binding on them on the ground that, because of their exclusion, did not apply to the whole of the people.
_	In Upper Hungary they asked for the revocation of the toleration-tax imposed by the chamber of Zips County (Szepes, Spiš), on the ground that otherwise the Jews living there would have to pay two such taxes; and they asked also to be relieved from a similar tax paid to the Diet.
_	His sentence was commuted to a fine, upon the ground that the offence only amounted to manslaughter.
_	The annual vestry last week ended in a deadlock, as the outgoing officers declined reappointment, and although the vicar nominated Mr J.W. Mather, the choirmaster, as his warden, the church officers objected, on the ground that he was a paid official.
_	The District Court granted a motion to dismiss the indictment on the ground that 207(b) of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 makes the provision for relief by injunction the exclusive remedy under the Act. (269 F Supp 706)
_	One lawsuit was thrown out by U.S. District Judge Loretta Preska in a hearing in early December 2006 on the ground that the allegations in the complaint were too vague.
_	He then withdrew from the vice-chancellorship of the Primrose League, of which he had been one of the founders, on the ground that it no longer represented the policy of Benjamin Disraeli.
_	Zod and the other soldiers celebrate by drinking many cans of rocket fuel, and by the next morning, so many discarded cans litter the ground that Brad and Allan are sick.
_	"″No jurist would maintain that even after a successful revolution the old constitution and the laws based thereupon remain in force, on the ground that they have not been nullified in a manner anticipated by the old order itself.
_	Significantly, he values him only for his superstitious and astrological writings; his scientific writings are dismissed because they contradict Aristotle, but excused on the ground that the author of the astrological works deserves to be listened to even when he is wrong.
_	On 31 January the Constitutional Council rejected the referendum proposal for a Constitutional amendment aimed at extending Nazarbayev's term till 2020, on the ground that the amendment did not specify for how long and how many times the Presidential term could be extended.
_	The bench rejected the Uttar Pradesh government's decision to provide reservation in promotion on the ground that it failed to furnish sufficient valid data.
_	Ball states that Eustace was offered a peerage shortly after the Restoration: with that habit of dithering which was so marked a feature of his last years, he at first accepted the title Baron Portlester (commemorating a renowned fifteenth century relative), and then changed his mind, on the ground that there was little point in creating a title which could not pass to either his son or his nephews.
_	According to the regimental historian, "While the Colonel would have been proud to receive the flag for the regiment as a token of the respect of their Irish comrades, yet he objected to the flag being carried by the regiment, on the ground that it was not an Irish regiment."
_	Finally, the eleventh application was refused on the ground that the Church had failed to prove its existence in Moscow for at least 15 years, although the Constitutional Court had already held that this reason was not valid.
_	In addition to the above justices, the following justices were removed from the Supreme Court of Pakistan on the ground that their appointment to the court was made without consultation with the "de jure" Chief Justice of Pakistan.
_	Morrison asserted that the expulsion of the Sumarin family is a violation of human rights, and part of the systematic transfer of Palestinian property to ideological settlers who wish to put facts on the ground that hinder a lasting peace agreement.
_	At the Restoration of the king in 1660, he was favourably received at court and in 1665 would have received the provostship of Eton College had he agreed to take holy orders, but this he refused to do on the ground that his writings on religious subjects would have greater weight coming from a layman than a paid minister of the Church.
_	In 2009 a court of appeal nullified his election on the ground that a logo of one of the political parties was excluded from the ballot papers in gross violation of the electoral laws.
_	In this case, the Housing and Development Board (HDB), which was the landlord of a flat occupied by the plaintiff, purported to compulsorily acquire the flat on the ground that the plaintiff had breached section 48A of the Housing and Development Act.
_	Some politicians have called for university representation to be abolished, on the ground that it is unacceptable that possession of a degree should confer greater electoral rights than those available to other voters.
_	Two days later the New Zealand Foreign Affairs Minister Murray McCully announced an additional NZ$ 550,000 was to be made available to the Samoan government, as well as the Samoan Red Cross and any agencies on the ground that might need it.
_	The eventual settlement was 6·5%, and Bevins ended up taking the blame for fuelling wage inflation; he felt resentful, on the ground that his own approach would have led to a lower settlement.
_	But surely our Federation will not thereafter be open to objection on the ground that it is an exclusive organization.
_	The appellant's application was dismissed, "inter alia", on the ground that the appellant did not have a lien over the proceeds of the sale in execution.
_	Ultimately, Renée was banished from the court on the ground that she had been lacking in respect toward the queen, Louise of Lorraine.
_	The court rejected the application for judicial review on the ground that such matters were best left to the government.
_	does the third party have a defence to infringement on the ground that the use complained of does not indicate trade origin (i.e. a connection in the course of trade between the goods and the trade mark proprietor)?
_	Paulet pursued the matter relentlessly for a number of years, and in 1596, out of malice, persuaded the Privy Council to dismiss Ughtred from the captaincy of Netley Castle on the ground that his long absence in Ireland had caused him to neglect his charge.
_	The trial court dismissed its suit not because Walker failed to allege the relevant market, the dominance of the patented device therein, and the injurious consequences to Walker of the patent's enforcement, but rather on the ground that the United States alone may "annul or set aside" a patent for fraud in procurement.
_	It occupies the ground that was the courthouse square.
_	These requests were denied after the British government vetoed them on the ground that the same technologies, if transferred, could be also employed in Soviet bombers.
_	They were condemned "on the ground that they are not articles of church furniture requisite for or conducive to conformity with the doctrine or practice of the Church of England in relation to the reception of confession".
_	But this failed because of the opposition from the military on the ground that the line was too close to the French border.
_	This may be disputed on the ground that the islet is not part of Continental Asia since it is only linked to Sentosa by a bridge.
_	Curio opposed this on the ground that it was a false rumour.
_	The request was declined on the ground that "no good could come of the enquiry."
_	But its the grunt on the ground that faces the consequences of their inadequacies.
_	Hoffmann LJ held Mr D'Jan's failure was negligent, but exercised discretion to relieve liability on the ground that he owned almost all of his small business and had only put his own money at risk.
_	Correspondence survives on the subject of Googe's marriage with Mary Darrell, whose father, Thomas Darrell, refused Googe's suit on the ground that she was bound by a previous contract to Sampson Lennard (154520 September 1615), son of John Lennard of Chevening, Kent.
_	Instead, the Visa Centers directed them to the Chinese consulate who then instructed them to apply for Chinese Travel Documents on the ground that they still have Chinese nationality.
_	The United States Circuit Court of the District of Columbia issued an arrest warrant for Bollman and Swartwout (who were already in military custody), slated the case for trial in D.C., and denied the prisoners bail; Judge William Cranch (also the Supreme Court's reporter of decisions) dissented in part on the ground that there was no probable cause for the arrest warrant as required by the Fourth Amendment.
_	Justices Douglas, Black and Fortas dissented on the ground that the phrase “while away from home” goes to geography and not time.
_	Wilhelm Drumann denies the identity of the consul and the praetor, on the ground that it was not customary for a person to hold the praetorship the year after his consulship; but examples of such a mode of proceeding do occur, so Drumann's objection fails.
_	Groundwater pollution, from pollutants released to the ground that can work their way down into groundwater, can create a contaminant plume within an aquifer.
_	There is currently a small stand in the south end of the ground that goes around where the greyhound track was.
_	After the death of Swami Brahmananda, the first president of Ramakrishna Math and Mission, when it was proposed to make Saradananda the next president he declined on the ground that he had been made secretary by Vivekananda and would continue in that post.
_	Unfortunately for the cricketers and officials at Bourda, thousands of spectators had been allowed into the ground that morning.
_	There was considerable expression of public indignation that it should have been suggested that he could have any right as against the state to withhold evidence on the ground that he had put forward.
_	She rationalized the situation on the ground that "[a]t least they were being shown."
_	Carder's husband, parents, and personal obstetricians opposed the C-section on the ground that neither Carder nor the fetus would survive.
_	Though Clement of Alexandria constantly quotes with reverence a work that seems to him to be very useful, and inspired; yet he repeatedly apologizes, when he has occasion to quote it, on the ground that "many people despise it".
_	A few seconds later, Scott informed the ground that "Okay, Houston.
_	WJLA-TV has reported on a case in which American Home Shield refused to pay for replacement of a clothes dryer that caught fire, on the ground that the local fire department had removed the dryer from the home when responding to the call.
_	The wheel is quite large since it had to lift beef carcasses high enough off the ground that the meat was safe from dogs and coyotes.
_	The District Court for the Eastern District of Pennsylvania heard these claims and decided to dismiss the "fraud-on-the-FDA" sections of the complaint on the ground that it was pre-empted by federal law.
_	Madhava rejects Bhaskara on the ground that it is not possible for Brahman to transform at the loss of original nature, and there cannot exist unbridgeable gulf between Cit (Spirit) and Jada (Matter).239
_	The "Chng Suan Tze" decision is more notable for the issues that the Court of Appeal discussed "obiter dicta", having already allowed the appeals on the ground that the respondents had not discharged their burden of proving the President's satisfaction.
_	John McCarten of "The New Yorker" wrote that the film was "about an aging horsecar driver who doesn't want his daughter to go into theatrical work, on the ground that slaving in vaudeville contributed to the death of his beloved wife.
_	The case was dismissed on the ground that SAFA was not an interested person within the meaning of this term as used in the Trade Marks Act No. 94 of 1993, which provides that only an interested party has legal standing to seek relief.
_	The Circuit Court granted Thunder Craft's s motion to dismiss the complaint on the ground that the statute conflicted with federal patent law, and was therefore invalid under the Supremacy Clause of the Federal Constitution.
_	One of the signs was banned by the Israeli Central Elections Committee on the ground that the ad was seen as racist.
_	Similarly, "open fields" such as pastures, open water, and woods may be searched without a warrant, on the ground that conduct occurring therein would have no reasonable expectation of privacy.
_	This position is in most ways quite traditional; for example, it accords well with Rambam's statement that "Yet that an individual should make a claim to prophecy on the ground that God had spoken to him and had sent him on a mission was a thing never heard of prior to "Moses our Master"" ("GP" I:63, S. Pines, 1963).
_	On 4 October, six employees of CET Brăila went on a hunger strike, the protest being carried out even in the company's office, and other two hundred chanted in the institution courtyard, on the ground that they didn't receive, for the last three months, wages and food stamps.
_	Given that Montagu Stuart-Wortley's orders prior to the attack had been "to occupy the ground that is won by the artillery" his dismissal remains a subject of controversy.
_	By judgment of 27 May 1999, the Gerechtshof te's Gravenhage granted Shield Mark's application, which was based on the law of civil responsibility, but dismissed the claims based on trademark law, on the ground that it was the intention of the Governments of the Benelux states and their joint trademark law to preclude sound signs from being registered as trademarks.
_	Islamic banks are supposed to avoid interest, on the ground that the Koran bans all forms of interest categorically.
_	Lewis objected to granting the license unless a proviso was inserted notifying P. Ballade that if the saloon had to be put under police surveillance no further licenses would be granted in any name, taking the ground that Hyland was merely a stool pigeon.
_	Ogbunike who was the eldest of the Iguedos wanted the body to be taken home (Ogbunike) for burial since they are the children of the first child but Nando Objected on the ground that they were the people that took care of her during her old age.
_	The self is found to be a cause of force, free in its action, on the ground that we are obliged to relate the volition of consciousness to the self as its cause, and its ultimate cause.
_	Collectors of dialect words were discouraged from proposing etymologies on the ground that in so doing they might distort the meaning of the words they were collecting.
_	He gained a great reputation for his works in this style, and so nearly approached the manner of the great masters then in vogue, that he was able to sell many of his pictures as their works, excusing himself on the ground that, if he put his own name to them, their merit would never be recognised.
_	Flavian refused to supply this on the ground that churchmen should not hand over church property as bribes (Evagrius II.2).
_	Shankar applied to the High Court for judicial review on the ground that the Committee's ruling was affected by apparent bias.
_	On 26 March, the National Assembly voted to block the referendum on the ground that it would violate the constitutional provision which prohibits popular votes on laws eliminating an unconstitutionality in the field of human rights and fundamental freedoms.
_	Chip and Dale fall through the drilled hole only to see their nuts scattered along the ground that Donald spilled as he left.
_	This challenge was on the ground that the provision violated his right to privacy by authorising inspectors to search his commercial premises and to seize items without a warrant.
_	That trade continued with few interruptions until 1638, when it was prohibited on the ground that the ships were smuggling priests into Japan.
_	The Consul said the emir Abdullah urged acceptance on the ground that realities must be faced, but wanted modification of the proposed boundaries and Arab administrations in the neutral enclave.
_	Along similar legal lines, defendants in a wrongful-death action brought by the survivor of a domestic partnership mounted a defense based partly on the ground that the legislative enactments giving a domestic partner standing to sue for wrongful death ran afoul of Proposition 22 (among other defenses).
_	She has been defended by some, including Commissioner Günther Oettinger, on the ground that she has had to take on a job that combines three previous jobs and is working on establishing the EEAS so she is unable to take on everything at once, nor please everyone.
_	In the dedication of his edition of 1574 "to the Governor, Consuls, Asistentes, &c. of the Company of Merchentes Adventurers," he excuses himself for not entering fully into the merits of arithmetic, on the ground that 'where good wine is to sell, there neede no garlande be hāged out.'
_	On February 21, 2007, however, the conviction was quashed by the Supreme Court of the Russian Federation on the ground that the evidence was insufficient.
_	American artist Jeff Koons submitted a proposal to erect a permanent sculpture of a playground slide; his glass and steel design featured an observation deck above the ground that was accessible via an elevator.
_	The case was tried in Delhi, the CBI justifying the action on the ground that even though the site of the incident was Baroda, the case had national ramifications.
_	Among the most controversial affirmative defenses is the insanity defense, whereby a criminal defendant seeks to be excused from criminal liability on the ground that a mental illness, at the time of the alleged crime, prevented her from understanding the wrongful nature of her actions.
_	Following international terrorism crises in Kenya and Bali in 2002, Barnett and colleagues were alerted by partners on the ground that UK Foreign Office travel warnings advising travelers to avoid these countries were having a disastrous effect on the many communities dependent on tourism.
_	The appeal was based on the ground that the chairman of the Inquiry Committee had contacted a witness to enquire if the witness could assist the committee in its inquiry, but this was not made known to the appellant.
_	The Dodecahedron algorithm is the 3D version of the Hex-Path algorithm, in which the probe is moving in the path through the ground that corresponds to closely packed Dodecahedra, and in each state point, there are three possible path choices.
_	The district court granted Metropolitan Edison's motion to dismiss the complaint of Jackson on the ground that the termination of service was not state action, and hence was not subject to judicial review under the Fourteenth Amendment.
_	Opposition parties boycotted the committee on the ground that it was packed with Congress members.
_	Kenny resigned his parliamentary seat in 1896 on the ground that he could no longer attend the House of Commons regularly.
_	They refused to subscribe the formula of the condemnation of Jansenism, or would subscribe only with a qualification, on the ground that subscription implied internal assent and acquiescence.
_	As counsel to Mrs Swinfen, the plaintiff in the celebrated will case "Swinfen v. Swinfen" (1856), he brought an action for remuneration for professional services, but the verdict given in his favour at Warwick assizes was set aside by the court of Common Pleas, on the ground that a barrister could not sue for the recovery of his fees.
_	Fact is, though, writers like Friedman show that some people are actually willing to plant something in the ground that has been broken by prose poets like Maxine Chernoff, Charles Simic and James Tate.
_	Eutocius mentions that Nicomedes "prided himself inordinately on his discovery of this curve, contrasting it with Eratosthenes's mechanism for finding any number of mean proportionals, to which he objected formally and at length on the ground that it was impracticable and entirely outside the spirit of geometry".
_	However, the convictions were reversed on the ground that the contempts were civil but the lower court had treated them as criminal in nature.
_	The agreement was cancelled on the ground that he was influenced by threat.
_	On her way home, she spots Nino again at the train station, where he drops a photo album on the ground that Amélie takes.
_	In reversing, the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals ruled out any application of Exemption 5 on the ground that the Tribes with whom the Department had consultations with have a direct interest in the subject matter of the consultations.
_	Archaeologically, the site is complicated: close to the bothy there are stones in the ground that appear to have formed part of some earlier construction, perhaps the remains of the summer shieling-huts.
_	Hastings justified his action on the ground that the Rohillas were a danger to the British as uncovering the flank of Awadh.
_	Following this the Australians were able to begin taking the initiative and throughout May they began to slowly recapture some of the ground that had been lost earlier as they undertook a series of Peaceful Penetration operations, including the Second Battle of Morlancourt.
_	By interrogating Chō, the government learns that Shishio plans to raze Kyoto to the ground that night.
_	The High Court rejected the plaintiffs' argument that, by compulsorily acquiring a temple, the Government was limiting a person's right under Article 15(1) of the Constitution to profess, practice and propagate his or her religion, and that this in turn gave him or her the legal right to commence an action on the ground that where an individual's constitutional rights are affected, he or she has a sufficient interest to ensure that his or her rights are protected.
_	That same year, his application for a work of sculpture was dismissed on the ground that in 1889 a statue had been bought at the Salon for the sum of 10,000 francs.
_	While "matriarchy" sometimes means "the political rule of women", that meaning is often rejected, on the ground that matriarchy is not a mirroring of patriarchy.
_	On July 8, 2007, most of the private media outlets (such as Geo and Aaj, among others) became convinced from the movements of the security forces on the ground that they were preparing to storm the building.
_	Special "speed zippers" can be found on the ground that can, if driven over, boost the player's speed for a short time.
_	Although he applied for a patent for his system, it was denied on the ground that it was only an idea, not a device.
_	Some conscientious objectors are so for religious reasons—notably, the members of the historic peace churches, pacifist by doctrine; Jehovah's Witnesses, while not strictly pacifists, refuse to participate in the armed forces on the ground that they believe Christians should be neutral in worldly conflicts.
_	It ultimately also led to increased tensions in Bosnia-Herzegovina, where Republika Srpska vetoed the Kosovo recognition on the ground that it would then secede in order to make up for the loss to Serbia.
_	So many bundles of brocade lay scattered on the ground that this plain became known as Marj-ud-Debaj, i.e. the "Meadow of Brocade", and for this reason the action described has been named the Battle of Marj-ud-Deebaj, or the Battle of Meadow of Brocade.
_	McCulloch was initially agreeable, but Mint Director Pollock raised objection on the ground that government property should not be used to enable private gain.
_	The School Board justified its censorship on the ground that the expressions indicated membership in an “illegal organization” prohibited by School Board policy and were disruptive to the educational process.
_	Walter Sofronoff, for the Anti-Discrimination Tribunal, dismissed the action on the ground that Mr. Lamb did not intend to incite hatred or contempt but rather wanted to let the electors know his opinions on political matters.
_	The high priest (and/or possibly his son Jehoida and the unnamed grandson) was driven out of Jerusalem on the ground that he had defiled the priesthood ().
_	If this happens, it will leave a skeleton on the ground that dissapears after a few turns.
_	After Burton was retried and convicted, the Court affirmed, inter alia, on the ground that the agreement between Burton and Rialto had occurred in St. Louis.
_	In July 2017, Larissa Waters, an Australian Senator born in Winnipeg, Manitoba, was disqualified on the ground that she has dual Canadian and Australian citizenship.
_	In October 1736 he had for some time been a prisoner for debt in Paris, but on appeal to the parliament of Paris he was set at liberty, on the ground that one of his rank was not liable to confinement for debt.
_	On May 2, 1774, Lord North, speaking as head of the ministry, called on Parliament to adopt the Act on the ground that the whole colony was "in a distempered state of disturbance and opposition to the laws of the mother country."
_	He continued to be principally occupied with the administration of the criminal law, and in 1700 he petitioned the crown for a grant of the forfeited estate of Joseph Horton of Cotton Abbotts in Cheshire, on the ground that he had been more diligent in the discovery and conviction of criminals than any other person in the kingdom, and that he had been a loser by it, his post only being worth £80 annually (£ in ), with few perquisites, and usually being regarded as a mere stepping-stone to a judgeship in Westminster Hall.
_	He afterwards brought an action against Proxenus on the ground that he had robbed him of some money and plate.
_	The settlement was challenged (by the local council that would receive the remainder) on the ground that the idea of "relatives" and "dependants" was too uncertain.
_	He wrote that a politician "aims at establishing the expediency or the harmfulness of a proposed course of action; if he urges its acceptance, he does so on the ground that it will do good; if he urges its rejection, he does so on the ground that it will do harm."
_	On the south end of the draw there is a depression in the ground that is thought to be the remnants of a 19th-century dugout that may have been occupied during the period of historical significance.
_	In 1587 he was appointed by the king to the bishopric of Caithness; but, on his referring the matter to the General Assembly, they refused to ratify the appointment, on the ground that the office was "not agreeable to the word of God".
_	This view, which largely conforms to common-sense folk psychology, was held in part on the ground that while causal laws must be strict and deterministic, explanation in terms of reasons need not.
_	This was refused on the ground that neither of them had taken the Solemn League and Covenant.
_	These injunctions were justified on the ground that the money extorted was devoted to divine service.
_	He once submitted a paper on the theory of magnetic storms and auroras to the American journal "Terrestrial Magnetism and Atmospheric Electricity" only to have his paper rejected on the ground that it did not agree with the theoretical calculations of conventional physics of the time.
_	Charles rejected an appeal for mercy from his sister, the princess Ulrica, on the ground that Patkul, as a traitor, could not be pardoned for example's sake.
_	In 2002, the Indian coalition government led by the Bharatiya Janata Party (BJP) changed the school textbooks for social sciences and history, on the ground that certain passages offended the sensibilities of some religious and caste groups.
_	The respondent refused to produce documents on the ground that they were not subject to discovery, and were protected as privileged matter obtained in preparation for litigation.
_	"Bantu Philosophy" has been criticized, primarily on the ground that conclusions are gross generalizations which seek to characterize the thought of an entire continent, which, it is argued, it is fundamentally impossible to do in any meaningful way.
_	On 13 November 1641, Fletcher, with others, was appointed to his judgeship afresh by the king and parliament, and his appointment was objected to by the laird of Moncrieff, upon the ground that he was incapacitated by having purchased lands the subject of litigation before him.
_	One of these pamphlets was complained of by William Fiennes, 1st Viscount Saye and Sele, father of Colonel Fiennes, to the House of Lords, on the ground that it impugned his reputation.
_	Governor-General Warren Hastings later augmented the territory of Awadh by lending the nawab a British army to conquer Rohilkhand in the Rohilla War, and by giving Allahabad and Kora to Awadh on the ground that Shah Alam had placed himself in the power of the Marathas.
_	Counsel for the Central Government, appearing for the respondents contended that the Court should decline to interfere with the show cause notice on the ground that it is open to the petitioner to show cause, which the authority is bound to examine and decide and that the ultimate order to be made was appealable under the Act.
_	In 1637 he was one of those entrusted by the lords of the admiralty with fitting out ships at the expense of the city of London in accordance with the ship-money edict of 1636, and the attorney-general and the recorder of London shortly afterwards exhibited an information against him in the exchequer court on the ground that he had not provided sufficient men and ammunition.
_	Despite the counterfeiting, the Mint ceased striking coppers in 1775 on the ground that there were sufficient legal farthings and halfpennies in commerce.
_	He then suggests that if you mix these two colors you end up with the brown sandy soil color, which signifies both the floors and the ground that support the feet of the populace of the Soviet Union.
_	He appealed on the ground that the jury was misinstructed about the standard of "proof beyond a reasonable doubt".
_	A party cannot be allowed to get any relief on the ground that he had done some particular act in ignorance of law.
_	The recessional platform under her sculpture raised them just enough off the ground that they appeared to float on a thin line of shadow.
_	Jack initially won the title by getting up as Sandman was unable to answer the referee's ten count until Bill Alfonso restarted the match on the ground that a title did not change hands on countouts.
_	In a landmark decision, the United States Supreme Court reversed the convictions on the ground that the due process clause of the United States Constitution guarantees the effective assistance of counsel at a criminal trial.
_	He is possibly the Harpocration mentioned by Julius Capitolinus ("Life of Verus", 2) as the Greek tutor of Lucius Verus (2nd century AD); some authorities place him much later, on the ground that he borrowed from Athenaeus.
_	The court noted that the State is entitled to resist a claim by the accused for access to any particular document in the police docket on the grounds that such access was not justified for the purposes of enabling the accused properly to exercise his or her right to a fair trial, or on the ground that it had reason to believe that there was a reasonable risk that access to the relevant document would lead to the disclosure of the identity of an informer or State secrets, or on the grounds that there was a reasonable risk that such disclosure might lead to the intimidation of witnesses or otherwise prejudice the proper ends of justice.
_	Neither was the regulation faulted, nor could it be, on the ground that without overnight sleeping the plight of the homeless could not be communicated in other ways.
_	An alternative escape method would be to use the "Black Lock" which is a hatch on the ground that spawns in a random area after the number of generators repaired equals one more than there are survivors left alive in the game (i.e. 3 generators repaired with only 2 survivors still living).
_	However, the courts have often justified under-inclusiveness on the ground that the legislature is free to recognize degrees of harm, to confine its restrictions to cases where the need is felt to be the greatest, and to advance its policies step by step.
_	Instead of remaining in North Carolina, he was determined to march into Virginia, justifying the move on the ground that until Virginia was reduced, he could not firmly hold the more southerly states he had just overrun.
_	Kohlmann refused to do so on the ground that his information had been received under the seal of the confessional.
_	In 1859 he unsuccessfully petitioned the Massachusetts legislature "to enact that no person, who has been held as a slave, shall be delivered up, by any officer or court, State or Federal, within this Commonwealth, to anyone claiming him on the ground that he owes 'service or labor' to such claimant, by the laws of one of the Slave States of this Union."
_	In 1944, the State of California filed a petition to declare an escheat of the eight acres (32,000 m²) of land on the ground that the purchases made in 1934 and 1937 had been made with intent to violate and evade the Alien Land Law.
_	The Jacobin Club refused to admit Babeuf and René-François Lebois, on the ground that they were ""égorgeurs"" ("throat-cutters").
_	I am sure that some purists will reverse my decision on the ground that the author to get her effect, has broken what they consider to be one of the major rules of detective writing; but I hold that in a Poirot tale it should be a case of caveat lector, and that the rules were not made for Agatha Christie."
_	That trade continued with few interruptions until 1638, when it was prohibited on the ground that the ships were smuggling priests into Japan.
_	Chick Kam Choo v. Exxon Corp., , was a United States Supreme Court case in which the Court held that a federal court's dismissal of a civil action on the ground that it should be heard in a foreign court, under the doctrine of forum non conveniens, does not preclude the plaintiff from filing the same action in a state court that applies different forum non conveniens rules.
_	Though Nankervis was beaten in the ruck by Brodie Grundy (45-18 hit-outs), it was his work around the ground that impressed coach Damien Hardwick.
_	He noted that "all modern industry depends upon programmed computers, and one must be astute not to defeat patents on the ground that the subject matter is excluded under Article 52 unless the invention lies in excluded subject matter "as such"" (emphasis added).
_	The Borphukan pleaded his inability to accede to the request on the ground that Gadapani was supported by the whole body of nobles, and he alone as an individual could not deviate from the unanimous decision of his colleagues.
_	There is a right of appeal to the Court of Appeal against a decision of the Inspector-General which confirms the certificate, on the ground that the decision is "erroneous in point of law" (Immigration Act 1987 s 114P(1)).
_	On 14 February 2013, hundreds of Oltchim employees protested in front of the Ministry of Economy headquarters, on the ground that they didn't receive wages for two months.
_	The sooner she did so, the sooner she would receive the desired portion of her pension" (para. 72), the Court concluded that Ms. Andrejeva already "has the status of a “permanently resident non-citizen” of Latvia, the only State with which she has any stable legal ties and thus the only State which, objectively, can assume responsibility for her in terms of social security" (para. 88) and that "dismissing the victim's claims on the ground that he or she could have avoided the discrimination by altering one of the factors in question – for example, by acquiring a nationality – would render Article 14 devoid of substance" (para. 91).
_	They also apply their doctrine not merely to human but also to Divine and natural laws, on the ground that the Divine legislator is not more exacting than a human legislator.
_	He was tried for deception and forgery at the Old Bailey in July 1870, but acquitted on the ground that the jury believed he had sufficient authority to use the name of the drawer of the bill.
_	This spider typically dwells in a vertical tube dug into the ground that may reach as deep as eight inches.
_	He also attempted to negotiate an Ottoman loan to the French crown, but was denied it on the ground that a Muslim could not lend money to Christians.
_	The court rejected Cryer's third motion, in which Cryer had asked for dismissal on the ground that he had not, with respect to a trust mentioned in the indictment, created that trust for the purpose of evading taxes.
_	Independently of the allegation against Rahman, the petition also requested the election to be set aside on the ground that the returning officer John Williams or his officials, or both, failed to conduct the election correctly under election law.
_	Burbery Mortgage Finance & Savings Ltd v Hindsbank Holdings Ltd [1989] 1 NZLR 356 is a cited case in New Zealand regarding promissory estoppel, and the ground that their needs to be a pre existing legal relationship before this doctrine applies.
_	Music proper he calls artificial on the ground that everyone could by dint of study become a musician; poetry he calls natural because he says it is not an art that can be acquired but a gift.
_	Holdheim pleads for progress, on the ground that at all times the Torah has been taught, in accordance with the changing conditions of succeeding ages; but this progress he holds to be a gradual development, never a noisy opposition to recognized existing standards.
_	The application of this article was sought to be extended to all the Directive Principles by the 42nd Amendment in 1970, but the Supreme Court struck down the extension as void on the ground that it violated the basic structure of the Constitution.
_	Points are identified on the ground that represent the outline of the crown and marked in a way so that the next point is always visible from the prior one.
_	Judge Rader dissented on the ground that the majority should have "said in a single sentence: 'Because Bilski claims merely an abstract idea, this court affirms the Board's rejection.'"
_	In 1602, he sold the lands to Richard Boyle, 1st Earl of Cork, who subsequently prospered under kings James I and Charles I. Following Raleigh's death, members of his family approached Boyle for compensation on the ground that Raleigh had struck an improvident bargain.
_	He suggested that the pilots may have seen lights on the ground that were distorted by haze.
_	In addition, section 15 of the Act defined the power of U.S. district attorneys to institute denaturalization proceedings: "in any court having jurisdiction to naturalize aliens for the purpose of setting aside and canceling the certificate of citizenship on the ground of fraud or on the ground that such certificate of citizenship was illegally procured
_	Police said that a heel on the boots was worn down in an unusual way and left a distinctive pattern on the ground that matched heel impressions in an alleged trail of footprints between the vicarage and the scene of the crime.
_	At this game Clapham was handed a piece of paper as he entered the ground that read:
_	Medical industries are excluded from “industries”, however, and grants of patents for inventions of acts of medical treatment are not recognized, on the ground that they are not industrially applicable.
_	Statisticians have also criticized the validity of international statistical comparisons using national accounts data, on the ground that in the real world, the estimates are rarely compiled in a uniform way – despite appearances to the contrary.
_	This gives five days for the presentation of a petition under Article 27, to "request the President to decline to sign and promulgate as a law [the Bill,] on the ground that the Bill contains a proposal of such national importance that the will of the people thereon ought to be ascertained".
_	It was frozen with three of the six other ordinances passed by the colonial Legislative Council as private members' bills also on the ground that these laws were hastily passed during the last week of the legislature in June 1997 without adequate discussion in bill committees and public consultation.
_	At the twentieth Zionist Congress, held in Zurich in August 1937, the Peel Commission's plan was discussed and rejected on the ground that a larger part of Palestine should be assigned to them.
_	But in 1953, he resigned from his party on the ground that the party was against Kemalism.
_	The APA claims that it condemns the use of any of the following practices by military interrogators trying to elicit anti-terrorism information from detainees, on the ground that "there are no exceptional circumstances whatsoever, whether induced by a state of war or threat of war, internal political instability or any other public emergency, that may be invoked as a justification."
_	There is a concrete gutter on the ground that surrounds the building and directs rain water down the hill.
_	Again, there is no causal connection between X's initial criminal acts and the territory of State B, and seeking to found jurisdiction simply on the ground that Y died within its borders, is not wholly convincing given that Y is not a national of State B and so neither owes allegiance nor is owed any duty of protection as a part of State B's social contract.
_	For example, philosopher John Rawls distinguishes between jealousy and envy on the ground that jealousy involves the wish to keep what one has, and envy the wish to get what one does not have.
_	Aguleri sensing the loss of case, sued Umueri in 1935 but lost too on the ground that they too could not establish exclusive ownership of the land.
_	The IPAB on 26 June 2009 modified the decision of the Assistant Controller of Patents and Designs stating that ingredients for grant of patent "novelty" and "non obviousness to person skilled in the art" were present in the application but rejected the application on the ground that the drug is not a new substance but an amended version of a known compound and that Novartis was unable to show any significant increase in the efficacy of the drug and it, therefore, failed the test laid down by section 3(d) of the Indian Patents Act.
_	The family filed a petition under Article 32 challenging the 1953 Punjab Act on the ground that it denied them their constitutional rights to acquire and hold property and practice any profession (Articles 19(f) and (g)) and to equality before and equal protection of the law (Article 14).
_	Inverting a walking cane creates a simple u-shaped curve on the ground that the individual can focus on stepping over.
_	However, in December 2016, France's highest administrative court, the Conseil d'Etat, canceled the extradition order, on the ground that Russia had a political motive in making the extradition request.
_	After the defendants' convictions were affirmed by the Alabama Supreme Court, Leibowitz appeared before the U.S. Supreme Court to participate in the appeal of Patterson's and Norris's convictions on the ground that blacks were systematically excluded from Alabama's juries.
_	It seems that, on the day before his admission to this degree, he wrote to Williams, as public orator of the university, the letter already cited, in which, on the ground that the restoration of the royal family was also the restoring of the church, he begs Williams officially to "insist chiefly on the services of his family to the church as their greatest honour," and, if one more word must be said of himself personally, entreats that it might be "barely this – that he had always been a lover of learning and learned men."
_	He refused to become Archbishop of Tuam in 1716, on the ground that the stipend was inadequate.
_	This version of the Constitution, which contained an Article 10 much more similar to the present day version, also included a new Article 4(2) which provides that "The validity of any law shall not be questioned on the ground that...it imposes such restrictions as are mentioned in Article 10(2)".
_	Despite this naval defeat, it was on the ground that this war would be won; Napoleon inflicted on the Austrian and Russian Empires one of their greatest defeats at Austerlitz (also known as the "Battle of the Three Emperors" on 2 December 1805), destroying the Third Coalition.
_	While it must be admitted that the secret, when disclosed, smacks rather of "The Thousand and One Nights" than of modern international rivalry for scientific talents, it may surely be excused on the ground that it provides Mrs. Christie with a story-tellers holiday from the rigours of detective fiction.
_	The district court dismissed the bill, however, on the ground that no infringement had been proved.
_	They held that equity relieves on the ground that:
_	This produces thick mulch on top of the ground that both inhibits weed growth and adds vital nutrients to the soil.
_	This same tail-down attitude meant that when operating from grass airfields the jet exhaust would create a long furrow in the ground that "three men could lie down in".
_	However, writs of "certiorari" are traditionally only used when "the inferior body has acted without jurisdiction or determined an issue wrongly in law, but not on the ground that it had misconceived a point of law if it had jurisdiction and the proceedings are "ex facie" regular, nor on the ground that its decision is wrong in fact".
_	The Commissioner of Internal Revenue ("Commissioner") disallowed the deductions on the ground that the respondent did not meet the definition of "away from home" under § 162(a)(2) because his trip did not require him to sleep or rest.
_	In February 2015, the ECHR upheld the lawfulness of whole life orders, on the ground that they can be reviewed in exceptional circumstances, following a fresh challenge by murderer Arthur Hutchinson, who had been sentenced to life imprisonment for a triple murder in Sheffield more than 30 years earlier.
_	Usually wallows are shallow dips in the ground that have been flooded and were full of dirt and those two have mixed to make a squishy mud wallow.
_	Redesdale was also a frequent speaker on general topics, e.g. the Reform Bill of 1867, when he opposed Earl Grey's amendment for the disfranchisement of certain boroughs, on the ground that the matter was beyond the proper jurisdiction of the peers, and that it was a mistake to make the franchise a party question.
_	The Supreme Court of Illinois affirmed, solely on the ground that the petition raised no substantial state or federal constitutional question.
_	This policy was established on the ground that women are primary and central support for domestic subjects and their early retirement (at the age of 50–55) would be beneficial to their overall family functioning.
_	The consent judgment eliminated the earlier compulsory licensing order on the ground that the need for compulsory licensing of patents would be lessened following separation of AT&T’s carrier and equipment businesses from one another.
_	Campbell refused to comply on the ground that the resolution was unlawful.
_	"Furthermore, they [the Logothetai] kept grinding down the soldiers with many other forms of penalties, as though to requite them thus for the dangers incurred in the wars, charging some with being "Greeks", as though it were wholly impossible for any man from Greece to be a decent man, others with being in the service without an order from the Emperor, even though they could show, on this point, an imperial order, which, however, the Logothetes with no hesitation had the effrontery to denounce; and others still they accused on the ground that for some days they had chanced to be absent from their comrades.
_	Cato changed his mind and supported this on the ground that any government was better than no government.
_	During the night, word was brought to Munro, who had taken up a position outside the town, that the victorious troops within were in a state of disorder, drinking, burning, and plundering, but he declined to direct a night attack, on the ground that it was unfair.
_	Specifically, if a patentee defended price-fixing on the ground that it was permissible under the 1926 "General Electric" case, the government could overcome that defense by showing the patent was invalid.
_	Pedants insisted that this image was impossible as it implied the existence of two suns in different quarters of the sky; Fischer dismissed the criticism on the ground that if the very notion of a knight playing chess with Death were accepted, two suns in the sky should be no more incredible.
_	The statute now under consideration is attacked upon the ground that it authorizes an unconstitutional interference with the freedom of contract included within the guaranties of the due process clause of the Fifth Amendment.
_	At the close of the Government's case the defendants moved to strike from the record all of the exhibits and testimony received subject to connection, on the ground that no "prima facie" showing of any conspiracy had been made, that such exhibits and testimony had not been shown to be in furtherance or in execution of any conspiracy, and that such exhibits had not otherwise been connected to the alleged conspiracy.
_	The defendants moved also to dismiss the complaint on the ground that upon the facts and the law the plaintiff had shown no right to relief.
_	When the third child was only three days old, DSS transferred him to a foster home on the ground that immediate removal was necessary to avoid imminent danger to his life or health.
_	He ordered it to be sold, and dismissed Morgan's claims, on the ground that his mortgage "could not be acknowledged."
_	Mason, who may have been angry that Lee had not been chosen, refused on the ground that he was needed at home, and did not feel he could resign from the General Assembly without permission from his constituents.
_	However, the idea to add the word "Road" was opposed on the ground that the street name was unique in that it was named after and had a similar historical development as Smithfield, London.
_	The third creature from the 3 guardians with a helmet resembling a skull, he uses the Darkness spell by striking his broadsword's blade at the ground that creates a radius of certain length.
_	MoD, agrees to pay part of the arrears from 1.1.1986 to 31.12.1995 but objects to paying arrears from 1.1.1996 to 31.12.2005 on the ground that Supreme Court orders lacked clarity for payment and re-fixation from 1.1.2006
_	In an effort to hold the ground that had been gained, a third company (A Company, 1st Battalion, 132nd Infantry Regiment) was dispatched to reinforce B Company, but it too came under heavy fire and was held up.
_	In 1537 he asked for it to be exempted from confiscation on the ground that it was part of the Diocese of Kildare.
_	Part of the problem concerning the stencil buffer restrict the display of the reflected scene only on the ground that.
_	If the rescission or variation is sought on the ground that the judgment is void "ab origine", or was obtained by fraud or mistake, rule 49(8) provides that the application must be served and filed within one year after the applicant first had knowledge of such voidness, fraud or mistake.
_	On the case being appealed to the Privy Council, this particular indictment was dismissed on the ground that the vicar, not the bishop, was responsible for the presence of the lights.
_	On the other hand, the fountain nearest Yonge street is also near a protrusion in the ground that has become a popular seat.
_	It distinguished statutes which merely prohibited "transportation" of articles through the mails barring interstate commerce on the ground that the language of the Denture Act focused on the "sending or bringing into" a state or territory of the dentures.
_	So they went to the Chancery Court and presented a petition to wind up the company on the ground that it was insolvent under the Insolvency Act 1986 ss 122(f) and 123(1)(a).
_	Beside the gray, stone base is a small chamber set flush with the ground that contains a piece of steel from the World Trade Center donated by the parents of firefighter Michael Lynch, who perished in the attack.
_	He passed for 2,224 yards and 18 touchdowns and added 684 yards and 12 touchdowns on the ground that season.
_	The will was disputed by his sister, Mrs. Catherine O'Brien Butler, on the ground that, having reconformed to Catholicism, he was incapable of making one.
_	To the second question he demurred on the ground that his knowledge (if any) arose from a confidential communication made to him in the exercise of his clerical functions, which the principles of his religion forbade him to disclose, nor was he bound by the law of the land to answer.
_	Providence sought to defend on the ground that it was licensed to engage in the allegedly infringing conduct, but the court held that the license was "restricted to the manufacture of cloths to be japanned, marbled, and variegated, as therein described, and that it confers no authority to manufacture any of the articles specified in the bill of complaint."
_	Lord Russell CJ, giving the court's leading judgment, held the bylaw was valid on the ground that it was not unreasonable, because did not have a discriminatory impact on the population.
_	Sherri Finkbine, known to television viewers as "Miss Sherri," sought hospital approval for abortion on the ground that she had been taking thalidomide and believed her child would be born deformed.
_	"The second generation Japanese can only be evacuated either as part of a total evacuation, giving access to the areas only by permits, or by frankly trying to put them out on the ground that their racial characteristics are such that we cannot understand or trust even the citizen Japanese.
_	Questioned years later about these reports in the Commons he defended himself on the ground that "all men make mistakes".
_	The Singapore courts prefer the inherent tendency test to the real risk test on the ground that Singapore's unique conditions necessitate that attacks on the integrity and impartiality of the courts be dealt with more firmly.
_	Mayor Rudy Giuliani objected to the exhibition on grounds of decency and taste, and withdrew the public funding from the museum and moved to break the lease on the ground that the museum wasn't following its mandate.
_	Madani's wife Soofiya Madani was arrested by Kerala Police on 19 December 2009 on the ground that she had taken an active role in Kalamassery Tamil Nadu state transportation corporation bus burning case.
_	So, for instance, if A intentionally and falsely leads B to believe that certain land belongs to A, and thereby induces B to buy and pay for it, and only later does A acquire the land, then A is not allowed to argue to void the sale on the ground that, at the time of the sale, he had no title.
_	Justice Reed, joined by Jackson, dissented on the ground that a state has the power to exclude all aliens from enjoyment of its natural resources, including its fisheries, and that a classification excluding such aliens as are ineligible to citizenship is not unreasonable.
_	According to the Turkish daily "Milliyet", some politicians criticized the decision of the municipality on the ground that Diogenes searched for an honest man and thus insulted the honest people of Sinop.
_	In June 2008, the Hindu Munnani threatened to block Kamal Hassan's film "Dasavatharam" on the ground that certain scenes in the film affected the sentiments of Hindus.
_	A Catholic organization initiated proceedings on the ground that the prospectus insulted a group because of its religion.
_	The crew notices big holes in the ground that have filled with water.
_	Act gave a right to appeal to the Court of Appeal or the Supreme Court where "That the verdict of the jury should be set aside on the ground that it is unreasonable or cannot be supported having regard to the evidence".
_	Pinsker and Grätz, confounding him with Daniel ha-Babli of Cairo, make him a Mohammedan convert to Karaism, on the ground that he is quoted by Karaite scholars, and is called by Hadasi "ger ẓedeḳ" (pious proselyte).
_	Local studies have shown a correlation between the growth of Psilocybe Weilii above the ground that leaking sewage pipes are buried under.
_	The board of supervisors declined to pay the bill, on the ground that the law was unconstitutional.
_	Oaks, in the opinion delivered by the court, held that the order barring the media from using the words "Sugarhouse rapist" or disseminating any information on past convictions of defendant during the pendency of the criminal trial was invalid on the ground that it was not accompanied by the procedural formalities required for the issuance of such an order.
_	The governor then asked the New York State Senate to remove Kelsey on the ground that "while honest he utterly lacks in force and initiative", but after a lengthy hearing in the Judicial Committee, Kelsey was upheld by a vote of 27 to 24 on May 3, 1907.
_	Courtship displays include active gestures such as flat running, building nest scrapes (small shallow cavities in the ground that are later built into nests), and fighting/running to defend a breeding territory (mainly by males)
_	Justice Powell wrote an opinion rested on the ground that the school board rule was too overinclusive to survive equal protection analysis.
_	The request was refused by Bangladesh on the ground that the two countries do not have an extradition treaty.
_	a will on the ground that "the good that I shall leave, will not pay all I owe".
_	For example, in the United Kingdom, to liquidate a company voluntarily on the ground that it cannot by reason of its insolvency continue its business, requires an extraordinary resolution.
_	The earl ordered Magrath's release on the ground that only the Holy Father had authority to lay hands on his ""friend and ally"".
_	and other producers, on the ground that their property is being vandalized constantly as a consequence of the film.
_	Acknowledging that the Amendment disadvantaged candidates who financed their own campaigns, Griffith upheld the law on the ground that this disadvantage was the result of candidates' voluntary decisions to self-finance.
_	Harrigan commenced an eight-week probe into the incident which included interviewing the B-1 crew, the air controller, and the other U.S. troops who were on the ground that day as well as examining the U.S. equipment used in the strike, such as the bomber's targeting pod, and listening to radio transmissions.
_	At the end of his investigation, Harrigan declared that the "incident was avoidable," and put the blame largely on Captain Derrick Anderson, the commander of the U.S. troops on the ground that day, the unnamed Air Force joint terminal attack controller who had guided the airstrike, and mistakes made by the B-1 crew.
_	Mead, on the ground that the patron's right had lapsed, obtained a presentation under the Great Seal.
_	Denied work after the war (on the ground that she had to have a college degree to be a director), she was forced, at age forty-two, to return to Mizoguchi as a script girl.
_	In his visit to Syria in 637 to receive surrender of Jerusalem, Amr ibn al-Aas tried to convince Umar for the invasion of Egypt, but Umar rejected on the ground that Muslim rule in Syria was still not firm.
_	He closed down "The Tribune" and its sister newspaper "The Weekend Tribune", on the ground that they did not inform him of a change of ownership.
_	As it was constructed on the ground that served as the main basketball court, the ground floor, 1st and 2nd floors were merged to provide a new basketball court, which is open to the playground on two sides.
_	Dolan justified accessing the list on the ground that Bork himself had stated that Americans only had such privacy rights as afforded them by direct legislation.
_	At the last minute, Cincinnati city officials decided to drive pilings into the ground that would someday allow the highway's central portion to be covered with a park.
_	The footnote in "Torcaso v. Watkins" referenced "Fellowship of Humanity v. County of Alameda", a 1957 case in which an organization of humanists sought a tax exemption on the ground that they used their property "solely and exclusively for religious worship."
_	The judges decided against him, on the ground that the post was merely an office conferred by the crown; but the king settled the question by reappointing him his serjeant on 6 May.
_	Concerned about the problem, authorities ruled that the Russian Mental Health Law should not be applied to senior officials and the judiciary on the ground that they are vested with parliamentary or judicial immunity.
_	And if the proceedings should be treated as involving a final determination as on issues joined to the right to such possession and custody, there was no complaint of want of notice or of hearing, and the summary made adopted did not in itself affect the jurisdiction of the Circuit Court upon the ground that it had exceeded its powers."
_	Six days later an appeals court judge overruled the decision on the ground that the original sentence violated the Constitution.
_	One who seeks to justify an assault on the ground that he acted in self-defense must show that he used no more force than the exigency reasonably demanded.
_	Beginning in August 1853, when an American citizen, the same Gootman referred to above, received orders from the authorities of La Chaux-de-Fonds, canton of Neuchâtel, to leave that canton on the ground that he was a Jew, Fay, though at first disinclined to take any very energetic stand, finally became much interested in the subject of Swiss discrimination against Jews and kept up an active agitation until his recall in 1860.
_	Both men, on the advice of counsel, refused to say whether or not they knew Ms. Bentely on the ground that an answer might tend to incriminate them...
_	In a factual (empirical) criticism, an objection is raised about an idea, argument, action or situation on the ground that there is something wrong with the evidence of the known experience relevant to it.
_	He seems to have returned to Rome, where he took his seat in the senate, but in the following year, Publius Rutilius, one of the tribunes of the plebs, ordered him to vacate it, on the ground that when he had been surrendered to the Numantines, he had lost his Roman citizenship.
_	She argues for women's education principally on the ground that it enables women to be better companions.
_	A three-judge panel of the United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit upheld a New York law on the ground that wearing a Ku Klux Klan mask did not convey a protected message beyond that conveyed by wearing a hood and robe.
_	In British Columbia, Vancouver, Victoria and Kelowna adverts were barred on the ground that no religious advertisement is allowed on buses.
_	After the party was defeated in the 1950 elections, the new ruling party, Democrat Party decided to expropriate all property CHP owned on the ground that the property had been acquired during the single-party regime (1923–1945).
_	This case has been criticised on the ground that it fails to give adequate weight to the context of employment contracts, which differ from commercial contracts, particularly in light of developments in the law of unjust enrichment and the decision of "Autoclenz Ltd v Belcher".
_	On December 4, 2008, NVIDIA moved to stay litigation on all of Rambus' infringement claims, on the ground that the ITC proceeding automatically stayed litigation on the Barth/Ware patents pursuant to 28 U.S.C. 1659, and that, inter alia, the FH patents involved many of the same products involved in the ITC proceedings.
_	In practice, bombardiers would often set up their ground speed measurements in advance of approaching the target area by selecting a convenient "target" on the ground that was closer to the bomber and thus had more obvious motion in the sight.
_	In this letter, he and his colleagues criticized Istanbul Sehir University administration on the ground that new-appointed rector, Ali Atif Bir, is close to the Gulen Movement and once defended headscarf-ban in Turkey.
_	Judge Holtzoff denied the motion on the ground that the balance of equities favored the government.
_	Pluralism has been challenged on the ground that it is not supported by empirical evidence.
_	That rule does not, on the other hand, bar the employer from later challenging an individual employee's ballot on the ground that he or she is not an employee within the meaning of the Act, as for example in the case of a supervisor.
_	Tan Yock Lin has opined that the Court of Appeal was incorrect in dismissing over-inclusiveness on the ground that section 37(1) applies to all Singapore citizens as a class.
_	The government appealed their sentences and successfully pursued harsher punishments on the ground that their crime involved a large-scale unlawful assembly with a high risk of violence.
_	Mary Lee Settle was one of the founders of the PEN/Faulkner award after controversy at the 1979 National Book Award, when PEN voted a boycott on the ground that they were too commercial.
_	In some cases it is desirable for reliability and safety reasons to ignite a rocket engine on the ground that will be used all the way to orbit.
_	County was reversed upon the ground that it erred in granting an injunction against the Board of Education.
_	Sr, winner of the inaugural Sandover Medal, said that one of his outstanding memories was of Harold Oliver, stating that when he was a boy he was "taken by his father to see Port play at Kalgoorlie in 1913; The memory of Oliver's brilliant game is as vivid in my mind today as it was when I left the ground that day.
_	The district court should not have rejected this safe harbor on the ground that it did.
_	He sought an order admitting him on the ground that the special admission programs for minorities violated the U.S. and California constitutions, and Title VI of the Civil Rights Act.
_	The court's order came in response to the pleas of the charged auditors seeking a stay on the disciplinary proceedings against them on the ground that it violated their fundamental right against self-incrimination under Article 20 (3) of the Constitution of India.
_	In China, the diviner may enter a trance and make markings on the ground that are interpreted by an associate (often a young or illiterate boy).
_	See rejected their petition for separation the following year, on the ground that three was “too small a number for a well-formed community”.
_	Linear logic, in which duplicated hypotheses 'count' differently from single occurrences, leaves out both of these rules, while relevant (or relevance) logics merely leaves out the latter rule, on the ground that "B" is clearly irrelevant to the conclusion.
_	In 1995, Pondick made her first sculpture of a tree using fruit scattered on the ground that incorporated human teeth.
_	Aware of the hostile feeling against him, he tendered his resignation to Sir Charles Hotham, by whom it was accepted on the ground that the Queen's government of the colony was endangered, and with the implied pledge that compensation should be given Mr. Foster for the pecuniary loss which he would sustain by his retirement from the public service.
_	The abandonment of the project amidst the couple's divorce proceedings led to a "huge hole in the ground that has become an eyesore to Geneva residents" according to Alexei Barrionuevo in a 2012 article in the "New York Times".
_	The abacá plant is stoloniferous, meaning that the plant produces runners or shoots along the ground that then root at each segment.
_	He drew a half-octagon dining room table that attached to a wall, with rolling stools so low to the ground that they seem built for children.
_	At one point, Allard's contract was suspended temporarily "on the ground that her deplorable habit of producing two children every eighteen months caused her to be constantly in a condition which was destructive of all stage effect."
_	In 2001 visit to India, the Chairman of the Standing Committee of the National People's Congress Li Peng rejected all the accusations against China to Indian media and strongly maintained on the ground that "his country was not giving any nuclear arms to Pakistan nor transferring related-technology to it."
_	Applying that Fourth Amendment prohibition on unreasonable search and seizure to arrest, Scalia dissented from the Court's 1991 decision in "County of Riverside v. McLaughlin", allowing a 48-hour delay before a person arrested without a warrant is taken before a magistrate, on the ground that at the time of the adoption of the Fourth Amendment, an arrested person was to be taken before a magistrate as quickly as practicable.
_	Black also refused to accept the conclusions to be drawn from the doctrine of privilege: "Had this measure deprived five million farmers or a million businessmen of all right to participate in elections, because Congress thought that federal farm or business subsidies might prompt some of them to exercise, or be susceptible to, a corrupting influence on politics or government, I would not sustain such an Act on the ground that it could be interpreted so as to apply only to some of them."
_	These plants produce golden-yellow goblet-shaped flowers borne on stalks some way above the ground that open during the autumn or early winter.
_	About 1630 the dean, Isaac Bargrave, put down his lectureship, on the ground that he had gone beyond his office by catechising and that his lecture drew 'factious persons' out of other parishes; the lecture was revived in consequence of an influentially signed petition to Abbot.
_	However, in the applicants’ case it had denied them any inquiry of the facts on the ground that the adoption requested by them was in any case not possible under Austrian law.
_	In 1766 Lucas unsuccessfully opposed a bill to prevent the exportation of grain, on the ground that certain alterations made in it by the English privy council were detrimental to the rights of the Irish parliament.
_	Hale v. Committee on Character and Fitness for the State of Illinois, 335 F.3d 678 (Ill. 2003), was a decision made by the Supreme Court of Illinois in which the court upheld the Illinois Committee on Character of Fitness's denial of a license to practice law to Matthew F. Hale, on the ground that he lacked the moral character and fitness to practice law.
_	This duchy was held as a fief on the terms of homage to the French kings and both, in 1296 and 1324, it was confiscated by the kings of France on the ground that there had been a failure in the feudal duties.
_	His prestige had sunk so low that his office was offered to Sir John Meade, who had previously been regarded as ineligible for any Crown appointment on the ground that his wife was a Roman Catholic.
_	When Bush put Porter Goss in charge of the agency, Pavitt reportedly opposed the internal reorganizations announced by Goss, on the ground that they might "do damage to a strategic effort that has produced excellent work on terrorism and a variety of other important issues."
_	Frederick, duke of Augustenburg, son of the prince who in 1852 had renounced the succession to the duchies, now claimed his rights on the ground that he had had no share in the renunciation.
_	He was appointed Law Adviser to the Lord Lieutenant of Ireland, an influential post which involved assisting the Attorney General and Solicitor General, but resigned in 1841, on the ground that it interfered with his private practice.
_	The decision is explicable either on the ground that the seller accepted the plaintiff's repudiation and thus itself effected the discharge of the contract or on the ground that the payment was a mere part payment, the right to which depended upon performance of the contract and was thus conditional.
_	In a 1996 discussion on CNN, O'Donnell advocated the teaching of creationism in public schools and criticized Darwin's theory of evolution on the ground that it is "merely a theory" or "a myth".
_	The district court denied Morgan’s petition on the ground that the coram nobis petition was to be treated as a habeas corpus petition under 28 U.S.C. § 2255, which was unavailable to Morgan because he was no longer in federal custody.
_	When Bishop Aglipay supreme head of the Philippine Independent Church heard of it, he promptly filed a writ of prohibition with the Court of First Instance of Manila and later with the Supreme Court to prevent the sale of these stamps on the ground that their sale would violate the Constitution which prohibited the appropriation of any public money for the use, benefit or support of any sect, church or system of religion.
_	The governor denied the petition on the ground that Barrio Badiang was only newly created and was not yet capable of becoming a pueblo.
_	A private and a parochial school brought suit to enjoin enforcement of the act on the ground that it violated the constitutional rights of parents and guardians.
_	The Supreme Court ruled 5-4 in favor of the Nationalists on the ground that the ordinance unconstitutionally permitted the county to charge differing fees to different groups without any objective standards to prevent the county from basing the fee on the political views that a group sought to express.
_	One typical plant form is a dense rosette of leaves close to the ground that gives rise to the floral spike in the center.
_	The Witnesses Act 1806 is an Act of the Parliament of the United Kingdom which prohibits a witness from refusing to answer a question solely on the ground that the answer may establish that he owes a debt or is liable to civil suit (but would not incriminate him).
_	In 1916, the SBL secretary passed on to the members a communication, from the Third Assistant Postmaster General of the United States, refusing to give the "JBL" the second-class rate discount for scholarly journals, "on the ground that it was not scientific."
_	In 1889, a seven-story building rose from the ground that would later become The Empire Hotel.
_	They started damning this resolution on the ground that it was Pakistan.
_	It featured a rear-loading ramp with wide doors and an empennage set 14 feet off the ground that permitted trucks and trailers to back up to the doors without obstruction.
_	The bill, which contained no provision for giving the franchise to Roman Catholics, which Flood always opposed, was rejected, ostensibly on the ground that the attitude of the volunteers threatened the freedom of parliament.
_	The American foreign policy expert George Kennan, serving at the time as ambassador to Yugoslavia, sought unsuccessfully to dissuade President John F. Kennedy from proclaiming the week on the ground that the United States had no reason to make the resolution, which in effect called for the overthrow of all the governments of Eastern Europe, a part of public policy.
_	Macmillan recounted in his memoirs how moderate Liberals and some Conservatives who had voted Liberal in 1923 on the ground that Stewart was the most likely candidate to keep Labour out, were now coming over to him and how, as the days progressed, it became more and more clear it was a straight fight between him and Labour.
_	The Constitutional Court therefore had to decide whether the magistrate's court and the High Court had acted correctly in broadening the definition of the common-law crime of rape on the ground that the old definition had been unconstitutional.
_	When this permit expired, he applied for another one but was refused on the ground that complaints had been made.
_	In 1680, Arabella Hunt married "James Howard"; in 1682 the marriage was annulled on the ground that Howard was in fact Amy Poulter, a 'perfect woman in all her parts', and two women could not validly marry.
_	St. Paul presses home the duty incumbent on all Christians of keeping free from all sins of the flesh, and of fulfilling the obligations of the married state, if they have taken those obligations upon themselves, but also gives his "counsel" in favor of the unmarried state and of perfect chastity (Celibacy), on the ground that it is thus more possible to serve God with an undivided allegiance.
_	He defended slavery mainly on the ground that freeing [slaves] would be ruinous to Southern society; and the burden of his speech was that the South had suffered long and grievously at the hand of the North.
_	The District Court denied the motion to dismiss on the ground that the conduct asserted amounted to "administrative," not "prosecutorial," conduct; hence it fell outside the scope of the prosecutor's absolute immunity to § 1983 claims.
_	On the other hand, she opposed passage of the Equal Rights Amendment to the United States Constitution proposed by the National Woman's Party on the ground that it would deprive working women of the special statutory protections for which the WTUL had fought so hard.
_	When the copy of this report was sought by him under RTI Act, intelligence bureau denied it on the ground that IB is an exempted organization.
_	The conclusions of the committee were that pensions allowances and payments should not in future be granted in perpetuity, on the ground that such grants should be limited to the persons actually rendering the service, and that such reward should be defrayed by the generation benefited; that offices with salaries and without duties, or with merely nominal duties, ought to be abolished; that all existing perpetual pensions and payments and all hereditary offices should be abolished: that where no service or merely nominal service is rendered by the holder of an hereditary office or the original grantee of a pension, the pension or payment should in no case continue beyond the life of the present holder and that in all cases the method of commutation ought to ensure a real and substantial saving to the nation (the existing rate, about 27 years purchase, being considered by the committee to be too high).
_	it is defensible on the ground that the enormous power of France enables her to coerce the weaker state to become an enemy of England...
_	Hillgruber defended his call for the identification with the German troops fighting on the Eastern Front in an interview with the "Rheinischer Merkur" newspaper on 31 October 1986, on the ground that he was only trying "…to experience things from the perspective of the main body of the population".
_	In 1573 he refused to wear the surplice, on the ground that it gave offence to others, and he was convened before John Parkhurst, bishop of Norwich, who told him that it was better to offend a few private persons than to offend God and disobey the prince.
_	Although they had reportedly hiked the trail numerous times previously, it was not until they spotted a rust-covered metal can poking out of the ground that they chose to explore further.
_	The Ohio State offense and the rushing attack of J. T. Barrett and J. K. Dobbins came alive on the following drive when the two gained 71 yards on the ground that ended with a 21-yard Barrett touchdown run.
_	The letter, redrafted as requested by the ambassadors on the ground that it was too discourteous, invited Korea to submit to Japan and join in a war against China.
_	Lord Parker noted the argument that a company should be wound up on the ground that its substratum had failed, but dismissed it.
_	Murray called on Colin Bundy, the director of SOAS, to take action against her for allegedly promoting falsehoods, but the latter refused on the ground that Murray's views were "unsubstantiated".
_	Muhammad Zaman Mirza, the fugitive Mughal prince made his claim on the ground that Bahadur's mother adopted him as her son.
_	Fellowship of Humanity v. County of Alameda was a 1957 California Courts of Appeal case in the Fellowship of Humanity, an organization of humanists, sought a tax exemption from Alameda County, California on the ground that they used their property "solely and exclusively for religious worship."
_	The respondent sought and obtained another order to review on the ground that the magistrate had not properly exercised his discretion.
_	While there is no mention of Buddha endorsing or repudiating vegetarianism in surviving portions of Pali Tripitaka and no Mahayana sutras explicitly declare that meat eating violates the first precept, certain Mahayana sutras vigorously and unreservedly denounce the eating of meat, mainly on the ground that such an act violates the bodhisattva's compassion.
_	If theories are criticized, it is usually on the ground that they are not useful, do not speak to the situation, and fail to explain or predict things properly.
_	In 1897 Dillon opposed in the House of Commons the Address to Queen Victoria on the occasion of the Diamond Jubilee, on the ground that her reign had not been a blessing to Ireland, and he showed the same uncompromising attitude in 1901 when a grant to Lord Roberts was under discussion, accusing him of systematised inhumanity.
_	Before entry of the order dismissing the complaint, the government filed a motion to reopen the case on the ground that it was collusive and did not involve a real case or controversy.
_	The respondent Minister opposes the application on the ground that the applicants lack the capacity at common law to marry one another for the reason given by the City Clerk's Office.
_	The Attorney General of Canada (the "Attorney General") opposes the application on the ground that the concept of marriage at common law is limited to persons of opposite sex and denies that such limitation violates s. 15 of the Charter.
_	State v. Dumlao is a 1986 criminal Hawaii Intermediate Court of Appeals case appealing a murder conviction on the ground that the court's decision to not issue a jury instruction for voluntary manslaughter based on extreme emotional disturbance was a reversible error.
_	This would include flicking the ball up with the foot and then heading the ball back to the goalkeeper, or heading a ball on the ground that would otherwise be regularly playable with the foot.
_	On 30 August Chamberlain met his Cabinet and Ambassador Henderson and secured their backing—with only First Lord of the Admiralty Duff Cooper dissenting against Chamberlain's policy to pressure Czechoslovakia into making concessions, on the ground that Britain was then in no position to back up any threat to go to war.
_	At the close of the 2016–17 season, a new community facility was formally opened at the ground that included a recently built changing rooms block.
_	Feed was heavy on the ground that same year causing kangaroos to breed up in large numbers and act as a pest to the squatters.
_	Khusrau mentions that the ground that once smelled of musk now emitted a stench of blood.
_	In January 20, 1998, the Court of Appeal, 2 District, Division 6, California dismissed the violations on the ground that the mine had established a defense of necessity.
_	The will was challenged by the daughter's relations, and after conflicting decisions in the Scottish court of session was appealed to the House of Lords, who, on 17 November 1830, set aside the settlement on the ground that the deed was void in consequence of its want of precision as to the sum to be accumulated by the trustees before building and as to the number of boys to be educated on the foundation.
_	shall be void on the ground that it is inconsistent with or takes away or abridges any rights conferred on the other citizens of India by any provision of this part."
_	A lawsuit filed by Charles Kerchner (lead plaintiff in "Kerchner v. Obama") was dismissed on March 1, 2012, on the ground that the court had jurisdiction only to hear challenges to defects in the nominating papers, which did not include questions about Obama's status as a natural-born citizen.
_	The main entrance to the ground used to be on Bloomfield Road, via the South Stand; however, the development of the ground that began in the first few years of the 21st century meant it is now from Seasiders Way, via the Matthews Stand on the west side of the ground.
_	She refuses his advances on the ground that she already loves a sailor.
_	These proposals were rejected on the ground that such publicity might have the adverse consequence of giving members a public forum at which to further their own agendas.
_	Netbula objected to the motion on the ground that defendants were asking to alter Netbula's website and that they should have subpoenaed Internet Archive for the pages directly.
_	Co then sought a declaration that the sale be set aside, on the ground that Mr MacKenzie had been an agent and solicitor of the court during the previous proceedings.
_	In his last years he carried on a feverish agitation against the theology and practice of the state church, on the ground that religion is for the individual soul, and is to be separated absolutely from the state and the world.
_	But Sir William Soame, the sheriff of Suffolk, was well-disposed to the losing candidate, and on the ground that Sir Samuel's supporters comprised many about whose right to vote he was in doubt, he sent up to the Commons a double return announcing the names of the two candidates, and leaving the House to decide their rights to the seat.
_	These buildings were not particularly durable; they were supported by posts in the ground that rotted in the course of a few decades.
_	According to this myth, Romulus, upon reaching Rome on the day of the Parilia, took a stick and engraved a line in the ground that defined the boundaries of the new city "(pomerium)".
_	The project was conceived on 1932, because that year the National Games of Colombia were to be made in Barranquilla and was built in the ground that occupied the "Estadio Juana de Arco".
_	The decision had been adopted on the ground that several officers were already competing for different clubs, premise to a good nucleus for forming future competitive teams.
_	The state government imposed a ban on alcohol in 1994; however, the Indian National Congress government that came to power in 1995 lifted prohibition on the ground that it was causing huge losses in revenue.
_	He objected to deaths on the stage on the ground that the representation is unconvincing.
_	It is not clear why the facility was built and there is no longer anyone above the ground that knows of its existence.
_	In 1951, Abraham Brothman's conviction for obstruction of justice was reversed by the United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit on the ground that venue did not lie in the Southern District of New York.
_	But while Batman and Sarah are waiting for an air transport that will pick them up and take them out of Kravia, Sarah picks up a toy on the ground that is similar to a yo-yo.
_	Thirty-four years of negotiations ended in a Danish-American arbitration treaty in 1888, as a result of which the claim was disallowed on the ground that the Danish government had observed strictly the neutrality laws involved.
_	On 24 August 2012, the High Court unanimously allowed the appeal and quashed Patel's convictions on the ground that prejudicial evidence had likely influenced the jury.
_	During the 2013 by-election it had been reported that whilst the local Liberal Democrats commanded a vast database of supporters on the ground that enabled them to get their vote out, the local Tory organisation in the constituency was practically non-existent.
